Time Warner Cable is the biggest crap company ever. Their COMPLIANCE joke of a rep BRANDY is insisting that i prove 36 months of residency to PROVE that I am not asscociated with a bill NOT in my name - and only because i tried to help someone out to open the door to let their cable guy in 4 years ago. Now I can not get service unless I go back and Fax 3 1/2 years of UTILITY BILLS to TWCable. There are so many other reasonable companies like Dish, DirectTV, ATT UVerse. you have to be a GLUTTON for punishment to deal with this company. Don't waste your $1200 a year with this horrific crap service and pathetic excuse for a company.
3 days out of service in a week!
Unfortunately my pizza was overcooked. The kids were picking off the burnt pepperoni. Apparently the cheesey bread has mayo on it and not butter. This was my first time ordering over the phone with this pizzeria. $40 for pizza, pop, and bread. Tip included. Not a good meal.
None
The Doctor is wonderful...her staff is horrible. I was pressured into a deep cleaning that I felt wasn't really needed and at a huge cost. But the last straw for me was watching the lady at the counter pressuring an 80+ year old woman into getting a deep cleaning at a cost that she couldn't afford. She badgered her for several minutes all the while the woman was insisting that all she wanted was what her insurance covered. The office woman told her it would be "malpractice" for them to do less than a deep cleaning and they would be happy to finance the cleaning. Really?? Finance a teeth cleaning for an 80+ year old woman?? That was it for me. I've never been back.
Can TAKE a reservation but can't HOLD a reservation! Do NOT go there. Budget (also downtown) is so much better to work with!
This Super 8 looks nice on the outside but run down on the inside, The place needs updating. In the room I checked into the bathroom smelled of urine, the faucet in the tub was leaking, the toilet lid was broken and actually came off as I opened the lid, you can hear all the cars, semis, & motorcycles from the interstate, tight small parking spaces. You better not stop here with a truck and trailer! I would not recommend this Super 8
I Just had a phone call with this agency attempteing to verify coverage and the individual i spoke with was extremely rude!!
Terrible experiencia . Compre Los tickets online Cuzco - Machu Picchu - Cuzco . Como el viaje to desconoce nombre de las estaciones al regreso nos dejaron en ollantaytambo . Tuve que pagar un taxi de una hora y media y pagar 50 dlls por Esto. Hice el reclamo y como siempre Ellos tienen la razon . Estas son las cosas que hacen desagradable visitar Peru , la viveza mal intencionada existe por donde vayas .. Que lastima
John Busillo does not value customers. The 1998 Chevy Malibu he sold me turned out to have two tires that are the wrong size for the vehicle. Also, front brake rotors were completely rusted on the back side. I paid for the brakes, but couldn't afford correct tires for vehicle. So, in total, I paid 3600 dollars for the car. I called John asking if he could help in any way and all he told me is "You can't come up with another two hundred dollars for tires?". He took my money and ran. Do not buy from Excel Motors, unless you have an extra 500-1000 dollars to fix the things he will say are you problems now....
None
Never had a company try to talk me out of hiring them...highly disappointed that they felt that they had more than enough work to actually come out and see what needed to be done to give a price. According to Doug at Rooney I would be better off with someone else...
They did a terrible job on my french shellac. They promised a 14 day guarantee. After 5 days my nails were chipping. I called to make an appt to have them redone. Because of my schedule and their location I am not able to get there until the weekend, however Saturday is day 12 and apparently that falls outside their 14 day guarantee and they won't fix them for free. Not a place I want to do business with.
Worst Brazilian restaurant in the LA area. Frozen meat (specially the picanha), expensive price, bad cuts, over the top decor. Been there twice, spent more than it's worth and was frustrated twice. Meat selection is weak and they lack a decent offering of premium cuts. Not coming back at all. Pampas at Farmer's market offers a better option and fair price. If you need the "churrascaria" experience, invest your money on Fogo de Chão. It's more expensive, but you get great service, amazing meats and a knowledgeable cooking crew.
When it first opened Rice Hut was first rate. Now the food tastes like burnt crap like they could care less. Its block away... but I avoid it like the plague now. Not good anymore.
Tên đúng là CF Bảo Ngọc.
Sitting in pain for an hour and a half and still not being seen(let alone the usual hour wait to be seen by the actual doctor after they take you back to the room: total 2.5 agonizing hours) is asinine!!!!!!!!!!! I feel really bad for the lady upfront, who they probably don't pay nearly enough, has to sit by and watch this atrocious service take place.....If you can't run a business properly it's time to close the doors!!! Btw I don't expect McDonald's wait times but I also don't expect to have to pay rent either!!!! Please management staff of this urgent care hire another doctor....obviously you have the demand for your services..... btw I left after an hour and 45 minutes wait!
This was my last visit to this particular Dunkin. Sad, because I work right across the street and this is a convenient place to get my morning coffee fix. I understand mistakes happen. But, this is the 4th day in a row my order has been wrong. It's not like my order is rocket science - a medium iced coffee with cream and sugar and either an oatmeal or wake up wrap. That's it. Last Friday, ordered the usual. Got back to work and opened up the bag, and found a wheat bagel instead of my wake up wrap. This past Monday, just coffee today, but when they handed me my drink, it was a hot coffee. I had to wait while they made a new one, and pay extra for the iced, even though it was their mistake. This Tuesday, waited in line forever, they handed me a Coolata of some sort and no oatmeal. Again, had to wait while they remade everything (this after waiting in line). Today, placed my order, finally made it to the window, and had to repeat my order in its entirety to the girl at the window, and again wait while they made everything again. There are plenty of other Dunkins out there (I pass by 3 on my way to work each day). Guess I will be stopping by there. So sad, because this place was convenient. Well, their lack of organization and basic food service skills lost a daily customer.
What do you expect with staff on furlough and the State losing budget. The worst part there isn't any parking. I feel sorry for the surrounding businesses.
Know what you're in for. It's an old pub trying to be a lounge bar. Food was mediocre (I had a frozen chip in my seafood basket) Fine if you're smashed in Caxton St, but otherwise avoid.
The staff was polite, other than the dental assistant that knew me by name through a family member. The service was prompt and initially seemed adequate, until my filling popped out within the first week. The replacement didn't last longer than a month, and the remainder of fillings have either chipped or cracked. I have never returned. All billing was authorized beforehand through my insurance carrier, by their billing staff, and no extra charges were mentioned until I received a bill that was sent to collection, despite my complaint describing the inferior quality of service I received. I would not recommend this office.
Nice location. Housing is also fine, although a bit run down on the seaside. The big negative is that everyone seems to get sick, with vomiting, diarrhoea and stomach ache. Never had this issue before in Asia, but here everyone we've talked to have had the same.
None
Worst pizza I've ever had this place is terrible anyone who says otherwise has no idea what good pizza should taste like
Sauce is bitter and lacks spice, probably just watered down paste. Greasy soggy dough tastes like chinese places smell. Ordered a "mini" as they did not serve slices. It really was "mini", not sure why they chose to cut the pancake sized mini into 6 pieces...each is about the size of my thumb, could eat with chopsticks. Have had better experiences with cafeteria andgas station pizzas. Based on sauce and bake quality would not expect much out of more complex "recipes" Counter staff said 8 minutes, took 22 minutes. Not acceptable when on a lunch break.
Грязный магазин. Довольно часто можно наткнуться на просроченные продукты.
We have been going to this Jason's for the past 12 years and have enjoyed dining there. The last few times we have gone things have changed. Unacceptable things that we are now experiencing are food all over the floor, no clean glasses available, no utensils, no clean saucers for things like cornbread puffs, etc. It gives me the feeling of being in a facility that is in the final stage of going out of business.
Alles in Allem ganz Ok, aber die Sauberkeit im Shop könnte besser sein.
Once a point a time it was good. now the grease constantly need changed. They call that a salad? The service is slow and has a bad attitude. don't order out, they will screw you. I don't think they ever clean the place. the restrooms are filthy. the food is very inconstant. They cannot keep help
I have an issue with this place. They have a retarded policy that families must all sit in the same row, or be kicked out. Yep, we've had the wildlife officer and theater manager twice threaten to kick all 5 of us out because the teenagers wanted to sit one or two rows away from us. Try sitting 5 people in one row, in a crowded theater without being a pain to everyone else. I think it is a stupid policy, and do not have this problem anywhere else we go. That's why we avoid this theater. There's 3 other theaters here in Ocala and they all play the same movies. The other ones may not be as new, but I prefer them over having to deal with the insanity.
I attempted to call this property and the number they have listed on their website is disconnected....says enough for me...NEW website, incorrect information...hmmm.
Never buy any Car from this Idiot Dealer, they assured me that car is in excellent condition. Mike "Mustache" is the sales man and take me for test drive and told me that car is running very smooth and does not have any problems. within two weeks of purchase its transmission failed, the car is not moving in Reverse Gear. i called this Jerk and he is giving me excuses. once you buy they will not take any responsibilities. i make a mistake by not finding any reviews of this dealer. but now i know and i hope no one buy anything from this IDIOTS.
Péssimo atendimento, péssima comida..não tem tudo o que oferecem no cardápio...
Horrible service. Food was good and the place was nice. It was moderately busy, but no excuse to only see the waitress about every 20 minutes. There seemed to be no sense in urgency in our waitress. Not one refill on our chips and salsa , and had to refill our own drinks.
Very bad experience here. In the past good but now they have a cat like staff and a arrogant owner. They forgot to make a cake for an event I was having.
I've tried several cleaning services and none of them have cleaned to my liking. I found this company online and based on several positive reviews, I decided to give them a try. I signed up for weekly service. The owner sent a checklist of everything that would be done. The communication was good, and the rate was reasonable. When I have a cleaning scheduled, I do a good amount of picking up prior. I make all the beds--even though it was included I didn't want them to waste time with my ridiculous amount of throw pillows; I pick up everything laying on the floors, counters, etc. It's very straight when they arrive, all they have to do is come in and do the big clean. Supposedly. The first cleaning was ok. Nothing bad, nothing good, but no "wow" factor. The second time was horrible. My carpets weren't even vacuumed. It was the second thing I noticed. The first thing was that the Collector's Edition Digitally Remastered movie set had been stolen. I knew it was taken because they were out on my table. My son and I were watching them, he'd never seen this movie collection. The cases were there, the movies gone. I contacted the owner. She explained that it was a new girl and they had allowed her to work prior to her background check being returned. Once it came back, she had shoplifting charges and they fired her. Too late for me. The owner replaced the movies, rather quickly, communicated well with me about it, and I felt reassured and stupidly gave them another chance at no cost to me. This visit was ok as well. The thing I noticed is that not everything, not even most things, on the list were being completed. My ceiling fans were never dusted. I was told in writing that weekly customers get free oven and fridge cleaning. I had to request that on the last visit and since I didn't need my carpets vacuumed as I had them shampooed I was told we could swap out vacuuming for the fridge and oven. ??? Nothing on the counters was ever moved or lifted when they wiped. A mat by my kitchen sink wasn't moved to vacuum or mop under. Mirrors weren't cleaned, they picked and chose what to dust and didn't choose much. For nearly $400 a month it better be top notch. That's a lot of money. If you don't want to include things such as baseboards, fans, mopping and dusting, don't tell people you will. Am I picky? Yes! However, I chose this company because of the things I was told would happen and it was what I was looking for. There's nothing wrong with pickiness, unless someone doesn't do what they say. I clean homes for a living, too. I would never disrespect my clients so much and insult their intelligence in hopes they did not notice my laziness. Save your money. I truly think the owner is a sweet and good person, but she needs to "clean house" with her employees. I know she has worked hard to build a business and her employees are going to be her downfall. New ones, and some desperately needed new training, and a no tolerance policy might help her save face. I'm sad to say I had to chalk this company up with the rest of them: a disappointment.
This florist sent the wrong arrangement than what i ordered and paid for. I ask for a refund and they said we sent it out and the customer loved it. The guy on the phone did not want to work with me or give me a refund so I would use them again. But he didn't want to work with me. So watch out what you order it might be wrong and they will not do anything about it.
Total scam of a company. Sends you lots of bogus invoices trying to trick accounts payable departments into paying them. Have been receiving them for years and am finally sick of what they are doing. Their invoices look very real and threaten collections. But there is no phone number on them and they are mailed pre-sorted. Can't believe they stay in business. Most of these "positive" Google reviews I suspect are fake! They've created multiple web sites with fake everything to make it appear they are legitimate. They are even on linked in.
We went to Myrtle Beach for a family vacation checking in on Sat June 21st. We had three families checking in from Ohio and Florida. We chose Coconut Grove unit 205 with 6 bedroms and 5 baths.Upon arriving we went to the office on Sea Mountain Highway about 2:30. We was told that the unit has been cleaned but not inspected and give them until 3:00 before we go there. We arrived about 3:10 and the cleaning crew was just coming out as we arrived. When we entered to our surprise the place was disgusting. The carpet on the stairs looked like it had never been cleaned, it had stains and dirt ground into the carpet. The tile floors were sticky and still had dirt on them. My wife called the office and said the would send a cleaning crew out to clean up. Our second party arrived from Columbia SC and we were totally embarressed that we had rented such a filthy place to meet our family once a year. None of us live like this and now we would have to live in a filthy enviroment for the week. The two cleaning girls showed up and we started showing them just how bad it was, dirt so thick on the thermostat it looked like no one had wiped it off ever. We showed them the carpets and the stains and marks on the walls. The food caked up on the backsplash behind the stove and sink. The stove, oven and refrigerators that had only been wiped with a wet cloth but not cleaned. The two girls said they were there to vacum only and that this need to be deep cleaned and they only got 25.00 to vacum. The one called Jimmy on her cell phone and he said someone would come up to look at it. We knew that the office closed at 7:00 and nobody would be around. Our third party arrived from Ohio and they were in disbelieve that this is what they were going to spend the next week in. Both of our other parties have children and did not want them to live in something as this. My wife had made it a point to emphasize that the unit needs to be very clean and updated. This is not our first vacation as we have rented condos, houses and cabins in the past but this by far was the worst. Since no one was coming and it was 6:15 we decided to go to the office ourselves. Arriving there we heard others that was not happy with there units. We explained our situation and a few minutes Nicole came out and took us into her office, She was very nice and listened to our concerns and took notes. She had people ready to get us sheets, comforters,trash cans and a cleaning crew to send over right away. We had then went to the store the three sisters and myself to get cleaning supplies and griceries for the week. When we arrived back to our unit we were told that the cleaning ladies that showed up did a good job on cleaning what they could. They had a pile of dirt, hair, sand and paper the size of a basketball swept into a pile. They even found chicken wing bones in the room with the air conditioner. They cleaned the mold from the showers the best they could. We finally were making beds at 11:20pm after some of us started our days at 3:00 in the morning a little shy of being up 24hrs. Not a great way to start a family vacation. Elliot Rentals have not offered any type of compensation except when they said if we wanted to do our own cleaning the would knock off 110.00 cleaning fee. Since when do you have to clean your own place before starting vacation. For 3000.00 for the week I would never stay with them again nor would I recommend this unit to anyone. Funny thing is the unit is up for sale for over 300,000.00. It will take another 10,000 of cleanin, replacing carpet and painting to get it into shape just to show it.
I have never seen that kind of attitude to patients before. First of all Dr.Goodman's office imposes strict policy - if you are late 2 times - they will refuse to provide you the service and you will have to look for another doctor. And when you come for the first time you sign a paper that states it. You like it? Well, it's just a beginning... Keep in mind that it takes days or even weeks to change a doctor with insurance companies. So if you get late, you might get stuck with a doctor that refuses to see you. The office manager - Maria was rude from the beginning and did everything for us not to come there again. She literally kicked my wife with my 10months old son out of the office just because she refused to completely undress my son for weighing. He had runny nose and my wife wanted to keep at least a thin bodysuit as it did not really matter that day for a follow up visit after pneumonia. Actually we just wanted to make sure that the pneumonia was gone and expected the doctor to check new X-rays first. My wife asked Maria to ask the doctor if completely undressing is a must. She came back and said that it's a must and if we 'do not cooperate with the nurse' the doctor will not see the child. When my wife asked to see him personally she was told that the doctor 'has nothing to discuss' and we either cooperate or leave. My wife insisted that she wants to see the doctor personally and will not leave because the child is sick and we spent the whole morning waiting. Maria threatened that she is going to call security and police and that we must leave. We were shocked and decided to leave. Do you think that's professional, ethical or at least humane? I don't. Do yourself a favor and never go to Mr. Goodman. PS. We had to call several doctors that day and could not see anyone because insurance company requires a few days to change a doctor. We just moved to California from New York where we had an amazing doctor Rafik Khaimov, professional, caring and just a Good person.
Beds are hard, no fridge, no microwave, no soap, no shampoo, not enough pillows, water lukewarm at best for an entire day, bathroom tiny, just not wirth the money with so many other lower cost options and much nicer properties not costing much more.
My dog, Rico, was attacked, by bird or another animal, and we took him to Gulf Coast. My husband and daughter took my baby Rico ( Maltese) to this clinic and they were told that his prognosis was very good. I was out of town but felt confident that he would be okay and be home in about 4 days. Little did I know that soon after I would get a desperate call from my daughter that Rico is not breathing and we had to put him down. We spent over $5000 to fix my baby only to loss him. If we had been told the truth from the beginning that he would probably not make it we would not have put him through the suffering he had to go through. I feel that this clinic was not upfront about the severity of his injuries, costing me thousands and my poor Rico hours of suffering. No matter how much you love your pet, make sure you are told the truth and put your baby down with NO suffering than pay these vet doctors thousands and your baby suffers and still you loss him/her. Sorry to say, but I would not recommend this vet office.
CLOSED & For Sale as of 12/30/2012
Horrible , messed up all of our pizza's. No cheese or sauce. We called and complained. They sent more pizza that was almost as bad as the ones before. Im not ordering from them again. We even complained to the corporate site and they never returned a call or email.
The spa itself is quite nice, clean and has a relaxing and posh aire about it. My services were even good, however, the front desk girl failed to let me know that i could not put a tip onto my credit card at the time i made my reservation so when i was paying via CC i had no cash with which to tip the staff. When i asked where the ATM was she stated that there wasn't one in the immediate area but i could go over to Rite Aid and get cash back.....um....what?!? Why am I doing all this extra work to tip their staff? I asked her about the policy and she stated that it is just the owners policy. I mentioned that it would have been nice to know that in advance and got no response from either girl sitting there. I did end up walking to Rite Aid and getting cash back because i believe in tipping for good service but i definitely will not be recommending this spa to anyone nor will i be back. I should not have to run around after a spa service to find cash to tip the staff.
Ya no existe ese restaurante, el gps me trajo al fin del mundo y es un barrio residencial, hay un bar pero cerrado y el telf no contesta..indicación errónea! !
Purchasing my car was a great experience. Service is beyond HORRIBLE! No car rentals, cannot schedule service or have limited window to do so. Expect customers to wait for 3+ hours while they fix your car because they do not want give loaners - those who can afford your so called premium brand can do so because we WORK! All the more reason to offer loaners. Tried to schedule my service & recall repairs AGAIN today, canceled last time because they would not loan me a car and the service rep yelled at me and hung up on me because I said I did not have time in my schedule to wait for 3 hours while they repaired my recall. A recall is your fault D-bag, not mine and my time should not be impacted. Had to fight to get a loaner car. Was told to bring in at 6:30PM, got stuck in a meeting, called to see if I can bring in 7AM tomorrow AM - was told no because they are booked solid. You would think that an $80,000 car would get you customer service. Guess I did not spend enough. SO OVER IRVINE BMW. GOING TO TRY A DIFFERENT BMW DEALER, I HEAR IRVINE BMW HAS HAD SERVICE ISSUES FROM A LOT OF PEOPLE IN ORANGE COUNTY.
The gentlemen is very nice but failed to explain to my son the policy if you PREPAY and make an appointment, if an emergency or something happens you LOSE your money. My son was promised 3 sessions, but we had to PAY for the third one. I think this is BAD business. At least they could have gave an HOUR out of the 2 hours we already paid for! Especially since the appointments were made 2 weeks in advance because NOTHING sooner was available. Feel like my son was cheated..
None
No wifi.
普通。不過飲料有點貴，而且有的燈是壞的。不是很滿意。
Be very careful on what you are signing up for and remember to cancel your contract on time or your fees will double.
Underwhelming. "Remind me never to order from them again," she said. Done. Recommended? = No. Pass.
This place is over priced. Dissapointed in the food. I havent eaten here in way over a year.
Die Friseurin war abgelenkt, und hat den schnitt nicht so gemacht wie ich ihn haben wollte... Außerdem musste ich 1€ mehr zahlen obwohl ich nicht auf zusätzliche kosten hingewiesen wurde.
3rd time I've stopped by this location, 3rd time I've received atrocious coffee. Tasted like it was weeks old every time. Never stopping there again.
If you happen to be a woman in your mid-20s or anyone who is not very knowledgeable about cars. DO NOT visit this place without someone who does. I feel very taken advantage of. You, of course, get the feeling you may not need all the services suggested, but trust me, you won't be able to turn down services without being made feel like an idiot. There's no reason a 'car expert' can't give honest answers about what needs fixed right now and what may be able to wait... Shame.
Totally so bad. i had a friend mention this company so i tried to ship something with them and they NEVER got back to me. like seriously you cant even give me a price range? wow. so then i read all the other ppls comments and im like wow thank God i didn"t use them and they didnt get back to me afterall!!!! DONT USE THEM!!!!
The 'owner' of this company thinks that because he is in a lifted F-250. He can just push people out of his way while driving down the road! This is not how an owner should act, especially when he has his business signs plastered all over the truck, and then claims he is the owner as he drives off.
Mostly friendly staff, but I had a terrible experience with them. After talking with a member of their staff on Saturday, I did as he suggested and called this morning shortly after they opened to schedule a service call to repair my dryer. They were supposed to be here around 12:30-1 p.m.. and I made sure to detail specifically the address, apartment number, and complex name, as well as provide my full phone number. After it got to being a good 45 minutes after they were supposed to show up, or at least call, I called their office to get a status update. I was assured they'd be heading my way in "15-20 minutes, top." I continued waiting, being in my apartment since 12:20, until I finally got a phone call at 2:25. They claimed that they'd just gotten back to their shop, after nobody answering the door at my apartment. I tried to clarify which complex they went to, if they'd gotten confused or something - they claimed flat out that they'd knocked on my apartment door, that it was the right one, and that nobody had answered. I'd been waiting here for 2 hours, nobody ever knocked on my door. Nor did they bother to call me to see if I was there, or seek help in finding my apartment. They refused to admit any fault or mistake on their part, refused to come back out the same day, and only offered to reschedule for later in the week.
I bought a new 2012 Mercedes 350 there last year. The salesman was a good guy but the sales manager is very conceited. I have seen him many times over the years and always the same. Problem is that after the sale you have to deal with their service department. They just don't seem to try to give you a feeling of having come into a relationship with a high priced car dealer, after having spent that kind of money to buy their car and then pay lots for their service. I have started getting services at Skyland Mercedes in Asheville since I stay in Asheville a lot. Service department is very friendly and accommodating.
Good
Had carpet installed last summer and it went well except for the nails that are poking through the carpet. I understand why they are necessary but I feel the installation team should have pounded them down before they finished. I called customer service and was told I should do it myself. That's great. Pay for install, but finish it myself. Very disappointed in the service. Can't recommend as a vendor.
Not having had an eye exam for nearly a decade, I went to this Eubank location of the Sandia Vision Clinic for a contact lens exam in mid-March of this year (2013). The service was….not good. I was not given the opportunity to remove my contacts prior to the exam, which flustered both the tech and my optometrist, Dr. Lauren Bobick, when I informed them of this—as if this isn’t something that every person wearing contacts would need to do prior to an eye exam. While my tech (can’t remember his name—short Hispanic guy) demonstrated pretty good customer service skills, Dr. Bobick clearly did not want to be there. She was, at best, curt, and, at worst, standoffish. She was clearly annoyed at the fact that I didn’t know the exactitudes of my contact prescription (the reason I scheduled the eye exam in the first place), and stated outright that I was going to be charged for a full contact exam in addition to the normal eye exam. That was fine with me, and was what I walked into the clinic thinking would be the case: my current insurance (Davis Vision Basic) covers a regular eye exam, and up to $200 for contacts, but it does not cover the contact exam per se. Thus, I was prepared to pay the ~$137.00 necessary to cover the contact exam. To my surprise, the tech informed me that Sandia would be able to use the $200 contact allowance to cover the contact exam, and that I was good to go. As you can imagine, I thought that was awesome! I chocked Dr. Bobick’s undesirable bedside manner to this being Albuquerque (if you’ve lived here as long as I have—25 years—you know what I mean) and left with a smile on my face. Cut to yesterday (07/02/13), when, lo and behold, I received a bill from Sandia Vision for my contact lens exam, nearly four months after the fact. Unfortunately, I could not remember the name of my tech, and I failed to obtain some kind of receipt/bill on the day of my exam showing exactly how my charges were going to be covered. Needless to say, that seemed pretty shady. This morning, I called Sandia Vision and spoke with a Megan (sp?) about my bill. I explained everything to her, and then asked her why this would have happened, particularly why I was told that my lens allowance could be used to cover the exam. She was unable to answer this, stating that she had never heard anything like this, that they were understaffed, and simply kept repeating that my insurance didn’t cover contact lens exams. When I asked her why it took so long to receive a bill, she blamed it on my insurance company. At least she was cordial, which is more than I can say about Dr. Bobick. In sum, my check is in the mail, but I will not ever return to Sandia Vision Clinic, and I advise you to avoid this place at all costs. If you feel inclined to go here, or it’s your only option, make sure that you get something with your charges in writing on the day of your exam (easier said than done; just read the other negative reviews of this place).
None
Date of visit: 01/10/2013I have never reviewed a place before so I'll keep this short. Went here recently with some people. I honestly was enjoying myself; food was fine, not mouth-wateringly so, but it was alright. In fact, I nearly finished it. Nearly. Found a long, blonde hair hanging off the edge of my chopstick. The hair didn't belong to me or anyone at my table. This has probably happened to a lot of people, the lucky ones usually find the hair before they nearly finish the meal. So naturally I let one of the employees know. The employee then gets her manager. Now I'm explaining the situation to the manager and I tell her I want a refund. She immediately says she cant do that because I, "ate all the meat". Yes, that's what she said. I then replied. "yes i did, thats what makes it so much worse". She continues to say she cant give me a refund, only a credit. I did not take the credit, I didnt plan on coming back to this place. This is not a case where someone eats nearly all the food, and then decides they don't like it and want a refund. Hair in food is something everyone does dread, but really cant avoid. It happens. Its the response I received from management that bothered me most. Never returning, and I advise others to do the same.
I have travelled for 40 years and do not consider myself a picky traveller. However I have rarely been so disappointed. Rented two rooms for two nights. From the check-in process, to the room, food, amenities and internet, there is only one word for this place. It is a fleabag. It was not clean, things were broken all over the place, the internet did not work. To make matters worse, the price quoted ($110) was not the price charged ($140). Even for $50 a night, I could never recommend this place. The only positives were that the bed was flat and the TV worked. My advice? STAY AWAY AND BOOK ELSEWHERE.
I went in loaded for bear. I have had problems with Sprint dropping calls. Stopped in to have them check my phone all was well. Went home called Sprint. They SAID that the problem was with the network and that the 2 towers that serviced mare that one was at 65% of power and the other was 45% of power. They stated that they would check into it and get back to me in no less than 3 days day 4 arrived i waited until late in the day and called them. gave them the run down and low and behold they wanted to do all the tests again . 1st my phone . which I told them I had checked out at the sprint store But it means nothing. Then they looked at my records and said for the 2nd time " yes you do have a lot of dropped calls" Then they started talking about service areas. I stated that I was in the service area per their map.. Oh she said. you have to go online and look.. what you maps are not correct? I saw nothing to say I needed to go online? after a few more minutes of them trying to blame my area and my house and my location I stated that they were out of contract as my service was minimum at best. they then moved me up the ladder. mmmm bout 5 minutes later another person on the phone ask me the same crap i had explained 3 times before.. i was going to blow chunks about now. Then she says oh I see you have a lot of dropped calls.. phunking wise woman. She then said that they would be happy to let me out of my contract as I was now on the EDGE of the service area and they could not give me the service that i was paying for..All I had to do was return the phone? What I said I bought they phone! I paid up front for the phone and the service and the phone belonged to me. Well long story short. Sprint SUCKS. They play little games when in fact they need to be honest sooner.
I normally don't right reviews, but the stupidity of the people answering the phone was epic. After 5 minutes of spelling out my address, i was transfered to a person that was not a native english speaker who told me "we no go there". Sad, I only live a few blocks from the location.
My in-laws came here when they lived here, growing up. We visited (some 15 years later) this weekend and was not impressed. It was great seeing some people that the family knew! The restrooms were filthy. They have not been cleaned properly for some time. The tables were sticky and dirty. Our order taker was very pleasant and a nice person, just seemed a bit overwhelmed with the few tables she had. She was not able to keep up with the needs of the 5 of us. I would expect seafood to be fresh (Branford IS on the water....) and yet I bet I could have got Clams that were either fresh or not over cooked in Omaha. They were tough, tasteless and not fresh. I sent the margarita back, it was the worst mix I have ever tasted! This will not be a place that we stop at again. We spent too much money for this experience...
Maybe the barista trained at a Gulag. I'm not sure how else to explain why the coffee that I waited so long for tasted so bad. Liquid tarmac would have tasted better. Not only was the coffee distasteful, the service was slow and surly. And when I pointed out that my coffee was below par I was told I should "just get stuffed". Possibly the worst service I have ever had.
That is the worst motel i have ever been in my life there are bed bugs crack motel and if the owners wife feels threatened that some one might take her husband then she say u have to check out they need to be shut down
Doctors are not paying enough attention to patient's concerns.
Carrollton Police are extremely rude and ignorant..
STAY AWAY FROM THIS STORE! What the sales associate tells you is one thing, what is hidden away in the fine print of your contract is something entirely different. When you complain to Sprint national, they will refer you to the store. When you complain to the store, they will refer you to Sprint national. If you value your sanity, find another provider.
camera all'apparenza carina ma letto scomodissimo e le coperte insufficienti. Le pareti sono sottili tanto che la nostra camera era comunicante con un'altra e basta una TV accesa dall'altra parte a togliere il sonno. la doccia ha muffa sulla tenda che comunque è troppo piccola e tende ad allagare il bagno. La colazione comprende solo acqua latte zucchero e caffè... accoglienza gentile e buona ubicazione vicino al centro di mestre e ai relativi autobus per Venezia oltre che a un ottimo ristorante giapponese
None
The most terrible customer service in the world, beware
Highly unprofessional management. We saw the beautiful pictures online and made reservations and were there in one hour from Houston. It was our anniversary. Upon arrival we found this was not in the updated historical part of Galveston's historical district but in an undesirable area. As we approached the gates two local bums awaited us. Across the street was a group of people sitting on cars and in the front yard with a loud boom box blaring. There is no secure parking and we were not going to leave our nice vehicle parked out on the street in this neighborhood. And this does not have the appearance of a place that is a safe area to go for a walk. Upon entering we found that the place is not kept up as nice as others in Galveston. Then we found Window units for AC in the bedrooms. Its way over priced.The Manager was not there so we spoke to the brother who said the manager would be back later. We left a note saying we could not spend our anniversary here. That it was not in a neighborhood where my wife felt safe. the Manager finally called and he refused to give back any portion of our $800. They were insulted and became angry, rude, and defensive. because we said we did not feel safe there. They offered nothing. They stated quickly and firmly that the reservation was guaranteed. One hour...this is just a terrible way to do business. There are numerous very nice B B's in Galveston in the beautiful historic district with really good host that run them. I hope you find one of those.
Nt worth to visit...
This place blows unless your into your parents music (70 & 80 MUSIC)
Worst service ever and not a good menu. Worst experience ever. If you go just sit at the bar and get drunk.
I wont say that food was too good, but not bad either. 2 stars for that. But the Service was pathetic. One waiter takes order from me. No action in 10 minutes. Another waiter comes and I repeat my order. He goes invisible for the next 10 minutes. A third waiter comes and serves finally in another 5 minutes. I could see people leaving from at least 2 tables in this time as they were not timely served. I had ordered fish curry meals . Once the meals and the veg curries were served, there was no sign of anyone. I finally got my fish curry when I had completed my meals almost 90 percent. Had to wait for another 10 minutes for a waiter to come and serve me some meals to taste that curry. No side dishes were served the second time. When I was done nobody gave me a bill even. I asked the guy in the counter, what was this all about. He said its a new management. So I think the 2 comments below were for the old management. For the new one , my rating is 0 out of 5.
The people there have always treated me nice, and did what they could to help me, but I do NOT recommend going there if you need an X-Ray/CT scan... any kind of imaging. I did some digging and came to the conclusion that there is a wide range to the potential cost of a CT scan depending on where you go, and NMH is on the high end of that range. The next time I need imaging, I'll be trying Housatonic Valley Radiological Association 2 miles away, because NMH billing is outrageous. It can literally be the difference between hundreds of dollars and THOUSANDS of dollars.
I have never experienced such unprofessional service from a healthcare professionals office I've ever seen. The doctor himself was decent, however not one time was I ever greeted in a friendly or even civil manner via phone or in person. The staff was scantily clad in very unprofessional clothing during my weekday visit. When I tried to call in to pay my statement balance, Crystal tried taking my CC info without even pulling up my account and verbally attacked me for questioning as to how she was going to apply the payment to my account if she didn't even know what account I was paying!! I will never go back to this doctor based soley on his staff.
This place is a joke. First, we were all excited about coming here with our boys to bowl and it started off with disappointment and confusion. We were assigned to a lane and had to change lanes because a group was coming in. They didn't show up while we were there. Then the group next to us was not reprimanded by the staff for standing in our lane, bumping into us, dropping food on our lane and trying to hit our pins. Then we tried to order food twice and the lady behind the counter was too busy to deal with us. I'm glad stars and strikes is opening soon and pray for improvement. Very much not happy. Such a shame.
Thought the car was too good to be true....... three months later...it was. I'm getting ahead of myself. Found AutoTrek through my credit union and decided to take a look at what the had online. I found something I liked so I talke to someone about it. She seemed enthusiastic for me to come check it out but as soon as I got down there and she saw that I am young (20's) she immediately started grilling me about money before I even had a chance to take a good look at the car and continued until she saw my credit score and my co-signers yearly income. Despite her rudeness I bought the car along with an extended warranty (big mistake). Here I am 3 months later facing $1200.00 to fix this so called "clean" car which by the way had a quarter tank of gas and dirty carpet when the gave it to me. Turns out first extended warranty only covers things if they are completely broke and do not work at all which apparently does not cover worn out breaks or a bad battery. Long story short; THEY SOLD ME A LEMON!!!!!!
Although good enough, the rooms were not plush, the en suite was stark, the bar was closed so no food and the staff were rude on checkout. Also don't use their parking permit as you'll still get a ticket.
I have never had such a bad experience with a company. The first day I went in there it took him 30 minutes to even acknowledge that I was standing in the store because he was helping another customer. Then i put my laptop in for repair {the outlet where you charge the computer was broken...something I got fixed later for $57 at another shop} The owner informed me that he would look up the part and call me within 48 hours to tell me how much it will be for me to approve. I never heard anything else from him. FOUR MONTHS later I finally had to sit in front of his shop and wait for him to come to work, I sat there for THREE DAYS just to get my broken laptop back. NEVER ANSWERED PHONE CALLS, NEVER RESPONDED BACK TO PHONE CALLS. I even tried to press charges and the cop told me there was nothing he could do. DO NOT GO THERE! CUSTOMER SERVICE IS TERRIBLE.
Me siento muy descontento con el trato, la poca profesionalidad y los problemas que me han supuesto intentar comprar un artículo en uno de sus almacenes Leroy Merlin, en concreto, el de Alcalá de Guadaira (sección barbacoas). Falta a los compromisos de tiempo, ninguna solución acorde a los problemas planteados y timos incluidos en el transporte (aconsejo a todo el mundo que abra todos los paquetes antes de que el camión se marche o perderá la oportunidad de descambiarlo) Un cordial saludo
Nice beer and drink selection, little on the spendy side. Stopped in tonight for a beer with some friends. The bouncer at the front door scans all of our id's. I ask Mr. Bouncer why and he says it is a law enforcement issue. I am 56 and look every day my age. I find out a few minutes later it is only so the management can do target advertising and run analytic's for marketing purposes. We paid our bill and left along with about 15 other people..We went over to Dooley's for a couple hours. I wonder if they (the Management) can analysis that ... Will not be back.
They were alright, not the best in business by far. Kind of scroungy!
DON'T TRY & PARTNER WITH THIS ORGANIZATION. Instead of a reasonable approach to partnering with others in the non-profit world, they take every opportunity to undercut help for the grief and poverty stricken to serve their own ends. The husband and wife team rules this organization with no forgiveness and little patience, so certain of their own decisions that other ideas are not heard.
Horrible Dealership. Once you buy the car, say farewell to any courtesy. They sold me a CPO with a false autocheck report. I believed the report they gave me, and bought the car. A month later i had another dealer run the report for me, and turns out the car was in an accident 2 weeks before they sold it to me. Oops, looks like they failed to mention that. I called multiple times to the dealership, and emailed. The one time i get a response, they act like an accident is nothing. I finally got a manager named "Link" on the phone. I told him it depreciates the value of the car, and his response was "no it doesn't, I've sold hundreds of car. The value doesn't depreciate." Really Link? Having an accident doesn't depreciate the value of the car? When I asked him why they didn't tell me, he said "it was not on the Autocheck and as long as we have the car in good condition and fix any problems, we are not obligated to tell you anything" Yeah, I guess if you print the report before Autocheck knows about it, Its ok. Yeah, that bad. This is what this dealership does. You would think a professional BMW dealership would sell a 2009 CPO car in good faith, but nope. Never trust this dealer. Never trust Global Imports. Since this is a Sonic automotive dealership, and they allow something like this to happen, I guess you should never trust a Sonic Automotive Dealership. Completely Rediculous. Going to contact BMW USA to let them know about this kind of scam and there "reputable dealer"
No drainage system. No Roads .
As many reviews have stated, I was very surprised by all of the low reviews on Homemakers. In the last year, I've spent a lot of money on new furniture pieces and had fairly good service up to this point. However, two months ago in June, I placed an order for a bedroom and living room set. Delivery was two weeks ago and we got everything except for one night stand. We called Homemakers Customer Service and were told that they were rush processing it and would deliver it for free two weeks later. Two weeks have passed and we have not heard anything. So I called the Customer Service Department again and was forwarded onto the Merchandise Department. I called at 4:55pm and sat on hold for 10 minutes before it finally went to an answering machine said that the Department closes at 5:30pm. I looked at the clock and it was 5:05pm. I don't know about you, but I certainly cannot leave my job 25 minutes early. So I hung up and called again and asked the Customer Service rep to check into the issue for me since there were no Customer Service or Merchandise Managers there. The first Customer service representative told me that it would probably be later October before we would receive our night stand. I'll do the math for you, that would be 5 1/2 months to receive a night stand that was supposedly in stock the day we ordered it. I asked to talk to whoever was highest up the food chain in the store that could give me some kind of answer. I was forwarded on and talked to another Representative that told me that she really didn't have an answer for how long it would take. After explaining that I was starting to feel frustrated by this situation, the lady on the phone actually started laughing about it on the phone as she supposedly was taking down a message to have someone contact me in the morning. So to update on the situation, I've called twice and left two messages with the Merchandise Department. I've called and left two messages with the Customer Service Reps to have a Manager contact me. I've sent an email through their website "Contact Us" tab. All of which has been unanswered. As of right now I've also contacted the Iowa Consumer Protection Agency and will be making a contact to a consumer protection lawyer if a positive answer is not given to me tomorrow. I will be going into the store tomorrow after work to talk with someone. Like I said, this is the first time I've ever had this kind of trouble with Homemakers, but it has been the worst experience I've ever had with a company. All I really want is a straight answer of when my night stand is going to be delivered. If the item is discontinued then just give me my money back. It's that simple. As others have said, in the future the only way I'm buying from them again is if I can physically take it the day I order it.
When we first looked into Uberdog, it seemed like a great deal; four private lessons and a lifetime of group lessons for a flat fee of $1075. We met both trainers briefly and they seemed competent and knowledgeable. During the private lessons, which ranged from 30 – 60 minutes each, we learned basic commands and how to use a shock collar. As instructed, we practiced with our dog several times a day for about five minutes. In short, the private lessons were adequate. We were instructed to start group classes and that is when things became disappointing. Our particular pooch is super excitable with other dogs and people. Our first group lesson was just okay. Other class members worked on the place command and we struggled to keep our dog under control among so many other people and animals. At one point a frustrated trainer told me I needed to handle him better. At that same time, the other trainer was making off-handed remarks about my children being a distraction (we had confirmed they could come to lessons before we signed the contract). The second class was horrible. I went alone because my husband was refused to go back. With around 15 other dogs present I found myself totally overwhelmed. My dog was so excited he would not listen to voice commands and the shock collar was useless. To top things off, by their words and actions I felt the trainers were annoyed with me, as though I was the cause of the crazed puppy at the end of the leash. What I didn’t feel was the lifetime support they offer, or any clear direction in how to handle my dog when what they had taught me clearly wasn’t working. I ultimately left in frustration before the class even started. We will continue to work with our dog using what we learned in the private lessons. And we have identified resources at Petsmart to help us with socialization in a small, controlled environment. But I am doubtful that I will return to an Uberdog group class (my husband certainly will not); they are too big and I didn’t feel we had enough guidance. Before signing with Uberdog I highly recommend you consider how you and your dog will do in the large group classes because that is what you are really paying for. If you factor out the group classes, we spent roughly $268 for each of the 4 private lessons. I could have spent $109 for 6 weeks’ worth of classes at Petsmart, learned the exact same commands, and would be in the same place I am today…only $966 richer.
When I first went to Meadows Chiropractic Center - I was impressed by the depth of knowledge the Meadows team had. However, what I was not impressed by was the treatment of their employees. Even when I slipped in to meet with a friend for Lunch and not the appointment I had there, it was obvious that the employees working for the Meadows' were treated neither with respect nor courtesy. The tension was thick and apparent. Regularly scheduling employees for weekend events, consecutive work weeks, not comping them for transportation or for the extra hours, bullying them when they resist, and so many other things violated an employee's basic rights as far as any labor board is concerned. The fact that they fired a friend of mine, a mutual employee who used social media as an emergency, as one of our mutual friends killed themselves, is unthinkable. If you want great chiropractic treatment - then by all means go there. This is not a mark against their abilities as practitioners of chiropractic medicine. They know their stuff. But if you want to support a business that treats their employees fairly? This is not the place to go.
Went last week (June 30th ish) in the drive thru to wait and wait.... drove up to the window, nobody there. Then a female worker holding her kid in her arms go through the kitchen to get the headset to tell people they are closed.... needless to say i only assumed they were shorthanded for the night,. Now fast forward to July 7th, I give them another try... the automated system tells me that they are unable to take orders... overnight crew needs to be trustworthy or at least take down the 24 hour sign
Well gosh, had I known that the company I hired, North Park Storage and Transfer, sub-contracted these guys, especially after seeing these awful reviews, I NEVER EVER in a million years would have used the service. NIGHTMARE, NIGHTMARE, NIGHTMARE! If you are thinking of using these guys, run as far away as you can! Now, I am new to google reviews, however if you take a look at my Yelp review history, you will see that I am pretty fair, and if anything love to rave about the good reviews because there are so few companies that get to hear all the good feedback. It's always the negative you hear. Well my experience with Stevens Worldwide Vanlines was as horrible as it gets!!!! So here is my horrific experience. To summarize briefly, we signed a contract with North Park Storage and Transfer, who subcontracted Stevens Vanlines, to move our items from San Diego, CA to Hood River, OR. Several totes and a suitcase were missing when Stevens Vanlines delivered our items. Additionally, our motorcycle and several pieces of furniture were damaged. We waited several weeks for the office manager of North Park Storage and Transfer to email us the Claims Form on behalf of Stevens Vanlines. We submitted the claims form promptly. Months went by with no word from either North Park Storage and Transfer or Stevens Vanlines until I received a call from my personal storage unit manager informing me that he received mail from Stevens Vanlines and forwarded it to me. This mail informed us that we owed Stevens Vanlines money, claiming the motorcycle required an additional fee. We immediately called Stevens Vanlines to establish some communication, leaving several messages with no call back for the first week. Finally, a lady at the office informed me the claim had been processed and a check would be sent. We submitted a claim for about $7,500 and received a check for $347.51. At this point we are beyond infuriated for several reasons. Directly concerning your Stevens Vanlines are the following: 1. Communication was not only weak, but nearly non-existent in this case. 2. We never authorized either company to send personal mail to our storage unit address. 3. After both companies had not heard from us, no actions were taken to simply backtrack the paperwork and call either my husband or myself. When a client pays several thousands of dollars for your service, it SHOULD be safe to assume you have our numbers on file. 4. The additional fee they charged was completely unacceptable as we were quoted on our move based on the exact height, weight, make and model of the motorcycle, so there was no room for error on our side, and should either Stevens Vanlines of North Park Storage and Transfer have misquoted, that was their mistake to deals with, not ours. Even more importantly, neither of the companies had the right to assume it appropriate to take that fee from the insurance money granted. 5. When we called Stevens Vanlines to dispute the insurance settlement, we were informed you had no record of the Customer Check Off Sheet that we signed off from your drivers upon arrival of most of our items. 6. Stevens Vanlines services were hired on our behalf through North Park Storage and Transfer to simply move our items from one place to another and that was unsuccessful with lost and damaged items. We submitted a claim for about $7,500 and received a check for $347.51. We aren't even remotely close to being satisfied with this settlement. In addition to the cost of our physical losses, we have lost a great deal of time in trying to remedy this situation. WHAT A NIGHTMARE! These guys are thieves and horrific business men. Their staff are useless. I honestly do not understand how these guys are in business.
My partner and I had lunch here. I ordered a chicken ranch burger. Burger was nice, but needed more ranch sauce. Huge in size. Chips that came with it were soggy and tasteless. Partner got battered fish and chips. Fish was soggy and unpleasant. Chips were also soggy. Atmosphere is nice though. Food should have been of better standard.
Fat city. Steak was fatty and they lost the whole thing in a pool of lemon butter. Great service and friendly staff. I' m just hoping I make it home without having a heart attack.
Stopped two nights in a row and they were closed well before advertised. Tonight we walked in and they said we had to close because there weren't enough people. Come earlier next time he says. There won't be a next time!
None
I found a car online at Midlands Honda and spent several days in discussions with various salesmen about the price and condition. I was assured that it was in great condition besides some minor scuffing on the rear bumper. I drove two hours from Charleston to buy the car and when I arrived I immediately saw that the bumper had been knocked out of alignment and was dented, and there were scratches all over the interior and exterior of the car. The man who gave me the test drive kept remarking on the poor quality of the car and said we shouldn't buy it. They were unwilling to take more than $60 off the price despite the damage and they refused to fix it. Overall, everyone we met there had a disrespectful, dishonest attitude and I won't be going back.
Saturday day night out for dinner. Wait time was about 15 min. Server was probably having a bad day and treated us with a horrible attitude. All food was very cold and dry. Very disappointed.
This place was awful. Even if it is your last resort, don't stay here. We stayed in a 21-person dorm room with tiny beds, there were no lockers to store our belongings, and I'm terrified that I'm going to have bed bugs. There was no hot water in the showers, everything was filthy, and one morning all the bathrooms were closed because the toilets were clogged. It was awful, and we left as soon as we could.
Customer service is an example of all the things to be sure not to do. Phoning for a reservation is always an exercise in restaurant-arrogance. Experience is always pretentious. Food is meh.
We arrived at Fairfield Inn around 9:30pm. When we entered the room we noticed towels on the floor. Upon further inspection the bed was not made and trash was not emptied. We had to return to the lobby and was told the room had not been cleaned, needless to say this left a very bad impression on us. We were given different rooms and checked out the next day, Manager on duty was apologetic. The breakfast the next morning left a lot to the imagination, one of worst I have seen. Upon returning home I realized I left a sweater in the room. While I know this was my mistake the way the Manager ( Christi Gadd) handled it was poor. I called the hotel around 8:00am explained my dilemma hoping to find the sweater. I was told I would receive a call back shortly. I finally had to call the hotel and spoke to a front desk person who put me on hold returned and said they could not find the sweater. Very poor customer service all the way around.
This is a hospital full of young, inexperienced, wanna be veterinarians. All they do is overcharge and provide no results. My first time there, I came in because my terrier showed signs of cataract, but the female, under 35 year old, vet told me that they didn't teach her about cataract in school and therefore we need to go to a specialist. She did, however, charged us $90 for the visit. We then went to Alton Road Animal Hospital, and when I told them what she had said, they just laughed and said that she needs to go back to school and stop missing classes. The second time we went there (because it was the only place open at 7 pm) was because my dog had signs of liver disease...drinking too much and eating very little. The vet, another under 35, told us that in order to determine what is the cause, he would need to do an extensive set of blood work ($300) which we agreed to since we wanted to know what was wrong with her. Well, when he finally looked at the results, he said that it might be the liver but the only way to know is by doing an ultrasound (another $300-$400). At that point we knew that he has no clue what he was doing and its time to head back to Alton Road Animal Hospital again. Bottom line, they have no clue and I don't think they care about the animals. There are plenty of Veterinarians out there that will help you and have years of experience. Good luck to all!!!
UPDATE! 8/10/2012 Just got a phone call from a woman claiming to be the "owner" of Babbit Motor Werks, on a Friday night at 7pm. She wanted to talk to me about my review that she said I had just posted. I wrote the review approximately 2 months ago. She stated that I had "taken their coil that was installed into my vehicle. And this was done without my knowledge or it being authorized. I took my vehicle in to BMw. for an estimate. I still have my original estimate that does not indicate that they ever installed anything in my car. The did NOT have permission to do anything to my car. She claimed that I have "their" property in my car, and then threatened to sick a lawyer on me. I told her to go right ahead because I will counter-sue. These people are as crooked as the day is long and hot. I will update this review when I recieve mail with an attorney's name on it, or a PUBLIC APOLOGY FROM THIS "OWNER". BUYER BEWARE! DO NOT DO BUSINESS HERE!! This is my opinion. Thanks for sealing your own fate on this one, BMw! I took my 1995 BMW 525i into Babbits for an oil change, and asked them to give it a look over with some specifice areas to check. I ended up having to get a rental car because this took all day. The next day I took my rental car back and picked my car up, I was facing a $1300.00 bill. The specifics were: New radiator (cap extra), new starter, 1 new coil (spark plug mounted), some work to my sticky ignition. Well, after a couple of days of dreading spending that much money, I was looking to do the work myself. I had an issue with the car sputtering when on the freeway and trying to pass someone, or go up a hill, the car would vibrate badly. This, they said was due to a bad #4 coil that needed replacement. After leaving their shop, the car ran better than it ever had. They did NO work to it, just happened to plug the coil in properly and it solved that issue! Saved me $182.00! Thanks! The next issue was the radiator that they said was "BAD RADIATOR AND EXPANSION TANK. CAP DOESN'T SEAL CORRECTLY AND RADIATOR IS SOME OFF BRAND". Well, they were right. The cap didn't seal properly. They wanted to charge me $480.00 to put a new radiator, and the cap is extra, plus fluid. Well, I went to Autozone and purchased a new cap that FIT CORRECTLY, AND SEALED THE SYSTEM. All for $18.00. That fixed that problem for less thank $20.00. That is either highway robbery at it's finest, or they have some very poor mechanics. Either way, I will never set foot in their shop again. First impressions are lasting impressions. I told Eric the moment I walked in there, that I read REVIEWS ON GOOGLE, and I would be posting my own review and this was their chance to shine and make a customer happy and get good reviews and more business. We know how that turned out because you are reading this. STAY AWAY FROM BABBITT MOTOR WERKS. In some cases, the STEALERSHIP is worth it. But buy yourself a Bentley manual and do the work yourself. BMW's are not as intimidating as you think. Thanks for reading and save yourself A LOT OF MONEY, DO NOT GO HERE!!!
None
This is NOT where this is. It's at Banda Gate on Magadi Road.
فااااشل بالنسبة لإسمه وقديم ومتهالك والتكييف سيئ ولا يوجد رسيفر ولا سجادة صلاة ورائحة الفرش طالعه
None
I ordered the angel hair pasta and sauce and was less than desireable. I got a quart full of pasta and about a 1/2 cup of sauce! The bread was a greasy load of mess and the salad was soggy and inedible. A mishmash of awfulness. Needless to say, I won't be going back to Mama's Italian Cuisine.
;)
None
Charges .45 cents on credit even though its against the law.
I have been charged 3 times in the past 3 months after I cancelled my membership (back in June) due to a relocation. I called ABC (the company that bills you automatically every month) - it turns out I had a membership renewed under a different name. My name was spelled K-U-T-H-E-N-R-I-T-E-R. Who spells their name wrong? Not me. [EDIT (11/13/2013): The owner resolved my dispute by sending me a check for two months payment - I paid my $50 fee. Basically, I was right; they were wrong. That should have closed the deal. Instead, I have been charged another month's dues (2 months after submitting cancellation paperwork). Very Annoyed...] I am being charged 3 months of dues AND the $50 relocation cancellation fee because it appears someone punched my name in wrong when my account was renewed. The facilities are clean. Services are acceptable. Equipment is nice and respected by members. Very poor business practices, IMO. I'll pay these fees, but I'm not sure I will accept doing so.
It doesn't exists anymore
Cafe Osage WAS my favorite breakfast spot in St. Louis. My fiancé and I drove a long way to get there this morning for breakfast and were turned away because we were 2 minutes late. LITERALLY TWO MINUTES PAST WHEN THEY STOP SERVING BREAKFAST. We arrived at 10:32am on a Saturday. They stop serving at 10:30. We tried to explain we came a long way to have breakfast... we offered to order before they seated us... they simply said no. We even spoke to what seemed to be the manager but she had no sympathy. It is extremely disappointing to have such TERRIBLE customer service from one of our favorite places.
went through the drive thru, painfully slow. ordered 6 chicken nuggets for myself, a fish burger for the wife and a hot dog for our 5 year old son, and an order of fries and gravy. My Chicken nuggets were over cooked , how do you screw up nuggets? our sons hot dog also over cooked and gross, I never seen this boy not finish a hot dog until today. The wives fish burger looked so gross and was truly inedible. this was truly the worst restaurant experience we have ever had. would never ever go back to this dump ever
BARC stole my puppy and wants me to pay DOUBLE ADOPTION fees to retrieve the puppy that was stolen on my property!! Why would I adopt a puppy that belonged to me and was stolen right out-of my front yard? Has this happened to anyone else before?
We had called on the phone for a car an the lady said they will have it out by the time we got there so we drove over an hour an when we got there they could not find the keys or the car an turns out a lady had took it home for the day....
None
Let me first say that I am a fan of Jimmy Johns. I enjoy there subs and have always enjoyed there food, but I've been into this Round Rock store twice now, and both times the bread was HARD, HARD, and the staff there were rude. I would stay away from this store if you know what's good for you!!!! Joyce
The only cinema in the area, gets away with charging a fortune for tickets and having uncomfortable seats. If there was a Vue or Cineworld in Taunton, this place would go bust in a week.
I agree with the one star review before me. Our family went to this church for about 5 months as well. I really did like the services. They offer good classes/groups. I really wanted to to get to know the people there, but I too, didn't feel completely accepted and welcomed there. I walked up to some of the members at different times to try to have a conversation, but for some reason they perceived it differently. I am the nicest person you could ever meet. Usually I am nicer to people than they are to me. Unfortunately no one wanted to talk to me and get to know me there. I felt awkward, out of place and that made me upset, so we left. Maybe it's me, but I didn't feel like I fit in at all at Discovery. At times they would put pressure on tithing. Discovery Church isn't for everyone. It definitely wasn't the church for us. You may enjoy Discovery, and feel at home here. Anyway, the church is okay, It's not bad, although in my opinion I feel they need to make some changes and improvements.
Black. Friday. Walmart started sales 1 1/2 Hours Early!
Odd setup.
To Whom It May Concern, I moved from Columbus, Georgia about 6 months ago back to the City Of Asheboro, North Carolina so I could be near my four kids. We moved into a rental property that J & S Wholesale & Rentals owns at: 110 Atlantic Ave., Asheboro, NC 27205. This is a very old rental house that needs alot of work done to it by the owner. He needs to have all the windows in this house taken out and replaced with the newer windows after he paints it and put installation in the walls so the house can be warmer in the Fall & Winter. It needs work done to the wooden porch and wooden steps. The garage area needs to be completely redone. My husband and I only had to pay $295.00 a month and we had to pay our own utilities. We wasn't too happy with living in this old rental house at all because my husband is on disability and he couldn't afford to fix it up at all! My personal advise to anyone that wants to rent from J & S Wholesale & Rentals you need to make sure you check out their rental properties real good before you decide to sign a rental lease agreement with them because they will not fix everything you want them to fix while you are renting from them. I wouldn't definitely not recommend you to rent this rental property from them, until this old rental house has been completely remodeled because it definitely needs alot of work done to it to be a safe place to live and it needs alot of electricial work done to it upstairs and downstairs does. We recently just moved from it in January 2013 because it's too cold right now to live in it.
DON'T' USE
We ordered delivery for first time, they told us 16mins, it took 2hours and 3 phone calls. The food was nothing special, small sushi pieces and overpriced. It was the last time for us.
This LA Fitness, provides only the basics any gym provides and there has been no attempt in my 2 years as a member to provide a clean, well maintained and organized gym facility. I am a tradesperson and as the weeks go by no attempts to repair basic small damages or keep a regular detailed cleaning schedule has occurred. No soap in dispensers, dirty paper towels all over the facility, weight plates strewn across the gym on the floors (first thing in the morning!), old shoes and clothes rotting in the changerooms for weeks. Really not up to par. Water fountains have gone unrepaired for months and equipment stays damaged for weeks. Sinks are filthy, lockers broken, toilets are disgusting Poor management, not recommended at all. They really need to shape up, worst gym I've encountered yet.
Go to any other 24hr. This one is way overcrowded and always has broken or missing equipment. To top it off, the whole place smells like feet and has awful ventilation. Who wants to wait a half hour or more for the privilege of using the only 20lb free weights to be found in the whole place? Or maybe stand in line for 20+ min to be able to run in place like a rat in a sauna?
My review of the McDonalds Local in my area...people like having a glass of water and to rest before they decide to order. When I went there the manager said to me with an evil eye that they were going to make people buy something first before giving water... In my country U.S. It is customary to give customers' water so that they can rest before deciding to order and if they decide not to order and leave that's the way it is. Since wifi is at McDonald we like ordering water and resting before we decide to buy anything. Usually I buy something like ice cream etc. but after I have rested. And that I should buy something before I rest is outrageous.. Internet age is here with educated people.. The U.S. is not a fool's market where there is no rest....if you want fast food go back to the Sonic Driven Inn of the 70s (70's thats when fast food was great in the U.S.) Why do we rest and get water before to buy something ...it's to rest and to avoid the gimmicks if there are any on the menu and to check out the surrounding and go to the restroom.
I was not impressed at all. We went on Thanksgiving and to start the prices were substantially higher than what was listed on the Thanksgiving menu posted on their website. The food was mediocre at best and ridiculously overpriced. Atmosphere and service were OK. I know many much better restaurants that charge a fraction of The Fort prices.
The sales & finance team are top notch at Universal Ford. Unfortunately, the quality of work by the service department is the worst we ever experience. After giving them three chances, we asked for our money back for the gold card we purchased and are in the process of looking for a new garage. Don't get disappointed like we were. Purchase your vehicle here but do yourself a favour, have your service done elsewhere.
None
Drinks were very good, but I was appalled by the service I received. Homophobic, overcrowded, and rude. If you are looking for a friendly and appreciative bar, please look elsewhere. I stepped outside for a quick chat and a breath of fresh air after a drink, and upon reentering, I was met with a forceful shove from the bouncer. He exclaimed that there were others waiting before me to enter the bar.....after I had already been in...I expressed this to the bouncer, who reinstated what he had already said.... I began to reevaluate this logic, but came up empty handed. Upon waiting for the others to reenter, I was met with homophobic slurs by the bouncer and the patrons outside. I know this is the Marina, who, already has a bad reputation with seemingly and/or declared gay clientelle, but the STAFF?! I would never wish this experience upon anyone who simply wishes to have a nice time at casual bar.
Aucune considération pour le client, esprit motard absent. je déconseille vivement.
I have never had a HORRIBLE experience with a car dealership like Miller Infinty in Sherman Oaks. We leased a brand new Infinty form them in May 2012. The first problem started that month we started having engine problems and we will losing so much oil, oil leaked all over my driveway. I took them 2 weeks to fix the problem and they said that they would pay for the repairs on the driveway and they never did. Since then I have taken the car numerous amounts of times for repairs. The last straw was when we took our car for an oil change and for them to fix our DVD/CD player (yet another problem) They couldn't fix the DVD/CD player they had to order a new one. It's 2 months later and numerous amounts of phone calls and messages to both the auto repair shop and the manager and still the problem is not fixed. We have 3 small children so you can imagine how fun it is to be in a car with them and the DVD player doesn't work. I DO NOT RECOMMEND EVER GETTING A CAR FROM INFINTY ESPECIALLY MILLER INFINTY. The worst car and customer service we have ever experienced!!!!!
The only thing worse than the food is the service. It's a crappy bar with bad food and even worse service. I guess that's suppose to be part of the charm. At least the beer is cheep sometimes.
Permanently Closed 4-22-13
If you are in the need of VERY BASIC chinese food done well come here. The food is done well, but don't come expecting variety. On several occaisons I've tried to ordered healthier options such as vegetable white rice, or brown rice, and they don't have that. I've tried to take out the alter my order with something simple such as taking peanuts out of my kung pao (because they OVER LOADED IT with nuts the last time I ordered it. I'm talking 60% nuts to 40% everything else) and they simply overloaded it with celery. These guys are ALRIGHT depending on what you order, but if you attempt to order something different or healthy with a good food ratio? Don't think about it. But if you just want a good plate of General Tao with some fried rice, go ahead they are good for it.
If you miss being treated like a child, the Axiom is a perfect place for you. My wife and I moved into the Axiom because we appreciated the management's lax approach to needless "rules," which seemed overabundant in other D.C. apartment buildings. And besides the astronomical prices, our first year living here was pleasant enough. Unfortunately, a company called Bozzuto recently purchased the building and is ruining everything that was once great about the Axiom. Now no one is allowed to use the pool after 9 PM (despite the fact that this is where the grills are located and many of us eat dinner after 9 PM); no more than 50 people are allowed on the roof at once (despite hundreds, if not thousands, living in the building); tenants are forced to wear ridiculous bracelets whenever going onto the roof; tenants are only permitted one guest per apartment (last summer my wife and I often had over another couple, this year we're forced to choose just one of them to visit at a time); and all of these rules are enforced under the watchful eyes of a rent-a-cop. Most establishments reward loyalty, but at the Axiom, rents skyrocket after living in the building for more than a year. This is probably why the building is struggling to maintain its occupancy. That and the surrounding environs lack everything you would want in a neighborhood (unless everything you want is a baseball stadium). The people who live in the Axiom are living here because of its amenities. Unfortunately, the new management company is stripping away these amenities without any reduction in rent or any improvements elsewhere. For instance: the treadmill in the gym is eternally broken, at least one grill is always out of gas, and the elevators are unreliable at best. Unless and until Bozzuto changes its new rules regime, definitely look to live elsewhere.
don't live here...no storage space..constant construction...banging and noise all day long. My baby can't sleep. I'm moving.
Food good. But have to wait for hours (nearly 2hrs) to get ur table. Worst service. Not responding well. No waiting area. While u go inside then last order only.
Competitive pricing. However, The movers worked slow(i was taking items down as well and made at least two trips to their one), damaged furniture and the claims department does not respond to emails or calls. I WOULD NOT recommend this company. Upon finally getting in touch with the claims department they told me to send via certified mail a couple of documents. I did so which cost me $12.50 to mail and was never contacted by the company. I also left multiple messages both voice and email and never received a response. The claim is still open and has never been resolved and I don't anticipate it ever being resolved based on the poor customer service they have displayed.
Ordered our meal At 5pm for 8pm and was late after 2nd phone call it arrived 30mins late. Meal was cooked within an inch of its life over done and chips were far from fresh I have used this chip shop before it was ok what has happened is there a new fish fryer ? my meal was sadly uneatable rotten chips and cremated fish a bugger supper that was stootin.. Guess it could have been an off night but really we do deserve better. No more disasters like I just had waste of money only fit for bin
Watch out for the kids
Not right #
Nationwide ACS does not pay its contractors. I'm waiting to get paid for a job from April. Do not use them or work for them.
Big disappointment. I gave it 2 chances. Very expensive for this experience. Several plates were just ok and certainly not good enough for the $$$. Service was inconsistent but always friendly. Lacks the umph!
None
Company cold called me. They were very rude and would not tell me where they got my contact information. They would not give me their supervisor's phone number. Super rude, I wouldn't trust them to do business with.
None
BSC Elopada Sumba Barat Daya
PRICE GOUGING AT IT's WORST! Seriously, these guys are charging 2 to 3 times as much as anyone else for ammo. Yes, they probably have what you're looking for in stock, but bring your first-born male child and your mortgage...you'll need both! EXAMPLE: 500 round box of Remington Thunderbolt (bulk) 22LR = $180!!!!
The service was extremely poor and the staff and management was rude. I wouldn't go back. Also, the place was almost dead.
If there was a rating on here less than poor, that is what I would have given them. I purchased a 1997 Audi A8 Quattro and within a week, the window motor went out and it sprang an oil leak. After a lot of fighting and waiting around their office, they reluctantly agreed to fix my window motor but would not fix the oil leak, even though it was still under warranty. Upon recieving my car back after the window motor replacement, i found out that my electronic locks on my door did not work because the mechanic they use had messed it up during the installation of the motor. I have now owned it for a little over 4 months and now the car has a misfire as well. After deciding I would give them another chance, I took my fiance in for a purchase of a car and every car on the lot had multiple things wrong with them and they wanted atleast $1,500 over KBB value and very high interest rates on loans. I WOULD STAY FAAAAAAAAAAARRRRRRRRRRR AWAY FROM THIS PLACE. The owner (Thomas) is very sneaky, pushy, & dishonest. Don't say I didnt warn you!
Innanzitutto con il biglietto d'ingresso non certo regalato mi pare da pezzenti chiedere 5 euro per il parcheggio. Come parco forse non è male per i ragazzi dai 15 anni in su a cui piacciono le giostre "serie", ma è deludente per i bambini più piccoli. Praticamente tutto vietato a chi ha meno di tre anni o sotto i 90 cm d'altezza. Per i bimbi così piccoli mica serve un rollercoaster da 5 milioni di euro, bastano giostre o attrazioni semplici e "povere", insomma basterebbe poco a migliorare. Gardaland è sicuramente migliore .
We were leery about staying here based upon bed bug review. We called corporate and the hotel to ensure any pest infestation was cleared up. Hotel assured us all was well. We checked out room before we paid and found no evidence of any bed bugs. Were it not for Clarion Rewards, we would have skipped this place altogether. The night clerk could barely speak English and was very surly. The hall and elevator carpet was filthy. Beds were not comfortable. The breakfast was extremely subpar and we had to go beg the same surly clerk for syrup for the waffles. For the price paid, this hotel is nowhere near worth it. I would expect this type of accomodations from a $50 or less hotel. Everyone we spoke to in the morning around the so-called breakfast expressed the same displeasure with their stay.
The greeting was bad at the walk-in. I ordered the grilled octopus plate and my date ordered the chicken. My plate was served with overcooked canned vegetables, the grilled octopus was a sponge full of grease and the garden salad that I asked for with dressing on the side and didn't vet that way, was served with one half slice of tomato that they wouldn't have been able to serve tomorrow. A food bank would have given me fresher food! We ordered coffee that tasted great until the last mouthful. It was full of coffee grains so I was almost thankful to not have been offered a refill. Overall... I wish I had stayed home and cooked. 2 thumbs DOWN
My husband got serious food poisoning at this restaurant. The manager offered us a free meal, but we don't want to go back. The previous time we went there the service was very slow and my goat cheese salad arrived at the table with no goat cheese or dressing.
This is Vikash Villa
Like previous review this was a disgusting meal, arrived late and none was eaten. Used Just Eat so trying to get a refund. DO NOT USE
Not what I expect from Starwood at all... Smelly old rooms, decor boring and somewhat hospital like, my toilet wouldn't flush, phone was broken and no switch of room offered. not to mention they don't tell you there is no room service. i will not be staying here again.
Well Steve I'm sorry that you believe that your customer service skills are what make you stand out from the bigger stores but after my experience with you today… Jan 21, 2014.. I can understand why someone would be unhappy to pay more for a product and be insulted at the same time… After being your location 5 different times I really have had 5 different experiences.. 1. After first going in with my contractor (which you stated that your company likes to deal with contractors only not the homeowner especially not a women as obviously we don't know what we are doing or how to figure out square foot). along with my drawing of my project we placed a order and I took home a sample product to check against my stucco color….First guy was very good... 2. Came back a 2nd time to verify the product and pay and return the sample …. to find out they couldn't find my order so we had to start all over… but I did remember what I have previously ordered and even helped your salesperson figure it out as he didn't know how to do the add on of the top cap….Again dealing with the homeowner was obviously the issue….Told me I didn't have to pay until the product came in…Salesperson was nice but not very helpful... 3. Visit 3… wow what can say… they couldn't find my order but the product was there so they knew it had been ordered…. after about 20 mins… they finally found my order and I paid as... I was having a third party pick up the product... as I was leaving for vacation and wanted it to be onsite for the contractor… Your salesperson was very helpful and friendly 4. Visit 4… picked up the product... at no time did anyone suggest that I open each and every box to count all of the ledge stone but obviously should have according to you and if I had been the contractor I would have…(can't wait to call my contractor to find out if he picks up his orders and counts each and every piece of stone at the yard) Upon setting up for my contractor I realized we would need more corners because of an adjustment made by my contractor… I contacted you directly and told you my name and what my order was and that I would need one more box of which you took the information down and let me know that you had 15 boxes on hand to come right down and get one… Vist 5… again dealing with you directly I came down today to be informed by you that you had mistakenly told me you had the product when you didn't and that it was a special order which you knew and that it would take about 2 weeks to get the product in.. and when I informed you that some of the boxes appeared to be short and that I wouldn't have enough to cover 80 sq ft after looking at the pictures I brought in you informed me … it was because I must be working with a unlicensed contractor and he doing a tight stack and not doing a 1/4" space.. I again informed you that was the type of product that I had purchase that it supposed to be like that you informed me that yes you were mistaken and that it is supposed to be that way but again if I had bothered to check my product before I left…they could have made the adjustment then but now they had no way to verify what I was saying…. I ordered an extra box of product and had to leave your shop before I made a statement that I would be unladylike… but I will say that you are rude, insulting and totally unprofessional… and I prefer to not work with a company that has you Steve as a manager…… Over the last 20 years I have remodeled and flipped more than 17 homes … Have worked with hundreds of contractors, subs, electricians, handyman, gardeners and painters and truly never been insulted at least not to my face… So if it's customer service that you are banking on leave it up to your experience salespersons and you need to take a refresher course in CUSTOMER SERVICE… Shannon West- Greene
Couldn't get any customer service, was left to carry large bulky item out to car without any assistance. 1 star returned for nice lady at the counter who gave me a discount with two large purchases and seemed rather disappointed at other staff for not assisting me.
I was very disappointed as a business traveler. My trip was prepaid but when I checked out they charged me for resort fees which supposedly included internet and room coffee. I don’t drink the coffee and the internet at this hotel is not usable. I had to move rooms to get 2 bars of signal. When you call to complain about the internet the Sheraton pawns the problem off to a third party company who keeps you on the phone troubleshooting a problem they are well aware (just checkout the amount of reviews on this subject about this hotel) of for several hours. I do not recommend this hotel as a business traveler. There is lots of great competition in the area with working internet and no hidden fees, just do not go here and save your self frustration and you may get your work done.
I brought my vehicle in on June 13, 2013. I had to call and reschedule from my original date so I called that morning to confirm that my Living Social Coupon was valid. The woman who took that call assured me all was good. She made no mention of any other fees either on the phone or when I dropped my vehicle off. When I got to the location I handed her my coupon and they took my car back. When I came to pick up my vehicle the same woman who was there when I dropped it off told me I owed $90.00 on top of the coupon because my coupon was not valid since I changed my appointment. Now that coupon was for a service and not a gift certificate. I expected to receive that service that was listed on the coupon as I called ahead to make sure they would honor it. Again, they made no mention of any other fees being due when I dropped my vehicle off. I then e-mailed the manager and got a response back that the scheduler did indeed let me know that the coupon was not valid for the service I was having completed. I left pretty upset and will not be going back.
Horrible, terrible, awful customer service. I ordered wood flooring to be installed by Home Depot and it has been nothing but a nightmare since the minute they took my money. It has taken way longer than they told me it would take. They dropped the ball twice in contacting me to let me know about when the wood would be delivered -- it has to be there 3 days in advance of the install. They can't seem to find the number of the company that delivers the wood or installs it so I have to play the middle man for them. I don't go to Home Depot to do all the work for them -- I go so they can handle talking to their contractors and work out the details. I shouldn't have to do this. Never have them install anything as this store -- and Home Depot in general -- can't seem to manage its own contracted companies (I had the same problem when we had them install counter tops).
All of the 4 and 5 star reviews make me really skeptical. I had high hopes for this place, but have been very disappointed both times I've eaten here. The restaurant itself has a great aesthetic and environment. The bar looks really cool and they really put a lot of work into making the entire restaurant feel rustic and clean. The food, however, is BLAND. There's no way around it. Nobody in my group enjoyed the food either time I've visited, so I'm shocked that all 9 reviews so far are 4 and 5 stars. What am I missing? The fries are soft and have no seasoning/flavor, the mac n cheese is bland, the cornbread is far too sweet, etc. I hate to be so negative, but I'm mainly hoping the owners make the necessary improvements to really become a staple southern/bbq restaurant that can last on NW 23rd. I think the ribs, chicken, pulled pork are fine, not great, but overall the food is very underwhelming at this point. This place has a TON of potential, which is why I gave them a second chance recently. Unfortunately, the food was just as mediocre as the first time. The quality of their menu pales in comparison to Screen Door; However, this restaurant is a lot closer to where I live, so I'm rooting for Southland to pick up their game!
This is the worse sonic in the state. They can't get an order right, they never have onion rings, and it's a struggle to make an order, that you repeat several times and they still screw up. I called the district manager, he said he knew, that was a month ago. It's not fixed, but what is fixed is my visits to this store.
I use storage units a lot for my business. This facilities doors would not work properly and they would never fix. Even after repeated efforts telling them. I mean literally those punch button combo look doors like in college would not open...... all three doors on the whole side of the facility. Cheap Owners...shame..like you do not have a enough net revenue to provide a decent customer experience by fixing your doors!!! Jeezz...don't go here.
Mother's Day brunch was a disaster. Food only fair (most was cold) but the service was terrible. Long wait for food. Really tough for young kids. Very overpriced for what you got (I just saw the bill on my credit card statement - I didn't make the reservations). Even worse, they set the tip. I would have given nothing but my wife signed the ticket when I was outside (one of many trips killing time waiting for food etc.). I won't be back.
Service department is so frustrating. Get ready to wait. Scheduled appointment 3 wks in advance to have a routine seat belt recall done only to have them tell me they had to order the part. Came in a second time to find they had over-booked themselves, which meant I had to wait over 2 hours for a 45min service. So frustrating.
Jeg havde set frem til dette besøg, da de reklamerede med US steaks. Jeg bestilte en 220g bøf af filet til 239,- kr. Selv om jeg havde bestilt medium rare, fik jeg et stykke kød som var gennemstegt. Faktisk så meget at der var store brankede flader på det. Det smager altså ikke godt uanset om det kommer fra sten ovn eller grill pande. Jeg prøvede at forklare pigen der serverede at den var helt gal! Så hun tog min mad og forsvand ud i køkkenet. Kort efter kom hun tilbage med besked om at de ikke havde mere filet, men om jeg ville have noget andet? Burgeren blev afløseren. Jeg blev tilbudt en is, for ulejligheden. Jeg blev dog skuffet da jeg fik regning; Min just fortæret burger blev takseret som min bøf 239,- kr. Øv.
Brought Honda Van in for rear brake job quote. (change the pads and turn the rotors). Insisted on OEM pads. Shop Employee called me, and said they couldn't turn the rotors; and the cost for new OEM rotors and pads would be around $450. I declined the work, but they imposed a $46 fee for checking my brakes. Took van to Don Jacobs Honda. They turned the rotors and installed new pads for $250.
The Managers are horable there..Took a group of 80 people and the Managers are garbage with the service. I will never Tell my clients to go there again.
None
They sucks . The service is terrible have to ask for a refill . Never eat there again .
itna ghatia hotel jindgi me ni dekha
서비스 뭣같음. 전에 여기서 짬뽕먹다가 재료가 상한건지 두드러기나고 난리도 아니었음. 딴곳에선 짬뽕먹어도 멀쩡한데 여기서만 두드러기났음. 대박임. 제발좀 우리동네에서 사라졌으면.
Wtf why can't they get my meal right this has been happening since before I got a job here I've had it with them its bad enough that management sucks the best time to eat is when the Hispanic are working they always get the orders right and they don't leave the food in the rdy to serve trey until someone orders it and TINA T likes it because she a manager there Smh I got fired because I wouldn't let them talk to me crazy so they written me up for poor work performance if your not working the overnight crew or with the Hispanics you will hate working there too :-(
DHL lenteur oui !!! le plus mauvais transporteur, ne l'utilisez jamais, aucune communication, colis non livre, meme la poste est plus rapide qu'eux !
Nothing good to say about the place
Gần nhà của tôi
None
Hello Today's Mobile! Remember me?! I hope you do because I hope you you see this! It's the girl whose phone you screwed up! So this is the first time ever that I am writing a review and congrats to you guys! you got my virginity on posting a review! Aren't you guys glad you guys suck. First of all the quality of fixing my phone was fantastic which was I had to agree was a good appeal in quality since the first guy who helped me did everything perfectly in fixing my crappy tmobile phone's screen which I only fixed to get my contacts and important files (Thank you for that)---Its after that is when my series of events went down hill and worse. I asked if they also did contact phone transfers to my new phone which was why I got my old fixed in the first place. The new guys seemed hesitant to do it which, I should have trusted my instinct in my first place and gone to Metro (my new phone company to transfer my files) and what happened? They lost ALL my contacts that I had back from when I 18 yrs old! (I'm 24 now) Though they tried to fix the solution my contacts were gone. I tried to ask if there was any other solution to getting it fixed and said I was upset that this happened. I guess the fat balding middle-eastern dude tried to explain it was not their fault?! When I had and checked that my contacts where in there? AND he never once apologized and started yelling at me making me more flustered! Thanks a bunches easing my worries and not helping me find a solution and yelling at a girl! I just want to say thanks to original guy that fixed my phone and F*** you to the fat balding middle eastern dude and I will be spreading bad inputs about you particularly. Hope you guys enjoyed my review!
Shocking service. Took over 30 mins for our order to arrive and got our orders wrong several times
Apparently this company also goes by the name "Syracuse Airport Taxi." I called and reserved a taxi to take me to the airport and was told I was all set and I'd get a call when they were on their way. I never received a call and the taxi never showed up. Someone forgot to put my request into the system, so the taxi was never dispatched. I ended up missing my flight and when I called Blue Star Taxi, the same dispatcher answered, unknown to me. When the taxi arrived at my house, I received a call from Syracuse Airport Taxi informing me that the Blue Star Taxi was in my driveway. I guess there are now "two" taxi companies that I will not be using in Syracuse.
None
Great place if you like ugly women and bad service!
The Restaurant Aux Vieux Canons was recommended to us as a good French restaurant and so we felt compelled to visit. The night before we dined at Auberge Louis-Hébert (which is right next door) and so our expectations were rather high. The woman who led us into the restaurant said, "The portions are very very ample!" That should have been the red light we needed, revealing this place isn't really a French joint. We ignored it and sat down. The waiter was really wonderful and helpful. We ordered from the 30.00 prix fix menu... and maybe that was the issue. The Escargots à l'ail was doused in far too much garlic. The Paté de campagne was just yucky. But maybe that's just Paté, I don't know. I ordered the Émincé de boeuf sauce au vin but the waiter suggested I get the NY Strip instead, which I did. (I learned long ago to listen to waiters, they truly know best). It was dry and the veggies that came with it were bland. Dessert was included. It was Crepe Capucine. Dessert was enjoyable but it was just a scoop of vanilla ice cream on a simple crepe with some maple syrup drizzled over it. Maybe if we had ordered from the more expensive menu the food would have been better. Regardless, we spent about the same amount at Auberge Louis-Hébert and were blown away by their meal. I wouldn't recommend this place...
We attanded a family 80th Birthday celebration for Sunday carvery for which we were kindly allowed to gather in a private room with a bar before eating. There were 4 bar staff in attendance and the public side must have received excellent service as I waited for at least 10 minutes before I was asked what I would like to drink. The carvery itself was the typical buffet arrangement and consisted of over-cooked tough beef, nicely cooked pork and a rolled turkey joint which was moist. Vegetables on offer were very ordinary roast potatoes ranging from dark brown and overcooked to beige and underdone to cater for everyone's taste, cauliflower that re-invented the term 'al dente' as they required a firm hand with a steak knife to disect them. The carrots were similarly prepared to the cauliflower as was another vegetable of unknown botanical origin. The cabbage was, in contrast, cooked to perfection; and the mandatory frozen peas and sweet corn were also available with a pot of viscous gravy. The dessert menu was presented after the main course and orders taken. I cannot comment upon the vanilla and maple cheesecake ordered as it failed to arrive, but the apple and rhubarb crumble was extremely skimped on the rhubarb and crumble whilst the apple had the appearance and firmness of apples that had been heated but certainly not baked as would normally be expected. Special mention needs to be made of the strawberries used to garnish some of the desserts, they were of unusual colour being the normal colouring on the lower half whilst the top were completely colourless. A nice final touch was the lack of coffee offered.
went looking for lights this took me to a residence that was abandoned :(
not to happy with the service, i was told that they would fix my car in one day, i dropped my car off the previous night and the next day was told that it would take another day,then another day i am going on day four with no transportation, dave has never returned my calls, and service really sucks, i would never recomend this place to anyone....they lied to me just to get my car in for business, if they told me a week i would have respected it.thanks for nothing astro. a week later my transmission was found to be leaking, I called and they had a hard time to cover the waranty, I was told to bring car in a week later so they could fix the leaky seal, now since my car has been fixed i have other issues with it as they disconected the battery and never recalibrated my electric parking brake system, which should have been done by them.
We have been to Spinner's Grill a number of times and eat out with our 4 children at least twice a week. The first time the burgers were almost mediocre but the homemade Ranch dressing and potato chips were really good so we gave the place a second chance. The food is very average and the Tuna melt was the worst thing I have ever eaten. It had been awhile since we visited so we called in tonight for a family celebration. Started with waiting forever to be served (they were busier than previous trips). Our appetizer didnt arrive until after the main, the waitress was slow to refill drinks (we got 7 drinks total between 5 of us). The ranch wrap was better than McDonalds but nothing more than that to note on the entrees. The french fries were over cooked. We had dessert and after eating the cream off the top found it was basically a river of caramel sauce to which we decided it was time to complain. They deducted 2.40 (half off) the dessert but had taken it away so we couldn't finish it (not that we would of course!). I thought the service although slow was excusable as it was busy until the table next to us that arrived the same time as us was offered discounts and free drinks because of the wait. They had received food the same time as us by the same waitress. The table next to them had just left when I hear our waitress with a second waitress discussing the fact that the table had been a $30 meal but they only left a $1 tip!! I actually left more than 10% and in hindsight wished I hadn't. I did fill in a comment card but thought it is pointless giving constructive criticism as I wont be back there to see whether quality, standards and service has improved. I can see why they only have a 94 sanitation rating. Wendys/Hardees and other chains would rate higher in every way. Long review but they are thoroughly deserving from reading other people with similar experiences!
The place is disgusting. The first full day of my stay, I had to spend cleaning this room in order to make it livable. The kitchen was a mess. My bed has big nasty stains all over it and there are cigarette holes in the mattress cover. The carpet looks like it's never been cleaned and it, too, is covered in cigarette burns and spots. The carpets throughout the building are disgusting with huge stains all over them. The bathroom tub backs up every week and maintenance says this happens regularly. There is dog filth every where on the grounds. The "high speed" wireless internet is anything but high speed. It takes two minutes to watch a 30 video clip. On two occasions, late at night, I've found one of the exit doors propped open with a stone allowing all sorts of bugs and pests to come into the building and posing a serious security threat. I have had to have my refrigerator replaced 4 times! They also seem to have a different rate policy for minorities than they do for whites. I met several people here who have been here for months (some even years believe it or not) and they were able to negotiate an extended 'annual' rate, yet when I asked for the same rate, I was told they no longer offer it. How convenient. This place isn't worth any money, though. If you can afford it, stay at the Marriott in the same complex. On a positive note, their staff member Glenn is a great guy. Glenn is dependable, always here (unlike their MIA manager), always courteous, helpful, empathetic, and an advocate for the guests who stay here. If it were not for Glenn, my stay here would be completely intolerable. I don't fault the staff members (some of them are really nice folks) for the state of this place. I fault corporate who obviously think it's more important to make money than provide a clean, safe, and memorable stay for their guests.
worst tour in town SUCKED
worst cut my dog has ever had. might be a good veterinary hospital but the grooming secions was AWFUL. not only did the lady do the exacccct opposite of what i asked of her, but when i called and complained, she was more than RUDE on the phone not to mention unprofessional(laughing at the matter). everyone else i spoke with was perfectly pleasant with the exception of her. not only that, but when i got home from work the same day, i found CUTS, yes CUTS on my dogs neck under his chin where she had basically shaved him which was not asked of her. i asked for the same length all around and got shaved in some parts long in other parts and medium in others. non transitional. i would honestly not recommend her- i went bc of the ratings on here, which it didnt live up to.
None
There was a note on the door stating that Cafe Berlin is closed.
None
We recently purchased a 2006 Mercury Mountaineer from another dealer. After driving it for two weeks my wife was hit head on and it was totaled. We found a similar Mountaineer at Ford of Murfreesboro we liked. We went on Memorial Day to look at it, we only had 1 day left on our rental and were in dire need of a new car. The Mercury they had was out of our price range. So we decided to move on to another dealer. The salesman begged us to stay and told us how much better it was to buy from a certified dealership. They showed us a Jeep Commander that was nice and a good deal. We purchased it and were fairly happy for the first two weeks. The dealer called 4 times to make sure the car was running correctly, wow… Then after driving it to visit out of town family the transmission Solenoid went out on the way home. After doing research we found it was a known problem and you could reprogram the computer to lower the pressure and it would work for about two weeks... Took it back to the dealer and they tested it and sure enough it was the solenoid. But we did not buy the $2,500.00 extended warranty so they could do nothing for us. I explained I thought we got some kind of small warranty from buying from a “Certified Ford” Dealer, they said no. And they already had my cash yet I still didn’t even have my title yet. They said tuff they could not fix every car that they sold. I believe they reset the computer and sold it know it would blow up (I have no proof of this but all the signs point this way). They offered to “fix it at dealer cost” of $1000. Thing is I called three other dealers and a Trans shop, knowing what was wrong and they only wanted $600. Then the day I went back to get it, they had taken it to the Jeep dealer and we had to wait three hours to get it back. Oh the other thing when I was broke down on the side of the interstate I looked underneath the car to see if anything looked out of place, no spare tire. The GM acted like I took it off or something. He finally agreed to get me one, it was a donut and worn out even though the commanders come with 17” spares. I would not buy anything from these people they lie and say everything just above the law. They carefully word everything so they are legally covered. I know everyone needs to make money to stay in business but these guys clearly do not care about getting any more from me….
We went up there to look for a second family car. The car we went to look at didn't fit our needs so we looked at another one. At first we were happy with our salesmen but we very quickly realized he just wanted to make a sale. After talking with my husband we decided that we would trade the car that we had in for a new one and buy a second car in a few months. So that we could buy the second out right. The salesmen kept trying to get us to buy an finance two cars that day. When we finally were done signing it was late and dark. we drove he 60 miles home. first thing in the morning when we went out to the car we noticed that they did not detail it right. there was swirl scratches as if a rock was in the buffer. and about 20 white paint marks going down the side. we have tried contacting them with no return calls. We have had this new car for three days and just found out the bluetooth wont work. don't waste your time and money.The only return call we got was from the salesmen trying to once again get us to buy another car.shady shady shay *************UPDATED***************** Jennifer worked hard to change our opinion about Jim Norton. While she could not change how we were treated she did work hard to make things better for us. If you have a problem with anyone in the dealership i strongly recommend you talk to Jennifer. She returned calls when she said she would, and made it clear that she understood we had issues with the dealership. She did not blow off our concerns and was very professional!
None
I purchased a camera at this location 31 days ago and took it to Canada still new in the box. After 7 photos only half the screen worked the other side showed a white blank screen. I returned it to Frys and was told I needed to work it out with the manufacturer that they could not exchange it. The manager gave the impression he could care less and refused to discuss it any further. Let's see 5 minutes of usage and 7 photos and they feel they cannot back up a defective piece of merchandise as described by their service technicians. I feel that after the sale the customer becomes the enemy at this store.
I walked into the dealership with 15,000 in cash for a deposit on a Honda Fit for my daughter. I had just gotten out of work so I threw on a polo shirt and went with her, when I arrived no one greeted me not that I need greeting and finally a salesman came over and started to speak to me in Spanish. My Spanish isn't very good but he would not speak English. I asked him about seeing the vehicle in teal and he said yes and after just watching him smile and not understanding me that I really wanted to see the vehicle, my daughter walked out. Two days later I purchased the vehicle at Brickell Honda with problems at all. lesson learned, speak English and listen to the customer....
Good service but extremely over priced. The food was mediocre and definitely not worth it. Even the soda wasn't name brand and tasted terrible. A 4 person meal (without wine or appetizers) cost 119$ before the automatic gratuity. No one left satisfied.
Good: they appear to do good work, they know what they are doing Bad: they make you wait a lot more often than not, they sometimes seem to do work that really isn't necessary and charge you for it, their billing and healthcare billing is entirely unacceptable and takes a large amount of effort to straighten out the bad appears for me, to out weigh the good. while i've been a patient for the last 3 years, i feel that they have been too focused on the money making and less on the patient care and experience to the point that i will not be going back.
I had the Mexican wrap and my wife had "the best burger in NYC". Not impressed by the service, the waitress seemed to be friendly to everyone except us (maybe as we are Australians??). We are always very friendly towards hospitality staff as both of us used to work in the industry for many years so not sure what that was about. The bill was scribbled in unreadable handwriting and was about $10 more than I calculated it to be ($39.5 total) including the service charge. We weren't very impressed by the food, greasy and very basic for the price and setting. Wouldn't eat there again.
Nevermore I'll back to this hotel. I didn't like the service and staff. Old hotel without a good staff.
this place is a nitemare, first off.... i delivered my first son there in 2002 and it was awful. the nurse was yelling at me and they made me walk around in more pain then i could ever have imagined. every hr they had 15 nursing students come in and check my dialation, wich is painfull enough with 1 person, let alone 15 STUDENTS! they ignored my repeated requests to not allow the students in with me. my son was born sickly and now suffers from mental impairment due to oxygen deprivation thanx to the ob dr's waiting too long to deliver him with no fluid in the sac. he nearly died. my next awful story is that of my sister inlaw who repeatedly brought her daughter into the er telling them that she was sick. they told her it was a common cold. this occured several times befor the child lost her sight speach and mobility. they then told her it was SPINAL MENENGITIS! the child survived a few months as a vegetable and has since died. way to go abington
Meh. Go to j alexander or white chocolate grill instead if you are in the area.
We were traveling from out of town and bought a groupon deal for this place. We walked in to a completely empty restaurant and were immediately told they would only honor one groupon for our entire party (we had 3 and were prepared to buy at least $20 per groupon used) This is NOT a sit down restaurant.. it's a fast food fried seafood place, yet they refused to honor our groupons. We decided to leave.. I guess despite having ZERO people in there they did not want to sell $60+ worth of food. We are going to have our groupons refunded.
Walking distance from my house AND they have female doctors! What could be better? Except maybe receptionists who don't reschedule me 3 separate times because "the other receptionist booked me in an unavailable spot". Or maybe it would be nice if the doctor made eye contact with the patient and acted as if they cared at all about your health or well being instead of being about as cold and unresponsive as a dead fish. Like another reviewer, I requested a flu shot in addition to the complaint that I came in for. The doctor jabbed me and left the room without saying anything. It was over so fast that I wasn't even positive that she had done it at all and certainly didn't seem concerned about keeping me around to make sure I didn't have a negative reaction. Granted I haven't seen every doctor at this clinic, only the Russian doctor (sorry, I don't remember her name), but I feel like if I had been there for a chemical peel, I might have been treated better . . .
Came here for long weekend away from city. In NYC you come with certain expectations for $300 a night. The rooms were disgusting. Dirty vents, mold in bathroom, limited tv channels. It was not as expected. However Sherry (girl at front desk) was amazing. Went out of her way to help us out. OWNERS OF THIS HOTEL HAVE A GEM, as someone in the industry fire your house keeping manager and maintenance manager. Clean, Paint, Landscaping outside and a good manager to keep your people working. Most staff spent more time on phone than working. You could easily get $300 a night with happy customers that will return. It was renovated beautifully. You need an amazing manager with standards and one who after a few days of staying a guest should be able to pick out for looking like a manager.
STEER CLEAR. Please. If you want to have a great experience finding your dresses and bridesmaid dresses the house of brides is not the place to go. My best friend is getting married May 24th, 2013 however, we have not received our bridesmaid dresses. Keep in mind these dresses were ordered in August and early September of 2012! We were told at most 5 months after their quoted "10-16" week time frame and it has now been 9 months. This is absolutely appalling that they are adding more stress to this wedding and taking risks by ordering each girls dresses two sizes bigger than needed, which is going to give us a very limited time frame to complete any sort of alterations needed. The management is constantly putting it off and trying to ignore all of our concerns. If you want a stress free wedding avoid visiting the house of brides. It is not only a waste of time and money it is a scam. I am now in complete fear after reading these other horrifying reviews. I just wish we known of this before hand. It's a shame when the best day of your life is being held in jeopardy because of people who run this place do not take any sense of responsibility for their actions. The House of Brides is not only Poor-Fair it is ABSOLUTLEY TERRIBLE.
I was told that I would get my linens delivered today from 1:30-2:30 and it is now 4:30pm. Not an easy company to work with, period! I was here and even followed thru with a place for them to pick up and deliver without me being present. My company was not able to deliver services as a result. Even though my preferred delivery time slot is 2-4they insist on interrupting while you are trying to conduct your business and services. Not happy with this!
None
I wouldn't suggest Alliance.
Freundliches Personal aber leider leider sehr laut in den Zimmern. Statt der beworbenen Ruhe gab es leider nur Lärm von der angrenzenden (viel befahrenen) Straße.
If I were to describe the sales service we received, I would say it was slow but overall I was happy. However, when a new van blows a tire in the first month or two for no explained reason and Koon's and Toyota's response is that they didn't sell us the tire, they only sold us the car and it was essentially tough luck for us, you can bet that the $300 tire fix cost them a whole lot more than that when it comes to future purchases. So, my suggestion to everyone out there is that if you want a dealer who stands behind their product, stay far away from Koons Tysons Toyota.
None
The manager there an arrogant man an preparation not so good, Take lot of time to serve.
Quality/Appeal/Service: ATROCIOUS Beware: these people are scammers! Like thousands of other customers this "company" stole from me, lied to me, and are refusing to fulfil their side of the contract. WAE+ are *not* in the retail business - they are in the business of taking millions of pounds in interest free loans by deceiving people unlucky enough not to have researched this scam outfit before placing an order. They will take your money, then claim there is a delay caused by their suppliers (while their website keeps listing the items as "in stock"), and when you finally have enough you'll be lucky if you get a refund after 30 days or longer - if you get it at all. Just do a simple Google search on them. It’s really quite illuminating.﻿
Rude! I walked up to the window, confessed I was a first time user of the 'click and print' service, but had a question about packaging. What I got was "Hey, look at me. You have to place that order online" - and with the comment came the 2-finger pointing at me then to his eyes gesture. I certainly got no apology from him when I suggested he had been rude, and I got no apology from the manager. I plan on taking the complaint to a higher level!
Ph #disconnected
None
Will never go back
The apartments look great, but I could hear our neighbor snoring every night. Every conversation, dog barking, couples fighting, and person snoring can be heard through the walls. The neighbors are all loud, and the management doesn’t care to fix anything. Our hot water heater went out 4 times in one week, because instead of figuring out the problem they kept throwing spare parts at it until something “took.” In addition to this, the already high rent has a 15% price spike every year. The cherry on top? We moved out July 31st and they reported us to a debt collection agency (August 13th): after 14 days!!! We’ve never missed rent, or paid late, or given then any reason to report us. Normally, debt collectors report you immediately to your credit bureau and it goes onto your rental history. Luckily this agency doesn’t report it to our credit history or rental history because they told us that: Holland Residential (Overlook’s rental agency) has a history of reporting tenants abnormally fast. My husband and I are appalled. We’re in our mid 20’s, just bought our first home, have no debt, great credit history, and stable careers – but made the unfortunate mistake of moving into their apartment complex. We’re paying $140 in cleaning fees, even after meticulously cleaning the apartment all day. We could not be happier to be moving out! Whatever you do, do not live there. Yes, the location is great, but it is not worth it. There are lots of other apartments close by, choose any – they’ll be better than the Overlook at Lakemont!
I got my wisdom teeth removed here on 5th Sept 2012. while giving the anesthesia they gave it to my nerve which caused l"lingual nerve injury" due to which my face got shaped out and i dont have control on one side of my face even 10 days after surgery. the doctor didnt even explain me dos and donts after the surgery. when asked after surgery can I go for running after surgery he said "you can", but when i searched in the net I should not as any physical exercise will cause over bleeding. they are completely money minded and there is no process, they dont even maintain patient record on their side. avoid this place.
After a pedicure here, I ended up in the hospital with an infection. After an investigation by the Board of Cosmetology, Forever Nails was fined for 20 serious health code violations, including the use of porous material on several customers, unclean foot baths and screens, and lack of hospital-grade disinfectant. Two of my nurses had also suffered from infections after pedicures at this location.
Took my girlfriend to Tropical Taco for some fish tacos. 4 fish tacos, beans and chips... about $30. It tasted okay. Then my girlfriend found a hair in her food. It was long and dark... kinda like the cook behind the window had. Normally I would eat the leftovers she doesn't eat because she is pretty skinny, but this time I decided not to.
Place got took over by ghettoness
this is not the correct place please unmark it
A great variety of meals to choose from, quickly delivered, and still hot. However; the service when ordering the food on the phone was absolutely awful. To order 4 items, I was on the phone with the boy for 12 minutes. I had to spell my street address was letter-by-letter a handful of times, and even then he did not get it correct. Then, after finally completing my order, I received another phone call from the boy again. When I answered, he did not identify that he was from Duck Duck Express, instead just said "Uh hi, it's me again." After telling the boy what my order was multiple times, he still had to call back and repeat my order to me, and asked for my address again. The service with ordering food over the phone was not professional at all, and very frustrating. If I order from here again, I would appreciate if the employees were taught proper for etiquette for a professional restaurant.
I have not gotten anything there that really impressed me.
None
Probably one of the most frustrating phone lybrinth I have ever had to negotiate to ask a simple question. I spoke with three different voice prompts that connected me to two different recptionists. I wasn't even able to speak with someone in the actual location. Word to the wise. If yoou are wondering if the Sears service department can help you, don't. They prpobably can help you, if you go into the store itself, otherwise plan on talking to a machine. The voice I did get, couldn't understand the brand of lawn tractor I had. He had no clue
Soso
Poor value for money. Saying it's basic accommodation is an understatement. While we found it clean enough the place looks old and outdated. Cracked and broken tiling in bathroom with no hot water service in wash basin. Low wattage lighting in rooms is awful. Very slow service at the in house restaurant. As a two night relaxing experience it leaves a lot to be. We'll not be back there again.
A cidade necessita de um governante que olhe para essa população carente de tudo.
Way over-priced for what you actually get! Was the food good? Sure. Was it different? Yes. But I can still recognize the bagged baby carrots and frozen peas in their gristly lamb stew. It wasn't anything to write home about. I would add another another star or two if the dishes were reasonably priced. At $20-30 a plate, I should have GREAT food.
I was not impressed with Oskar Blues. Though the atmosphere is fun and casual, there really isn't much else I can compliment them on. The menu selection and prices were only adequate. They don't pay attention to detail or remember specific requests in food prep and we waited for what seemed like forever to get our food. The staff seem to be there for a paycheck, not you; you don't feel valued as a customer. The equivalent restaurant/bar and rival brewery in Longmont, the Pumphouse, is FAR superior in both food, beer, service and quality.
Could use mire room service due to xleaning up daily wise and it could be cleaned up way better than what i see during my stay..
The people who work at this Taco Bell are completely incompetent. They repeat your order back to you at least twice and still manage to mess up the food or completely forget items. Not to mention the fact that they act as though taking your order and giving you your food are beneath them. Hello, you work at Taco Bell. Have a little pride in your work or quit and let someone else have the chance at job.​
Was not impressed. Out of 2 1/2 hours, I saw the surgeon for maybe 3 minutes. The first lady that was helping me was proficient, the second lady, not so much. Felt like a I was just being herded through...... will go somewhere else to have my surgery done.
First time we've been disappointed at this location. The pasta was dried out, and chewy, and the salad was soggy. The breadsticks, at least, were good. Having a server who seemed to just be going through the motions didn't help either. We may have to think twice before going back.
cockroach in food...never again
Atmosphere and service were good. Margarita didn't taste quite right. I had a Mexican dish carne asada. It was bland not very good. Think they lean more to the Cuban fare. Presentation of the food was good though.
None
I used to love Dog's Day Inn, but have changed my mind since my dog was seriously injured there five weeks ago. My dog, a 12 pound 11 month old miniature poodle, sustained nearly a compound fracture of his leg while in their active room. He's had to have two surgeries to fix it and is still in a cast. First, DDI told me one dog landed on him while playing. They insisted that's how it happened and, when I questioned their story, the owner - Bill - became angry at me. A week later after I let them know the vet didn't believe their story either, they changed it and said two dogs landed on him. How can I possibly believe them? I used to love DDI, but I've found them to be pretty shady and incredibly rude. They don't pay for injuries to dogs, even though they say they do. And, based on my dog's injuries, I don't think the dogs in the active room are adequately watched and cared for. Why else would their story change a week later? I regret sending my dog there and strongly encourage you to think about the potential repercussions before leaving your dog in their care, as well.
The delivery man that I have in my neighborhood makes no attempt to contact you. Due to work constraints, I missed him twice, but was available ALL DAY TODAY. He left an info notice on the door but never bothered to buzz my door or knock or anything. I was here the whole day. The customer service rep from the 1800# can vouch that I waited, and also said it was possible for a reschedule. She sent a message to this location and they called me. The man on the phone was extremely rude, made it seem entirely my fault, made no apologies, and said basically I can pick it up or itll be returned to the shipper. This location is not only out of the way, but it is not in a very reputable neighborhood. It's ridiculous that I paid an extra 7 dollars for my delivery, and will now have to pay more to get here. If the people inside the building tomorrow are as nice as the man I spoke to on the phone, they will not know what him them. I'm so upset I could cry. I already made a complaint to the shipper that they should no longer use UPS service, as Fed Ex has always made every effort to arrive in a timely manner, and when they cannot reach me, they send the package to my local USPS facility. And I'm utterly appalled that you can't change your delivery date without paying an extra 7$. Awful. And this is supposed to be more convenient than in-store shopping.
We ordered flowers for a friend that just lost her mother. We took a collection at work, and paid $75 for the flowers. The arrangment could have been done by a child. It looked like a couple of grocery store "bunches" were just stuck in a vase. When a co-worker called to express her disapointment, the owner was very defensive and said we got what we paid for. The 100% satisfaction guarantee was not honored. We would have been better off going to a grocery store, buying the flowers and arranging them ourselves. We will never buy/order flowers from here again - I am sure they do not need our business.
Three reasons why First Response Systems as an alarm response company is not worried about customer service, and more importantly, customer loyalty:1) President of the company is too busy to talk with a customer about some issues in his company that he may not be aware of. He had other pressing issues "as you can understand."2) The company does not take responsibility for its mistakes or oversights (especially when it was because they had to take over some other alarm companies' issues and system inadequacies...and did not did not find the issue to charge us on the install).3) Despite acknowledging their alarm sensor issue was the cause for multiple false alarms in the middle of the night, the terror of my boys running into the room and requiring consoling were not a cost to FR-Inc. The short-term gains of covering the costs of a technician replacing their faulty sensor outweigh the costs for long-term customer loyalty. I am sure the response that this was not "their system" and therefore "not their fault" and that "I should understand that costs should be shared." Excuses rather than responsibility for their services. "We [bent over backwards] and gave this customer a one-year contract"...when there were only 3 or 4 other companies that would have been happy to have the business in the recession. Good luck to a company where deficiencies in customer service equals no customer loyalty.
THIS PLACE SUCKS, NO ONE CAN BARELY SPEAK ENGLISH AND WHEN I CALLED THE MANAGER TO VOICE MY DISSATISFACTION, HE HAVE ME THE RUNAROUND AND JUST HUNG UP ON ME. I WOULD NOT SEND NO ONE HER TO EAT AND I WILL NEVER SPEND A NOTHER DOLLAR IN THIS PLACE... I OWN A STORE DOWNTOWN AND WE HAVE MANY REQUESTS FROM TOURIST ON WHERE TO EAT. I HAVE INSRUCTED MY STAFF TO NEVER SEND ANYONE TO THIS RESTAURANT.
The meals was not pleasing by sight nor by taste. The cook was from another nationality not peruvian and they claim that is a peruvian restaurant. Unfortunately I had to apologize to my family and friends for the poor food and the service.
None
I have never hated living anywhere as much as I hated living at Millcreek Apartments. There is a horrible noise problem. I have a one year old who is woken up at least 3 times a week by cars blaring music outside our apartments. I can literally see my neighbors smoking crack. The cops are here at least once a week. I have made complaints to management and nothing has ever been done about it. Natasha in particular has been increasingly difficult to talk to. I have never met a more disrespectful "community manager" (what a joke!) in my life. We have had tons of problems we asked to be fixed and nothing gets done the first time. And now that our lease is up in 6 weeks I couldn't be happier. I found the perfect apartment in Carlsbad but they wont let me out of my lease 2 weeks early. I really hate this place. We moved here in a hurry because I was pregnant and was due any minute and we needed a place to live. I will never make that mistake again. Do not move here. You will seriously regret it, we did.
It's one thing to be frazzled and unorganized but its a whole other thing when you are flat out rude on top of it. The folks at Avon Auto and Truck are completely disorganized, never operate according to appointment times, and are frankly rude and unhelpful. I can understand being swamped with work, but its not the customers' fault. I would highly recommend going anywhere else BUT Avon Truck and Auto.
It took 1.5 hours to get our food when we arrived as one of the only customers. The server was great but the kitchen staff were very slow. Don't come here and expect to get out in under two hours. The food was average .
ARROGANT AND RIGHTEOUS - Falsely saying what is involved in the cost of the check and then being RUDE and ARROGANT when challenged by what he stated. This is another case of a large company's staff not valuing their loyal customers. My wife bought her car from Grossinger but she has until this day, loyally had it serviced there and spent $$$$$ having it serviced and fixed and again until today. A day or two ago the Engine light came on and I was concerned that this maybe something as the car is 7 years old. My wife asked that I go to Grossinger and have them look at what the problem may be as she believes (falsely now), that they will always look after her car. She rang and booked the car in for a check. When I arrived to have it looked at, I was shocked by the $138 price tag. I asked what that incorporated and the agent (Adrian) "clearly" stated that it would be for the diagnostic of the engine and anything that needed fixing. Pretty clear I thought, but NOT so. I envisaged this as an flat rate and based upon my wife being a loyal customer and being on record as so, this would be so. AGAIN, not so. Reluctantly I sign to have the car repaired and go away. I receive a call within the 1 hour to say they had discovered the problem and it was to do with a faulty gas cap and they discovered some slight rust around the fuel entry area. Adrian then says my total would now come to $254. WTF .... I challenged him to the initial understanding and he stated that he never said that. NOT SO !!!! He told me that the gas cap would be around $40 plus the cost of somebody taking the rust away brought it up to the inflated amount. I told him that this was inappropriate and they were to do nothing and that I would get a gas cap elsewhere to which he replied that they do not recommend getting a non Toyota gas cap. TACKY !!!! .... I informed that I would just come and get the car back and pay the $138 and in turn for this money, they would turn the dash warning light off and get a car wash even though it is raining outside. I returned to the service center and reiterated to him that I believed he misled me but to my "Shock and Horror", he stated that he never said that and that I should not call him a liar. His tone was THREATENING and normally that would lead to something not nice however, I decided that I can let him feel the wrath of my most inappropriate experience ONLINE. He can be right for the $138 or so, but our voice in the Chicago community will cost Grossinger far MOREl .... I asked that we be removed from their mailing list etc .... to which I received a grunted response. INTERESTING !! My wife was in horror over this experience when I returned home to explain what happened, to her. I let her know that I will write a review online of the experience and that she need not to do anything more. I have since purchased a high quality gas cap for half the price and will have our car serviced by a caring mechanic who has been recommended to me a car enthusiast who is a personal friend. More poor you Adrian and Grossinger, an opportunity for customer advocacy and satisfaction TOTALLY missed.
Standard rubber-stamp sports bar with occasional local bands. OK I guess if you're stuck in Columbia but there's better options elsewhere.
Don't do it, read the other reviews too, it's not just me. First, the agent sent a substitute and was late to show the house despite scheduling the appointment 4 business days in advance. Second, I scheduled a time with the agent to put in an application the night prior, as I arrived 5 minutes early, the agent was walking out the door. Third, they wanted a certified check for first month's rent at the time of application (no lease yet) and I wouldn't have occupied the place for another full month. This wouldn't have been a show stopper if they had bothered to mention this on any of the prior phone conversations or provided the application documents via email or considered a personal check (and I had a paystub demonstrating income over 7x the rent!). The final nail in the coffin was observing the interaction with other people in the office. One young kid (I say kid, he's 26) was dropping in to sign a lease, he had obviously applied earlier and provided the funds. It was supposed to have been left with the secretary by the agent who walked out the door, (remember her?) She had left and not informed anyone else in the office about this kid coming in nor left the lease at the desk as promised. At the same time, a different agent was arguing with some other tenants about how their house was habitable despite the water damage and most of the power being shut off because the cleanup company had ensured that they had a refrigerator and the heater on. Your mileage may vary but I will never rent from them nor shall they manage any property I may purchase in the future.
Wow wait on hold for 5 mins just to answer a question on the phone. I'm going somewhere else. My first visit in Maryland. Wow. Poor service.
Used to be a favorite breakfast spot of my family and friends. It's has recently changed ownership and has drastically gone down hill since. Food portions have decreased , favorite menu items have disappeared, and the employees that have stayed on even seem less "happy" to be there... prior to current/new ownership I would have given an excellent for service... and food. I wouldn't be surprised if they lose their entire local following.
The facility itself is great. A lot of equipment to choose from and it is generally pretty clean. However, 90% of the staff are HORRID. They are incredibly rude and are totally ok telling you a lie in order to make a sale. There are a few guys really early in the morning and a few girls in the evening at the check in desk who are very pleasant. And the trainers, forget it they are ridiculous, you are promised an assessment with your membership, but the trainers don't seem to care much about you unless you are paying for the extra personal trainer. So the facility I would give a B grade. The staff and customer service are defiantly a large F.
DO NOT GO HERE!!!!! A sales person there told us that the car was a "Cherry" and after driving 4 hours to go get the car with kids, we noticed at 9 pm that the car looked like it had been driven through a field with bushes and there were cuts in the leather seats, along with a huge bleach stain on the carpets. My wife couldn't believe that the salesman called it HIS WORDS "Cherry." He also told us that we had to find another one that night because he wasn't coming in the next day and so he wanted us to start looking at about 9:30pm with kids!!! This guy could care less. We left and stayed at the Fairfiled inn, which was nice and decided to head back to dealership the next morning to start our two day battle. We were in a hurry because we had to get back home, but we were quickly greeted by another car salesman and we told him what had happened the night before and that we needed to get to the bottom dollar soon. He said it was not going to be a quick process to find the bottom dollar on one of their cars because that was not how they work. I couldn't believe my ears, I was literally begging to buy a car because we really needed one but, this guy said getting to the bottom dollar just wasn't going to happen fast because the manager had to negotiate!! I understand negotiating but, we needed to get to the point after trapping our kids in the car and watching cheaper by the dozen 5 times. We had had enough and packed up our 2 kids and started the drive home. On the way home in the car the a manager called and was very professional and wanted to make things right and we desperately needed a car, so we struck a deal on another pilot that we liked over the phone. He also apologized for what had happened and told us that the other car from the night before was obviously not cherry because it had been on their car lot for 71 days and not sold, although the car salesman from the night before said he was having to hold it for us!!! The car we wanted had two scratches on the hood that he said he would get fixed and painted which I think he said it would cost like $350 but he was paying for it. Not sure why he was telling me prices but he did. We agreed to meet him halfway between our towns because he was giving us such a good deal and he also said it was going to cost him another "I think $250" to send two drivers to meet us with two cars. One of their cars and of course the other mine. I called him multiple times over the next couple days to figure out pick up times and left him multiple messages, they even took the car off the website. I don't know what happened because he literally disappeared and would never return our calls. We have purchased other cars before and have never had anything like this happen. This was actually months and months ago, but I am still so irritated about what happened and how shady that place is that I want other people to know what they are all about. You have been warned!!
We lost our home in the May 20, 2013 tornado. Jennifer did return my call regarding a property I had called about but when she called she was very rude. Acted like she just wanted to get me off of the phone. Didn't even offer any other properties. Thanks for the horrible service JENNIFER DAVIS!
None
Called just to make an appointment for the first time, and they guy gave me an attitude just because I asked how many barbers they had working that day. What a joke !
ich hasse bayernl
I hope this review saves someone else time, money and frustration. Where do I begin, I guess getting stood up twice and not getting any of my phone calls return was the worst. Seem like a nice guy, but while cleaning the carpet some kind of powder residue made 2 big, noticeable stains. This was a house i moved out of so I didn't find out about the stains for a week. I would expect a professional to have called me to inform me what happened while he was cleaning. Let me say the stain is not hes fault, but he should have called to inform me. After i called him to ask about the stain he had nothing to say but to offer to come back out and see if he can get it out, and only charge for his gas and chemicals used. We set up a appointment and he was a now show. Called him several times with no answer, left voice mail he never contacted me back. 4 days later feed up with him not calling me back I decide to call from my work phone, i was surprised when he answer. When I told him my address he remembered who I was we setup another appointment. And once again he stood me up. Save your money, time, and frustration call someone else.
I've never had such oily after taste. Couldn't get rid of it.
A total rip-off, with bad customer service, as stated.
Dirty broken and unhelpful
없어짐
It is very slow
Extremely boring museum. Only the ground floor is cool, the rest is extra paid or just stuff to read. It's a pity that this is “the big science museum in London“. You need about an hour for all floors.
This location is Eedgaah and Mazaar of a sufi
Tempi lunghi bibite calde prezzi alti peccato...un posto così meriterebbe di meglio..
Please do NOT eat here. The waiter was nice enough but the quality of the food was below average while the price was MUCH too much for what we ate.
Most unorganized store i have ever been in. Spent 15 min waiting for help while the "kids" working there chatted. Wont be back to this location...EVER!
I went threw Adecco to be a Operations Technician Assistant on site at Google in the Dalles and all I can say is that it was a waste of time. I enjoyed my work and did well or so I was told. However out of the blue Adecco Called me up at 10:30pm at night and told me my position was over and that I should not report to work tomorrow. They said that I did good work and it wasn't performance related. I just wasn't needed any longer. Guess I should have known temp work wouldn't turn into full time work. In my honest opinion DO NOT WORK FOR ADECCO NO MATTER WHAT!
Thanks for not returning the shot gun shells I bought on the other end of the store and never even left the building, thanks a lot.
3 weeks ago the Thayer Hotel double-charged me for a one night stay. I would not have written this review if I had ANY indication that they were trying to fix this problem. I have called multiple times and have been avoided every time. Poor and unacceptable customer service.
Paid $39.95 for a unlimited car wash package. Worked for first day only. Was charged another $21.00 the next day for no reason and they will not refund me my money. No answer after leaving 3 messages on their voice mail. No one is there to help me after i get off work. NEVER USE THIS CAR WASH!!!!! I hope they get shut down or fail and go bankrupt!!!
Unprofessional and rude, spend the extra 10$-20$. to go somewhere else.
I recently took my cat in here because he got sick because I'm an idiot (I will admit it). Anyway, they took him back and tell me what's going on and how to fix it....The vet tech comes back with a HUGE number of $700 for an iv, sedation, meds, an overnight stay, and who knows what else(he only needed the IV and some medicine for me to bring home). And said if they didn't do all of that stuff to our cat that he would very likely die! I told them I couldn't afford $700 because I'm a student and they offered me a credit line, which I also did not want to do because once again I'm a student with enough debt. So the vet tech gets really huffy with me and basically acted like I was the worst person in the world for not being able to afford an outrageous bill. So after he talked with the vet they came up with the magical number of $200 (which was probably still too much....) for the visit, IV, and take home medicine. My cat is fine now with just the IV and his medicine , but they WILL take advantage of you if they can. They will guilt trip you and treat you like you're just awful for making a mistake. I would not recommend anyone take their animal here unless you just have to--and even then be careful to not get taken advantage of! Update: I am going to go ahead and say that they don't know what they are doing at this vets office because they prescribed my cat the same dosage of muscle relaxers that you would give a HUMAN THAT HAD BACK PROBLEMS. A 15 lb cat! He hasn't been able to walk straight all day and my dad who is a doctor said that he definitely should not have been given or continue to get that dosage (or even that medicine). So my cat has been 'drunk' (but not seizing......) for nearly 24 hours now. Thank you vet clinic.
Every time I order from them they mess up my order. I'm so sick of the service
I called to ask a few questions and the office manager said she was "too busy" and hung up the phone.
None
OMG the worst customer service ever! More than 20 minutes to cancel a service!!! of which 12 minutes on hold and 8 minutes to figure out the nearest TWC store address!
I got my new car from Steve Rayman and after just 16,000 miles the tires got worn out. The tires were of KUMHO company and were of pathetic quality. After driving around 10K miles the tires were worn out and my friends pointed the same out to me but I did not believe them thinking that I just bought a brand new vehicle and how can the tires get worn out. Later when I realized, I complained to Steve Rayman dealership and to my surprise was told that the tires do not have warranty. I have been really a disappointed customer with this experience and in future do not see myself buying a GM or chevy vehicle any more. I had to pay in order to get all the 4 tires replaced for my new vehicle. I have put a complain to KUMHO tires as well. I would not recommend Steve Rayman to anyone for buying a vehicle.
My visit to the office was okay but my experience with the dr was poorly done, there was a few questions and he was gone and i was out to the door, very impersonal. I felt the doctor didn't understand just how bad i felt and didn't even offer pain medicine since i was informed regular pain killers would cause more issues and problems with my liver and kidney. I had to ask the receptionist if the doctor was going to give me something for the pain. The day of the ultrasound the tech said they found significant findings at 10am. I went the whole day without a phone call from the doctor or nurse as to my condition. Had to wait the whole weekend and first thing Monday at noon i call and i'm told that it's notated on my chart that a nurse would call me AFTER all of his other patients were taken care of. So another 5 hours go by and I've still not received news on what the doctor is going to do about my gallbladder, and now I have to wait until Tuesday to call them again.I'm very disappointed in the way they have treated me. It's as if i'm just another paycheck for his office and nothing more. I don't recommend anyone to deal with his office unless they want to be given the run around about their condition.
During our five night stay at the Aston Waikiki Sunset hotel, the service we experienced was extremely disappointing. We had several issues with the room, the service and the staff. We even had to wait over two hours for our room to be "finished" so that we could check in. The hotel and room were clean, but there was construction going on a week ahead of schedule. When we booked our room, we were not warned. We were also not warned when we checked in. Had we been informed we would not have stayed here. The noise from the construction was unbearable. It was so loud at times that we could not maintain a conversation. We were not in our room much, but when we were the noise was horrible. When I spoke with the front desk they were semi rude about the situation. The gentleman I spoke with asked me "what do you want me to do about it?" - Really?!?!? We also found a cockroach on our kitchen floor. When I called the desk about it, the gentleman said that they are common in Hawaii and there was nothing they could do. All of that on top of the fact that the walls are so thin, we could hear our "neighbor" cough and talk (normal volume, no yelling). The room was sub-standard for a three star hotel. there was no TV in the "master bedroom" but there was in the second room (2 bedroom suite). The "great location" is only a couple blocks from the beach, but there are on average 10 homeless people in that short distance. I do not mean to be judgmental, but they could do a better job of keeping these people away from the area. I was approached on multiple occasions being asked for money. I will never stay here again and I would recommend that people do not stay here. If you are looking for a cheap place to sleep (where you don't mind a horrible bed and lots of noise) then by all means. Other than that, I wouldn't stay here.
Terrible shop, website shows nice clean shop but the place looks like a hobo camp. Had transmission replaced in my car only to get it back with warning lights flashing on the dash and grease/oil all over the interior. The person at the counter refused to fix the problem and blamed me for the damage. Find another shop if you're wanting quality work, the warranty is worthless as businesses like this never last long before they're gone.
Very disappointing. Will never go back. Terrible service.
Tuan! Anh chan chu lam rui
The food was fine, but the service is slow. It took 10 minutes to have our drink orders taken. When we got our food, the runner who delivered it disappeared before we could confirm our acceptance of the food or whether we needed anything (which our Alfredo was dry and needed more sauce). Our entire party was done eating by the time we finally received our extra sauce which was hard to ask for as our waiter never walked by the table. The bread with our meal appeared along with the afore mentioned sauce. After asking for a box, we have been waiting for at least 5 minutes now. Tldr, the food is NOT worth the lack of service at the table.
Whoa, SALTY! The burgers were to me overcooked, even crispy around the edge, and so salty I thought my Atlanta burger must have had a seasoning accident happen to it, but my husband complained about his as well. Frozen fries with some rosemary sprinkled on them were unappetizing and my iced tea was not freshly made - and I define "freshly made" as "today" when it comes to convenience restaurants. Twenty bucks wasted IMO. The cashier was easily confused but polite and the other staff were very nice. Hope they get better jobs soon. If not for them the place would have gotten but 1 star.
This shop is no longer at this location, though the website does not indicate it.
We ordered delivery from here last night and it wasn't very good. The sweet and sour pork was the best part of the meal. The Vegetarian Lo Mein tasted a little bit "plasticky", if that makes any sense. The crab rangoons were pretty mediocre, as were the egg rolls. We'll definitely be trying somewhere else next time.
if you know what crawfish are supposed to taste like don't go to shuck and jive it is terrible
I had surgery, and many tests last year. I When I checked in, I provided my full name, current address and phone number. I also provided a copy of my drivers license (at their request) that had my current address. I also completed an on-line profile with all current information. I was never billed for the serivice because they used an old address that was on file from 13 years ago. I also never received calls for follow up. However, then my bill was sent to several collection agencies and now on my credit report. When I called Patient Accounts they told me they the address they billed to and the phone number they called. I told them I hadnt live at that address for 13+ years or had that phone number. They did say they had the correct address and don't know why they billed the wrong address. They apologized but it doesn't help that this was sent to a collection agency and I'm now having trouble getting a loan.
Very expensive.
Store is very hot and customer service is non-existent.
Service was horrible... Purchased a portable gaming system for my Navy son that is on a Barge... No real transportation and no comforts of home.. Sent the part to them 3/3 it is now 3/19 and they have no idea when it will be here. They told me 5 business days... Six or ten phone calls later they still don't know......
Stay away from this place!! Very unsanitary. Fries are delicious though.
R u g o g u n n d a a.
We asked people who were eating food from Barb's how it was, and they told us it was great. They said they were locals, and they ate there all the time. One of them must have been Barb. We assumed the fish would be fresh, since the place was sitting right on the water. We weren't sure about the calamari, though, so we asked the employee (who asked a supervisor) if it was fresh. He told us, "We freeze ALL of our fish, or it goes bad within a day." That should have been our first hint. Unless they don't have a refrigerator, fish does NOT go bad within a day. We get FRESH fish shipped to Albuquerque (in the desert), and it commands a higher price than frozen fish, because it's better. The food was pricey, which we could have understood, since it's right on the water in a tourist trap. But the food was hardly edible. The breading on everything was pale and tasteless, and not crispy at all. The halibut, for which we paid a premium price over the cod, was mushy and flavorless. The calamari was *extremely* rubbery, even though its breading seemed undercooked. The sauce served with it didn't help the flavor any. We couldn't find anything to season the food, but as we were leaving we saw that there was salt, pepper, and vinegar at some tables. I wish we had known so we could have added some flavor to the food. The only food that tasted good at all was the french fries, and I rated the decor as good because we ate outside by the water. The place itself was just a walk-up food stand. We paid $43.75 (American) for food for 2 people, and I wish we could have gotten our money back. I can't remember being so unhappy about a food purchase. At least we didn't end up sick.
If being treated like a number is your thing, then this is the place for you. There are several employees who have zero customer service skills. Sure, it is possible to have a visit that is pleasant, but tangling with any of the "god's gift" employees is a day killer. This has been my vet for over a decade and I am done. Beautiful facility, but should have invested in sharper employees.
Well My husband and I came into Boulder about 1 week ago... we found the Yellow Deli because we both love coffee, and I love to get on Free Wifi!! So we went to this place... At first we were very impressed with the interior, the restrooms, the flavor of the coffee, and Wifi... But I cant say all good about it... The people that work there are very plain, no personality at all!! They dont even come check on you to see if you need a refill or anything!! Their policy of 1 refill on coffee is ridiculous!! PLUS if you ask for Extra Sugar... they look at you like you are out of your mind!!! Talk about being "jewish"... these people are the epitomy of being "Jewish". Cant spare a few xtra packets of sugar for your customers that request it?? Sorry, but NO CUSTOMER SERVICE at all!! So they lost my business after I tried them 3x... 3x and your OUT if you dont give me the service that I expect and require from a "business".
Food is good, but the service... meh. Some of the behind the counter servers seem pretentious when you ask for items to be made different than THEY like to make them. But really, they aren't serving themselves, they're serving customers so you'd think it'd be the other way around. Also, their website says nothing about their kitchen not opening until around 11:40 am... I guess if you just want a coffee then you're all good.
Mierda no se los recomiendo
RUDE. The fellow at the register was rude and when called on it was unapologetic about it and got even ruder.
None
I've never felt so ridiculed in my life. I went there because I came up all of a sudden with a back problem that was causing extreme pain and I was unable to walk. They gave me all the super pain killer medicines but I was unable to move still. The P.A. (his name was Joel) ridiculed me and said "you should be able to walk now" and said there was no way the medicine wasn't helping when it really wasn't. Eventually, a nurse figured out to try a deflammatory steroid which helped me almost instantly and I left the hospital within an hour. I was there all night long from 10pm to 6am, and they didn't try that until 5am. It was a horrible experience and hopefully i'm not nearby if I ever need emergency services again.
not a good theatre to watch movie. Seating arrangements are really bad.
I had nothing but issues with this gym. My first meeting with my personal trainer he was very pessimistic about my goals, despite having reached said goals in the past. I gave them a second shot on the personal training side and they cancelled without telling me. The schedule they gave me when I joined was outdated, causing me to miss gym hours. The air has bad circulation and there are no fans. If you want to do a real cardio workout prepare to sweat profusely. Also, they brag that they have good patrons who wash down the machines, but beyond that the gym does not take any extra efforts to clean down the machines. They look dirty (maybe not as dirty as other gyms) but I've seen much cleaner. They're also extremely slow at fixing machines that break. If you want to quit you have to put your notice in over a month and a half in advance or they get to charge you (even though I left town). I was hoping that paying a steeper price I would get better service...not the case.
Went through the drive-thru. The person taking our order was very unfriendly. My wife and I wanted corn instead of slaw. They were out. We ordered green beans instead. Without giving us a total, he asked us to pull forward. At the window, he told us they were also out of green beans. Asked what they weren't out of. They told us we could either take the slaw or get extra hushpuppies. They didn't offer anything at all or even say sorry. Cancelled our order and ordered one cookie (so that we could have a receipt). They gave us our cookie and tried to not give us a receipt at all. Could hear the manager repeating "they cancelled the order" over and over in a very rude way. Had to yell into the window to get them to notice I wanted a receipt at all.
New to brooklyn. We picked this place over the other patisseries in the neighborhood b/c of reviews here. First red flag was the fact that none of the workers were french. Ham & cheese croissant was basically just bread. Doughy and thick, not light and flakey as a croissant should be. A shame to france. Veggie empenada was decent at best. The filling was tasty but not nearly enough, and way to much salt on top. The baguette was covered in flour and only edible because I so badly wanted bread with my dinner that evening. I may throw it away and get one from somewhere else on the way home. Alas I will not be returning. On a side note the Kos Kaffe coffee shop across the street has amazing fresh in house roasted coffee.
This place doesn't want your business. They wouldn't mount my tires because I didn't buy them there. They gave me some BS, that they weren't able to replace the tire if it got damaged during install, a policy put in place due to idiots putting 22s on a civic. I told them it was a factory tire and size replacement, didn't matter. I told them I would sign a waiver, didn't matter. That's cool, I'll give my business to some one who wants my money.
This place is closed, and was replaced by Cafe Bueno.
None
I usually get sick every time I eat there, but I don't go there by choice as I am often part of a group that goes. They must cook with MSG, because that's the only thing that makes me sick that I am aware of, either that or I get food poisoning every time I go there. The other seem to like it, though. I will never go there on my own.
They are closed
their passport services are sketchy. We applied for our newborn's passport 8 weeks before the trip (paid extra for expedite service), then found out 4 weeks before we leave that this office "forgot" to write down their information on the application, so the application was put on hold. We had to go back to the same office and reapply. Here's to hoping that they don't "forget" anything this time and we get our passport on time!
None
I have nothing good to say about this Bridal shop. I sent in my measurements for a bridesmaid dress back at the beginning of this year. When I went into the shop to pick up the dress, the store manager Cindy was at the front of the store in an argument with a mother of the bride who she had spoken with on the phone the day before. Apparently the mother was told by Cindy the dress would be half off because it was a discontinued dress. When the mother got there to pay for the dress she was trying to charge her full price. The way she spoke to the mother was extremely condescending, and to argue with her in front of other customers was very unprofessional. It took about 15 minutes for someone to assist me. An associate finally went into the back to grab my dress only to make a pit stop at a bride trying on a dress to chit chat while I waited some more. Finally the other associate at the desk saw me waiting and went to go check on her. After about 30 minutes from the time I entered the store, I finally got to try my dress on, in a dressing room with no mirrors. Size 16 fit perfect, even after they told me I needed a size 18. I’ve been in 2 other weddings this year in a 16 so I think I know my correct size. So granted my first impression was not good. My dress sat in my closet until the wedding. The day of the wedding I went to zip up the dress and the zipper wouldn’t budge past the fabric on the waist belt. I took the dress off, still wouldn’t budge. We tried candlewax and everything else the internet told us and nothing worked, under the zipper finally broke. I had to be sewn into my dress an hour before the wedding. After speaking with Cindy and the owner Jason, they would not refund me a dime, said they have never given a refund period. Every single bridesmaid in our wedding party had nothing but a horrible experience with this shop. Cindy had told 2 of the other girls because they were “blessed on top” they needed a size 20 dress. They had to pay an extra 20 bucks for a “plus size” dress then another $120 to have it altered because it was the wrong size. I’m pretty sure they just suggest bigger sizes to have you spend the extra money to have their seamstress alter it. So I would avoid Blossoms Bridal at all cost!!!!
La verdad, conozco la clínica no como paciente, sino como funcionaria... Tuve muy mala experiencia en la Unidad de Medicina Preventiva, sabía que era estresante trabajar allí, pero el doctor jefe (en ese minuto, el Dr. Trincado) lo hacía ser un infierno. Recuerdo que cuando ingresé allí, no comprendía por qué las secretarias pasaban con licencia y luego dejaban de ir, hasta que me ocurrió a mí. Cuando empecé a sentirme pésimo, un doctor del área me atendió, le pedí que me diera algo que me animara, me quitara el cansancio extremo y el mal dormir, éste me dijo: "tienes un cuadro tensional agudo, pero no te puedo dar licencia porque acá hay mucho trabajo" (textual). Al otro día no me podía levantar, no paraba de llorar y fui a otro médico externo. Me diagnosticó depresión debido a un estrés laboral crónico. Esto era obvio si teníamos exceso de trabajo (cada una hacía el trabajo de 3, teníamos 30 minutos para almorzar, corríamos, nos sobre-exigían a más no poder) Finalmente, como se había hecho con las otras secretarias, llegando de la licencia me despidieron. Dicen que cuando él era simplemente un médico, era más humano, al ascenderlo a Jefe de área, se sentía Dios y ya no miraba la parte humana de su equipo... que lástima!!
房間有霉味，價格實惠，房間算乾淨。
Whatever you do, DO NOT LEAVE the keys and return information in their overnight box. They have lousy return procedures. I rented a vehicle three times from this location in the past month and only one time did they check in the vehicle correctly the next morning. This last time I even took a picture of the odometer when I left it in FRONT of their location and they accused me that I kept the vehicle for an entire week! Talk about ballsy attitude towards a customer. Frankly, they've left a really bad taste. Not sure I'll ever do business with them again.
Lugar donde se juntan unos boludos a esperar que vuelva riquelme . Ja ja que inocentes
I dont know why the sales staff are jerks...im no pro rc car racer..i need help and advise like anyone getting into a new hobby...i followed the warnings about not buying online ..but now i wonder if it was worth it..wanted to support my local shop in trade for a knowlegable and supportive staff ...but these guys dont care if they ever see you again...simply seemed to immersed in their own priorities to help my son and I ..tower hobbies..cheap price without the embarrassment ..
Over cooked, some parts were burnt, not much taste. The worker's explanation was, "I followed the direction exactly." Too bad that this is one of few pizza place in the area.
This company has been calling my house for weeks. I am on DNC list and never done business with them. I'm filing a complaint with the DNC, FCC and BBB.
None
Worst thai food in town.
Another warning to NEVER rent through Desert Wide Properties. From the very beginning of our lease they have been nothing but terrible. When we moved into our townhouse nothing had been cleaned and a number of things were broken. We complained but still had to clean/fix things ourselves. Over the last year and a half we have had several problems and never receive a response to our phone calls or emails. Our AC now went out and they had to order parts for it to be fixed so we'd be without AC overnight. We have a newborn baby and no family in the area so we asked if they'd pay for us to stay in a hotel. Their response was that because it currently was not over 100 degrees they would not as this was not inclement weather. It was over 100 during the day but by the evening it had dropped to the high 90's. Our home was also in the upper 90's. We have rented from several properties over the years and this is by far the worst.
Messy. We came during lunch on Saturday, so we expected it to be busy and it was.. This store seemed to be understaffed, unlike every other chick-fil-a we have been to (we have 3 others that we eat at pretty regularly). This location didn't seem to have anyone working the dining room consistently, which is why there was food and trash on the floor and dirty tables. Also, the underside of the table was so dirty that the table cover for my grand daughter wouldn't stick. We will not be back to this location.
Called several times, with no answer. The website provided doesn't mention Mitsubishi at all.
I booked this hotel for two nights especially for a vacation with my mom who came from Europe. After the long drive we were looking forward to checking in to the luxury hotel room. The receptionists were really nice, but this is the only positive I could relate to. To our disappointment, the facility was really really old, with tape all over the floor and the elevator. Right next to the door to our room, there was plenty of water on the floor (that's how it stayed for 2 days! - nobody came to wipe it off). Inside, the room was looking pretty old, and the sound of AC was extremely loud. But even more annoying was the fact that the counter top in the bathroom, as well the table inside the room was covered with sand. Also there was some hair in the floor of the bathroom. The water in the tub was not going through well. A couple of more "surprises": the cellular reception was very poor and was constantly disconnecting, and the coffee maker in the room was filled with.............milk. Imagine how "thoroughly" they clean their rooms. Another annoying fact is that this old dirty hotel charges extra for literally everything: parking, breakfast, internet for guests. Internet was also so bad, that I had to wait with posting this review until I actually got home. It simply disconnected me from the web every few seconds. And that's for $10 a day. I would never come to this hotel again, and would recommend others to stay away from it. Also, if you happen to be an HHonors, they will try to waste your time and invite you to buy into their Time Share. Guess what? There is no way I would even consider that after such an awful experience!
I ordered a chicken fajita salad online, and after an hour and ten minutes of waiting, they brought me a greek salad. I asked what SHOULD be on the chicken fajita salad (because they have very few menu descriptions), and they said it was the same as the greek salad without feta cheese, which doesn't sound like a chicken fajita salad to me. Then I asked to order something different, but they wouldn't throw in anything extra for their mistake. The delivery driver wouldn't even get out of the car (and didn't apologize) when he returned. Cheesesteak barely had any cheese on it. Fries are good. TL;DR: food is mediocre, customer service sucks.
None
So they have a great ad on TV. I stop by and "We don't participate in that". Last time I did eat there they tried to charge me $23 for a medium! because we had three toppings one each half. And they were not the same. I did NOT pay what they wanted. We did NOT get double the amount, just took them more time to top it.
None
Went in the day after Christmas to see if they had any great marked down special. They didn't & I was disappointed. Also, the store was very cold - had to keep my heavy coat on & there were hardly any shoppers in the store (11 AM). Every time I go into this store, none of the staff (except cashiers) greet you or even smile. I thought they had a rule about smiling at customers & greeting them within so many feet. I've encountered this at every Wal-Mart in Arizona. It didn't used to be that way. The staff here is constantly busy re-doing displays or pricing during the day including peak hours, which is very annoying. I've seen stocking of shelves being done at peak hours, making it hard to go down the rows, especially in the grocery area. I went to Target right afterwords which was much busier, had more markdowns & the store was a very comfortable temperature. At Target, I was greeted by no less than 3 employees, all of who asked my if I was finding what I needed. Looks like I'll need to boycott Wal-Mart, at least for awhile.
I will never go back to this place again. I loved the washers. The dryers took for ever to dry. When I needed to break a bill to add more money to my card, I was told I had to buy something. I had already spent $30.00 and obviously going to spend more but got told this crap. so I walked out with half of my clothes wet. I'm really sorry Justin was such a jerk and lost the company a customer. I'm hoping more after this post!
This is not a listing for the Museum...
Crystal Pure installed a whole house water filtration system in my home years ago and they are the only firm in the area that can service it. Which is too bad because we get maintenance done once a year and people they send out are CLUELESS. They break things, leave a mess, and sometimes don't even do the work they are supposed to. Once a service person didn't show up and when I called the next day it turns out he'd sat in the driveway waiting for me for an hour--AT THE WRONG ADDRESS. By that time, we'd been using them, at our same address, for 15 years. Avoid this company and you'll avoid a LOT of frustration.
Don't even think about renting here, I repeat, MOVE ON don't rent here!!! I signed a lease here 2 months ago out of necessity and location, HUGE mistake. The manager was surely high on crack or meth the day I moved in, she's since been fired. Apparently they change managers here like you change socks. The maintenance crew here are about as useful as a sack of rocks. There is a huge hole in the parking lot where they've been trying to fix a water leak for over two months, that's right, one leaky pipe and they've been working on it for two months. Not only that, as of today, it's been 4 days since we've had hot water. Nobody in the complex has hot water and the current manager offers nothing but "we're working on it". This place is trash, run by trash, steer clear not worth a penny to live here.
None
There is no post office at this location.
Just stopped here, its closed up. Nothing inside.
I want to say that I'm sorry this place is closed, but the one time I ate there it almost killed my girlfriend at the time. You may assume I'm exaggerating, but I'm not so sure. You see, she had this clam chowder soup which was kind of not so warm and all that, and not long afterward she got this crazy, crazy high fever which lasted for days. Scary stuff.
Closed. Another Italian restaurant is in the location.
I gave it two stars only because they always have what I am looking for but... I have visited this store on several occasions and each time I have went to the checkout lanes there is usually only one or two lanes open. Today was the last time I will ever shop this location again. I have stood patiently in lines that were 7-8 people with no one, including managers, standing within a close distance attempting to open another register. One manager yelling out that customers could even out the lines by going to the other register. IF you have to visit an AC Moore, I would suggest visiting the one in Cary at Crossroads. The people are friendlier, they will open a new lane when there are more than 3 people in a lane AND the managers are willing to work those lanes with the associates.
I recently got food poisoning from this exact restaurant a couple of days ago. I've been doing nothing but throwing up everything for the past two days.
They say free wi-fi, but it's quite slow and they want to charge you daily for faster speeds. They only change the linens weekly; that's what extended stay means. It is quite affordable considering the region. My room smelled like Chinese take-out food when I arrived, but I be came accustomed to it. There's a full sized refrigerator that makes noise more often and more loudly than a quality residential refrigerator should. There was a spider in my room. Water pressure is feeble in the bathroom sink and shower. The sink drain mechanism fell apart when I pulled the rod to open the drain, so I just pulled the whole stopper out of the drain pipe.
Lots of bumps in the bike path. Seek alternate route.
The store has a really great beer selection, but the manager is a sneaky liar when you're not one of his recognized regular customers. I was in his store a few days before the release of a big beer and talked to him a bit about it. He said he would have it in later that week. I happened to be at his store right when he received the beer later that week and even though I saw it right there on the floor, he said that he couldn't sell it to non regular customers. First off I hate liquor stores that hold back any product entirely for their friends or a few notable regulars. Second, he could have just told me earlier that week that while he is getting some in, it is all reserved, but I guess he knew I'd be back and hoped I'd spend some more money there anyway. He was dishonest to me, a customer, and wasted my time. I will not shop am establishment that disrespects their customers just because they aren't regulars.
They called an hour before our reservation time to basically inform us they canceled our reservation! Terrible customer service, will never go there again.
Horrible service. It took 10 minutes for someone to come to our table. An hour to get our food, and still my husband got his food, finished, and I didn't get mine. My food was disgusting. Some parts were burnt and the eggs were badly cooked . There was so much mayonnaise on his egg sandwich that the bread was moist, and just no attentiveness by the waitress.
I Have been waiting over two hours for my pizza. tried to call but it goes to a voice ad. I ordered through online, they sent me a confirmation and everything but i'm still waiting for pizza!! BAD CUSTOMER SERVICE!!
Came out twice to try to fix the same thing in our Fridge, Failed twice, But was sure they got there money...Decided to go by a new fridge. Figured might as well for what they were gonna charge me a third time.
Very nice people and also very helpful however, VERY expensive!! I've NEVER paid $50 for an OIL CHANGE! I'll just drive into Fort Collins next time!!
This is the worst "hotel" I've ever stayed in. It isn't even a hotel, it is a motel with outside entrances to the rooms. The room was dark, dank and musty (probably from the thriving mildew colony growing in the shower). The room is tiny and cramped. The mattress was cheap, hard and lumpy. The pillows are very small and uncomfortable. The coffee pot in my room hadn't been cleaned since the last guest and there was no coffee anyway (except for decaf). The breakfast consists of some stale packaged danishes and other bread. One morning there wasn't any orange juice or coffee. I wouldn't stay here again even if it was free.
Skip even looking at Furniture XO for furniture. We waited over 3 months for our dining set, and they still didn't have a confirmed date of their warehouse receiving it. They will give you an estimate of 6-8 weeks standard, but will not return your phone calls and will keep delaying.
They don't answer their phones, and they are horrible at helping you in-store. I got to say this must be the first target I will stay clear from. We are in a down economy, better employees shouldn't be hard to come by.
They argued with the insurance company for two weeks, trying to raise the amount of the repairs. During this time, the representative chosen to help us, K., went to training for a number of days while he was supposed to be working on our case. No other rep took over the handling of our case. We only received communication after leaving multiple messages for the rep via email and phone. He felt that updating us once every week and a half was more than sufficient. During the time that our car was in their shop, there was a hailstorm, and our car was damaged again. I know that, as he insisted, they're not in control of the weather, but a call notifying us of the damage so I could file a separate claim would have been nice. He didn't even see the hail damage (because he wasn't paying attention to detail) or tried to pass the vehicle off to us at handover without mentioning it. He argued with my husband in the parking lot for about a half an hour about whether or not they should have called us. There were smudges of compound remaining on the car, and the gas tank shield was not properly placed. Shoddy service, shoddy everything, and an argument and hail damage during the time my vehicle should have been in my garage to boot. They didn't even bother to wash the car for us. This all sounds like tiny petty stuff but it added up real quick. I won't go back to them if at all possible, and I recommend that anybody else who wants their car to be repaired be prepared to hound their rep and carefully inspect the vehicle afterwards, and prepare to rent a car for two weeks while they try to get more money out of your insurance company. He actually had the gall to say we should remember when reviewing their customer service survey that they gave us the car back "a day early". In actuality, it was ready the day *before* that but the rep neglected to call us until after it was too late to pick up the car. As for the actual repairs...who knows. Time will tell.
None
I had a blown fuse -- I knew it because I replaced the fuse myself, and things worked -- until it blew again. They quoted me a price to track down the short, then proceeded to just replace the fuse without doing the work they'd agree to. Naturally, the fuse blew before I'd even left the parking lot. They insisted on still charging me for the work -- a reduced rate, but still, this was a job I could -- and had -- done myself for a buck. I explained all this to them, but still wasn't able to get my car out of the shop without paying them for their "work." I would not trust them as far as I could throw them. Only take your car to them if you have a lot of money and don't mind parting ways with it needlessly.
Um hotel de pessima categoria
This has to be the worst place I have ever tried to do business with! Three plus weeks ago i called them for a price to have an above ground pool liner installed in my pool. I was told they were about a week and a half out. They sent their installer out to look at it and got back to me with a price. I told them to go ahead and do the work and they took credit card information. 21/2 weeks later I called to find out schedule. That was on a Sunday and was promised early of that week. No show. No call (real professional). Very patiently called on Wednesday. Was told by Friday it would be done. Its now Friday late afternoon and still no show and no call. Call them back. Installer is there (must be real busy). He gets on the phone with me with a chip on his shoulder (it must be my fault that theyve made 2 broken promises to me) and basically tells me he'll get to it when he gets to it. I'll be calling someone else. How do companies like this stay in business....
Been a regular for a couple months, and I always had good results in the past (only when I'm not dealing with their manager). However, in a most recent service they ironed a ruffled shirt incorrectly: The way they did it left a lot of cleavage open. Unacceptable, since this is a business casual clothing item (which I explained). I politely brought this to their attention, but the manager yelled at me for not knowing that this IS the correct way to do it. Well, obviously not, since I bought the shirt in one way, (and brought it in looking the way I bought it but dirty) so it ought to look the way it does. I failed to see how apologizing for a mistake and doing a proper press to fix it is such a huge issue. No apologies were given. So rude that I left feeling very frustrated and angry. They did not want to fix it, but in the end did a half-assed job that completely ruined the pleats.
I have stayed at his hotel at least 6 times. This was the last. The valet parking is very poorly managed, you often have to sit and wait while they watch guests try to figure out what to do, nobody directing the two cramped lanes, one of which always seems to have an empty car just sitting there. The rooms are ridiculously small for the rate and the bathrooms are low end. They had cheap scott TP and a second fresh roll was jammed into the holder area so the roll in use could not even be rolled. No safe in the room, but you can put your valuables in the microwave. The lobby is really nice as are the checkin staff, but the rooms and valet are always pretty much subpar. The Westin is much nicer but the location is not quite as desirable. Lately you cannot even book a room for one night on the weekend via the web, you have to call and I was not given the rate discussed on the phone. That was the last straw.
Worst hospital..no duty docs..nurses dont know wat they r doing..post op care and pain management is worst..nurses r entering vitals without checking..
Oh, they do the job alright, but they're never friendlier than they have to be. No one here acts like they really want to be there or want the job, which makes customers feel like they should get lost and stop adding to the irritation. Part of this effect is probably from being located in snooty-town, Shorewood, but this location is 100% of the reason I started a private account with UPS, who apologized and said they're not responsible for franchise locations like this one. My advice to the employees is: try treating the customers like people that you actually enjoy meeting, not like a nuisance.
This place has the worst service. I dropped my boat off for a tune up and fix a water leak. They had it for 4 weeks to do this charged me 300 dollars. I got home and leak isn't fixed. Took it back and owner said she would make it right by not charging me any labor to fix it right and said it would take 2 weeks so I agreed. 7 weeks later after numerous calls decided to go get it. They did nothing, didnt even order gaskets they needed. There customer service is horrible. Never take anything here that needs work
None
None
None
Horrible experience for New Years. Management is clearly concerned only about dollar signs and crammed as many people as they could through the door. Venue did not live up to expectations. I would avoid Solas and support a club that gives genuine interest in their customers.
I would never use this company again, they have not fix the problem with my washer an they where call back an no show .. then call again an still did not fix washer do not use them....
My wife has been going to this dentist for about a year now and has really liked the service. They have always been very gentle when cleaning her teeth and are personable people. My wife scheduled her last visit because she chipped her tooth and wanted to try and take care of it before the Christmas holidays. So she made an appointment and had the tooth repaired and all was well. She asked how much she owed and they told her it was covered, that she didn't owe anything. A few days ago we received a bill in the mail that charged us for an emergency appointment. They claim that their policy is if you schedule an appointment outside of the standard 2 checkups per year it is considered an emergency. They didn't mention anything about this being an emergency appointment over the phone when my wife scheduled this, they just slapped on a $75 fee because they want to. I was very disappointed when we talked to them about this issue and they acted like they didn't care, they said it was just their policy. Needless to say we will be finding another dentist that doesn't tack on hidden fees.
I recently had an encounter with Kiwi Carpet Cleaning Services, LLC. It was not a good encounter. Before the technician arrived, he informed me that the gratuity was not included in the coupon I purchased from Google Offers. I was okay with that, since I wasn't thinking of paying a gratuity for carpet cleaning services anyway. When he arrived at the house, outside of the original schedule service window, I might add, I ask was that normal procedure to ask for a gratuity. He stated to me yes, since I wasn't really paying for the service, since I was using a coupon. So, I ask what about the $65 I paid. He said, that wasn't really for the service. I felt as though my intelligence was being royally insulted. So, I told him to just come on in the get started. I think he didn't care much for my suggestion that he should come in and get to work and enough of the small meaningless conversation. He quickly decided he wasn't going to do the job and abruptly left. I was stunned, how can a business operate as such. I immediately decided to write a review on this. Everyone, be careful when you get this service. I don't want anyone else to have the experience I had. I left a message with the number on the Google Offers couple. I didn't get an answer and no call back. If I don't get the service I paid for, I will file a lawsuit against the company.
i got my garage door installed by doors in motion and in less than aweek the door was off track,i called them back and the guy wont send me a repairman unless i pay the trip charge,after i threatened them by calling my lawyer they sent me a repairman driving a sedan car that he had to call another worker since he didnt have tools with him.very bad experience and nightmare.i would never recommend them.
We arrived around 8 and were seated promptly. Our service was slow, another couple, same wait staff, had drinks, app and dinner in the time it took for our dinner to show up. Seafood stew had 1 Scallop, 2 Shrimp and some shreds of fish. Seafood broth was more like it.
Relação com clientes muito fraca. Correção de faturações não efetuada em tempo. Corte de comunicações sem qualquer aviso prévio e sem qualquer informação sobre reclamação de faturação mal efetuada.
I am giving 2 stars purely because the staff was indeed nice, however, I will give you some very insightful info on the CHARGES. I took my son here because he cut his finger. I really just wanted to make sure it wasn't infected and this place was close to my house (in a strip mall). They were very nice, put a bandaid on his finger and said it would be fine. Paid $100 up front. Fast-forward a month and I get a bill for $2,100 from FCER. I don't know about you, but I know what a bandaid cost and I know we were there a total of 15 minutes and I know not even lawyers charge $8,000/hr so to me this was robbery. I understand a nurse looked at it and said it was ok and I am willing to pay for that, but $2,100?! Maybe the rest of you think I am being silly, but I never expected that even if I had gone to a hospital ER. They charge a fortune, so if you need non-life threatening care go elsewhere if at all possible. I would have hated to see what it would cost if they had to do anything at all.
I was given an oil change package as part of my purchase from Cavenaugh. Every time I took my truck in for an oil change I was told that everything else on their "100 Point Check" was in the green. However, I just took my truck to have some things fixed at my preferred mechanic and wouldn't you know it--my brakes are bad. Not only are they bad, but I needed new rotors since mine were "far too gone for continued use". The funny thing is that last time Cavenaugh changed my oil I asked them about my brakes and the man told me point blank that they were great and still had at least another year on them. That was 4 months ago. Brakes don't go that bad that fast.
Service department was courteous and quick to answer calls but has been unable to solve a factory issue on my F150 after 4 visits. Issue was water leading into cabin.
From the time we moved in to the time we moved out the front office staff has never had the same answer twice for the exact same question. They overcharge for EVERYTHING, on our last day we went in to pay our final utility bill and it was $60, the front desk woman said no its only $30, so we paid the final bill, Just for them to take out $61.99 from deposit for our "final utility bill." The complex is nice don't get me wrong but if you are not an aviation student you don't matter to Weidner (the management company). They have horrible customer service if you call, you can bet they 1. won't pick up or 2. will be extremely rude with you, and don't bother leaving a voicemail they never call back. From the first month to the last month my roommate and I had nothing but issues at Aspire and we were there over a year and a half. From our first bill being incorrect to our last "bill." Needless to say I will never live at another Weidner owned property.
I was in there and had asked for a fuel filter and he pulled it up said no, well i used to work at an auto parts store so i got on their computer and OMG i found it, brought it to their attention didn't but the part and will never go there again
While the store is well maintained, I found the staff very bias when it comes to men. While in the store. My husband, who was looking around on his own, was asked numerous times if he needed any help whil I was completely ignored. Not a store for women.
Quite pricey for average buffet seafood. 2 Adults, 6 year old = ~$85. Food just was not that good. Dessert looked so bad we decided to go somewhere else for dessert. Definitely should have chosen a nice seafood place instead.
The man serving tried to cheat me with very small pieces because I was taking it away. I opened the box (he didnt expect me to) and the pieces were very tiny for thee money. I spoke to him about it and he got very angry and asked for his money back! WOW.
None
Awful customer service would be putting it nicely. I paid extra to have an item next day delivered. I miss the original delivery because they came by before our store was open, no problem. FedEx and UPS will come back later in the day, Purolator won't. I called and asked if they could attempt delivery at 10am or later instead of 9am, the customer service representative just said 8-6 sir. I asked if they could add a note to my file asking for a later delivery, his response, '8-6 sir'. I asked if I could pick it up this evening, the answer was unsurprisingly no. The representative was rude, and offered no information or assistance other than '8-6 sir'. Chances are good they will come to drop it off again before 10 and I will miss my package again. It is a good thing I paid the extra money for next day delivery. From Now on UPS gets my business.
I feel like the employee has disdain for my business.
Just Good for the local people of Dilshad Garden ... not a good place.
I was a bridesmaid in a friend's wedding this past summer. I went in to this David's Bridal, with no appointment, becuase I was told I didn't need one, and waited about 30 minutes for someone to acknowledge me. I finally went and found an employee who was hiding behind the desk reading a magazine. Very professional. I said who I was and who's wedding I was there for and she looked it up. I already knew pretty much what I needed since the bride had problems with the store she dealt with in the first place. This girl didn't even pull my options for me. She pointed in the general direction of what I needed and went back to her hiding. So I'm digging through the mess over seperates trying to figure out which tops were my options and another lady came by and yelled at me for going through the inventory. I explained the steps that had gotten me there, she apologized and offered to pull what I needed and sent me to a fitting room. I told her I needed an 18 for the top and a 14 for the bottoms, she measured to make sure, and then brought me a sizes 6, 22, and 26 for tops, and a 10 for the skirt. Really? And then she didn't even help pin them in the back so I could kind of see what it would look like, and obviously I didn't even try the 6 on. In fact she never came back. I do understand that brides come first. No problem. But it isn't hard to stop by for 10 seconds and just check in. Anyhoo, I went to order my stuff and magazine girl kept trying to order me extra stuff. I kept telling her no, I'm not supposed to have 2 sashes, why would I need sashes at all, but she wouldn't listen. So I called the bride :D I let them know too that I lived about 2 hours away and worked mostly nights, so we needed to work something out, since you only have 7 days to pick up an order. I ended up having to take a half day off work to pick it up. That's not the only bad experience I've had with David's in general, I tell everyone not to buy anything there unless you can get it straight off the rack.
Cant get anyone to answer phone.
Called to price a crown replacement, Was greeted by an angry, uninterested woman who seemed to be barely paying attention. Asked for price (highest of anyone I've spoken with today) and again had to repeat what I was asking for a price on. loud music was playing in the background. all in all a terrifying first impression.
None
Not the best. Very slow during rush
First and last time in this park
Terrible customer service, these guys have little to no motivation, technical know-how, or people skills. I was given in over inflated estimate for a strut replacement, and was given a copy with no explaination of the form, the cost, or the math. When I asked for the run-down, the service gentleman, answered the phone and said he could not pull up a copy of the estimate. Not only that, he had the gall to tell me if I wanted the total I would have to add it up myself, and do the math myself without listing any of the numbers and totals on the form. Then rudely dismissed me. BTW, if this is read by anyone in power, his name is Larry...get rid of him before he damages what little reputation you have left. You have just lost a customer for life, and will gladly pay more at another shop to never have to set foot in your store again.
Park is OK, but pricing is a complete rip off for the area and the fact it's also a fair way out of town and there is nothing around it (ie decent shops / restaurants). Asked for the cheapest back-in full hookup site (22ft motorhome) and they wanted over $50 a night. And this is in winter. Ridiculous considering most parks in the area are $20 to $30 per night. As it was late, ended up geting water /elec site only, but still set me back $45. Was planning to stay 4 nights, now just staying one and will find a more reasonably priced campground. Put it this way, I paid less for a site at the KOA that is right on the Las Vegas Strip. And that's the most I've every paid for a RV site.
Słabo. Po wpłaceniu kwoty wymaganej przez bank na konkretny dzień, dowiedziałem się że należy jeszcaze dopłacić 1500zł. Nikt nie potrafi powiedzieć co to za kwota i skąd się wzięła... Niestety czekają mnie jeszcze przynajmniej dwa lata spłacania tych .................. .
I had my boyfriend go to Dunkin Donuts to pick up some donuts on 06/01/2012 at 9:15pm. He then informed me via text that they were out of Donuts. How can a place that mainly serves Donuts be OUT!! The employee informed my boyfriend that it was national Donut Day. Ok thats fine but maybe better preperation would haved been nice. I am very disappointed in this. Hopefully next year they can be better prepared.
The Loan Officer Mike Phillips seemed real cool about everything. The wife and I ended up taking Mike out for drinks later that evening. Every thing seemed strait and Mike seemed cool. We hadn't spoken to him for a couple weeks when I find out this guys nuts. This guys sketchy! Not like cable guy sketchy. More like, I drove up to my house and found my Loan guy by the side of my house. looking through our window. No reason to be there and we never gave him our address accept for our loan. I played it cool for a sec. but the Wife wasn't so calm. Mike states,"I was just stoping buy to see if you guys wanted to go for a drink." Wife says, "I dont think so and get off our property, think you would call first! He then tells her to F#@* her self. Says he wasn't even there. Weird! I then tell him to get off the property before the cops are called. Long story short. Watch out for this guy!!!!!!!!!!!!! WE MOVED OUR BUSINESS ELSE WHERE OBVIOUSLY.
It should be renowated. Dirty showers and changers. Water in showers flows very slow so it takes hours to take a shower. People are friendly and steam bath is ok. But that does not mke the area more clean and hygienic.
I called this location and spoke with the manager, Russ. I informed him that my car would not start but I did not think it was a dead battery. He referred me to an 800 number where I could get assistance with having my car towed to the garage. They then sent Eric Hamilton Towing to where I was stuck. The employee who showed up tried to start my car and said it was a dead battery and immediately preceded to jump start my car. After successfully starting my car he said to head down to Russ at Goodyear to have it checked out and get a new battery. He took down some information from my car and drove off. I went to a different place to purchase a new battery as it was cheaper than Russ quoted me for at Goodyear. After getting a new battery I went to the Goodyear Service Center to see Russ as I was not sure if I was being charged for the jump start. Upon arriving to Goodyear Auto Service Center I was rudely greeted by Russ who acted like he did not know if I was being charged. He said he would not get a bill for 2 weeks if he was being charged and he would have to call the 800 number that he originally referred me to so he could find out if he was being charged. He stated that he was not going to charge me if he was not being charged. I stood there while he called to find out and when he was finished, he hung up the phone and said they were in fact charging him and that I would need to pay him $40 for a tow (that I did not receive in actuality). I did not argue and paid the fee to him and left. Right after I left, I received an automated survey call from that 800 number asking to complete a short survey regarding the service. I spoke directly with someone because I wanted to inform them that I was being charged for a service that I did not actually receive. They then told me that I was not to be charged because Eric Hamilton Towing was not charging for the jump start. They also stated they had told Russ at Goodyear that there were no charges. I called Eric Hamilton Towing myself to confirm that they were not charging for anything and the female supervisor there stated they were not charging as I was not towed. After confronting Russ with this information, he became extremely rude and requested someone from this 800 number to call and speak with him directly. (I do not know the name of the company this all started through.) I became extremely furious as Russ lied to my face and scammed me out of $40 for nothing. He did however agree to refund me the money and when I returned to the location for the refund, Russ had left the building. After dealing with other rude employees who acted like there was nothing they could do even after Russ told me on the phone he would refund me my money, I finally got my refund. It was quite a fiasco. I am fairly certain that Russ realized he got caught taking this money and called Eric Hamilton Towing himself to find out why they said they were not charging for a jump start. After all, he referred me to this company for the tow originally and has a close relationship with this company. 30 minutes after I spoke with Russ and he had agreed to refund me the money, I received a call from the lady who I had spoke with at Eric Hamilton Towing stating that they were now charging for a jump start which happened to be $45 (which is more than the $40 the tow would have costed had my car been towed.) She became very hostile and threatened me to come pay her immediately or she was going to call the cops and press charges for theft of services and have the cops put a boot on my car.
Can I use your bathroom, I only have $4.00? You Suck!! Cleaning a bathroom is just part of owning a restaurant.....Worst business practice ever! The fact that you had the Local Sheriff run someones plates id horrible, I hope you loose your Business and the Sheriff looses his Job!!!!
This location is shut down.
None
My house is very close to this restaurant and I really do not prefer to go there.
I bought $3000.00 worth of trees from this company. They all Died within 10 months. I cannot even get a phone call from the owner even though I have made several trips to the nursery and filed a complaint with the Better Business Bureau. Not just one or two trees died. All Twenty trees purchased died within ten months. Very poor way to do business. I cannot recommend this company. I will not be doing anymore business at Faltz Nursery. Tony Lawrence @Tony's Enterprises
Well, first off this team would like to embarrass you if you come in with something that THEY can't figure out and proceed to infuriate you without any concern on their part. My experience started out ok--they gave me a replacement phone when my screen died. I had to take my phone back in because 1. the screen has a film of some sort on it that I couldn't get off even with an alcohol wipe and 2. all of my contacts didn't come over. Welll, when I tried to show them my screen, the hateful man from the "service" department wiped it with his cloth before even looking at what I was trying to show him and stated as he plopped the phone on the counter "ma'am, there's nothing on that phone". Now, anyone who has ever worked a moment in customer service knows you don't try to make your customer look like a fool or that they are "seeing things". I stated well, there was something on there that I coudn't get off or I wouldn't have mentioned it. Again, the man with a smart attitute said "there's nothing on that phone". Well, I asked to have someone else assist me and so Pam helped me get the remainder of my contacts converted over. She is kind and helpful. Once that finished, I walked outside and the same film I saw before showed up-so I walked right back in and let them know that there was indeed still something on the screen. Instead of taking a look at it where I was--another smart alek worker took the phone to the back and I could hear them all laughing saying "I can't see anything"...and just carried on at my expense. The guy brought it back and said again---"there's nothing on your phone" I said, there was...and that I am sure it would come back as it already had and also let him know that I could hear them all laughing and I didn't feel like that was very good service and that they all could use a good lesson in what that meant---IT IS OBVIOUS SPRINT DOESN'T CARE ABOUT SERVICE!!!!!! Good luck if you buy a sprint phone and especially from this store. It is RIDICULOUS that 2 days later, I am still mad about my experience. So much so that I bought a new Galaxy Note II from VERIZON and will be CANCELING MY SERVICE WITH SPRINT...NEVER TO RETURN.
Gillman does not support their Veterans.( At least not this one) We have purchased a car there and I have refered friends and Veterans to the Gillman organization, and get all of our servicing there for 5 years now. Today that stops. Because I am a Disabled Veteran my credit is not the best. My husband and I are needing a second vehicle, so of course our first choice was Gillman Nissan of Fort Bend or Gillman Honda of Fort Bend, how ever, I was told today by Chris Gillman, that I could have the car I wanted, If I paid my bills. I went to Chris because I was insulted and upset by the General Manager Pete Harvey on an earlier prospective deal and made it clear I did not want to deal with him again. They do not have my best interest at heart, and was just looking to make a sale
Our car wash was bunk, make sure you check your vehicle before you drive off. Sad, we just had a "full" service wash, paid out $18 with a $2 tip and when I called and spoke with "Daryl" to explain the rims had not been touched, I was told "oh we don't touch the rims unless you pay for it" "sorry no one told you that". So in their opinion the "outside" of the vehicle does not include the rims. What a joke.
None
Went to web site to get 2 tickets for December 5th, and it says no tickets are being issued. What's up?
Beware, Just Brakes advertises one price but will try and upsale you. I was originally quoted $172 but later told I needed $2000 worth of work. I was told I needed their maintenance pkg even though it had been less than 2000 miles since I did Lube, oil, filter. I was told I needed rear axle seals even though they weren't leaking nor was the rear differential low on oil. I was told the calipers needed to be rebuilt, and the rotors needed to be replaced, none of which was needed. At one point they asked me what I was willing to spend to make the vehicle safe, I declined to answer. In the end I allowed them to replace 1 rotor (due to scoring) and machine the rest. When my daughter picked the car up they told her the rear axle seals needed to be replaced before the vehicle caught fire. These people are unbelievable, how do they sleep at night lying to people like that. DO NOT USE JUST BRAKES, they will rip you off.
Food is old and cold. Always felt sick after leaving.
Numerous issues with Doctors,staff and billing. In regards to staff professionalism, on more than one occasion I witnessed the desk staff labeling interracial clients using acronyms such as DWA (Dad with Asian) MWB (Mom with Black), etc. On one of my first visits I requested that a specific test not be done since my insurance does not cover it, and the doctors' office charges an overly excessive fee for the service. The doctor states, not to worry that they will not charge the fee if it is not covered. Well of course it was not covered, and then the office refused to honor the doctor's word to us leaving us with a hefty fee. Subsequent visits also resulted in at least a tripling of the bill on top of the doctors office fee because they involved the simplest of tests such as pulse oximetry and use of their nebulizer (not the cost of the medicine) that honesty cost maybe $1, yet the office charges $40 per test/treatment leaving the patient with an outrageous bill that if I had known how hyperinflated their charges were, I would have never consented to these things that I could do at home. Note: A nebulizer from a medical supply store cost $30-$50. When confronted with the cost reality of their procedures, the billing office response is "we can charge whatever we want" . While true, shows that they have no regard for their patients, only the mighty dollar bill. Just about all insurance plans are including higher and higher deductibles, and the greed of this office comes directly out of your pocket. I have found a much more reputable practice that does not gouge their client base.
None
Be Careful!! This Facility lures you in on a reasonable rate then starts raising it after 1 year. The reviews about friendly customer service are correct. This is a upper managment issue, not staff. I pulled everything out once the rate approached $300.00. There are much more reasonable alternatives close by.
I have never in my life had such a horrific experience at Wal Mart. I grew up going to Wal mart, love Wal mart and always get SUPER excited about my Wal mart trips. They always have the products and materials I need at very fair prices. Today, however, a walmart employee verbally assaulted me. I was waiting to check out in the 15 items or less line and a walmart employee was trying to get by with her cart. She just stood in front of me and glared and sighed acting as though I was inconviencing her. I quickly and politely asked her if I needed to move and she continued with her snarled look and slightly shook her head yes. I replied, "ma'am all you had to do was say excuse me" in which case she pushed me and my cart aside and walked away with her empty cart. Just 20 seconds later she walked back up to me and started screaming at me in front of everyone saying that she did say excuse me and cursing at me. I was absolutely humiliated. I kept repeating "ma'am I hope you have a great day, ma'am I hope your day gets better" and she just kept screaming. Finally she walked away from me, walked back to her cash register (about 4 down from me) and kept screaming at me from that far away. Again- absolutely humiliating. I quickly checked out and then requested to speak with the manager. When the manager approached, before I could even finish my story he interrupted me and said ma'am first of all I'm so sorry- let me take care of this and walked away in the opposite direction- never to be heard from again. This place is a joke in terms of customer service and I know for a FACT Wal Mart has higher standards than this. As mentioned previously, I have been a faithful Wal Mart customer nearly my entire life and never have I seen such terrible customer service. I hope their business etiquette greatly improves but I will NOT be in support of this particular Wal Mart establishment ever again.
None
Very Poor. I transferred my mail a month in advance of my move date. 22 days after my move still no mail at my new address. I am missing some important documents such as bills, etc. When I tried to call no one picked up. Finally someone picked up but was rude and unprofessional. She said she would tell the carrier to "start" transferring my mail and then hung up. I have tried calling again but no answer. I really need my mail! Where is it?
None
Had windshield replace in July 2012 on a 05 Acura MDX. Poor experience. They didn't attach the trim properly for the review mirror, then when they tried to fix it they broke the windshield and damaged the center console LCD display. I had to bring it back another day to get the windshield replaced again and they only offered to pay for half of the replacement LCD display ($1000 new or $400 used) and would provide the labour. Now 6 months later my rear view mirror just fell off and is just hanging by a wire... I'm not impressed.
I had the lovely Groupon experience as well. Although I was charged an additional $45 dollars. I was told the Groupon covered one bowl of color and each additional bowl was $15 (Which was not published in the fine print). I was told 3 bowls should cover my hair. I wasn't real happy about it, but I thought $50 for the Groupon plus an extra $30...eh not happy but its a little too late once your in the chair. Although the haircut and color was nice. I see no "deal" in paying $95. You got me in the door and then made me pay MORE than I normally do. Wonder why people didn't make an appointment for a 2nd time??? Cause Single moms need to budget and the old Bait and Switch can only work once before people learn their lessons.
真的收起來囉~連扛棒都拆掉了
This review is for North Little Rock: DO NOT GO TO THIS PLACE - They should be shut down!!! I went to this place today to get my car washed. Short story, the job was not done correctly (large amounts left on front, back and side). I went back within 20 minutes to ask them to do it over again. The supposed manager (who actually turned out to be the the ticket writer) indicated that it would not come off and there was nothing they would do. I demanded that they correct it and to speak to a manager.. I was told there was nothing they could do and that I needed to leave. I asked for the owners name and his name and he provided me with a brochure with a number to call and told me his name was Cole. I told him I was not going to leave until I talked to the owner at which time he said that he was going to call the police because I was blocking the lane (there were no cars and I was not yelling or screaming or cursing, but I was determined to get satisfaction). We pulled off to an adjacent property and tried to reach the owners (we could not get them). While talking on the phone with the manager of the other shop in Little Rock where the owner was supposed to be.. 6 North Little Rock Police personnel approached my car and told me that I was potenital being charged with Criminal Trespass.. Criminal Trespass!!!! For complaining and asking that they do the job right?? In the end the police knew this was garbage.. I am in my car with my wife and 10 year old grandchild in a minivan.. I must have looked like a real threat. There actions were uncalled for, they did not even attempt to offer alternatives and in the end I was told not to come back... That my friends is a given, and I hope you don't either..
beware of the low quote pricing from the dealership as it may be just a way to lure the customer. Once you agreed on the price, they bail and simply try to appologize and say it's a mistake and so on...... really fed up with that attitude and leave me speechless of how irresponsible they can be....
If you love to dig through piles of stuff, question what the prices are and never get service this is the place for you. This place is filled with some cool stuff but even more junk. The prices are a little high and I have never found the staff helpful. The one upside is the lumber dept, if you can find something that isn't already sold you will have some amazing reclaimed lumber.
None
Belle place pour se faire remorquer son char quand on est client ... Je ne conseil a personne d'aller À CE WEND'YS ,le remorqueur te surveille dans la cours et si tu as le malheur de mettre ton pieds dehors du terrain après ton hamburger , il va se faire un ravir de remorquer ta voiture!!!
None
None
서비스가 안 좋아요
Although the temperature was in the mid 30's the air conditioner failed to work. We had no assistance from the staff who seemed incapable to help us! The owner was away at a funeral. When we did get to speak to her she was very irate and quite rude. She had said that the air conditioning was working but she was wrong! As I have high blood pressure that heat for me was intolerable. We had no alternative but to leave, late at night, and travel back home. She did give us a credit note, good for a year. But when we tried to use the credit note i.e. sell it to someone on kijiji the rooms seemed unavailable! We paid $1800 for two bedrooms. We never got to sleep there! We paid for a gourmet meal which the owner did not reimburse us for. NOT IMPRESSED.
Lugar donde engañan a descuidados turistas !!!! Cuidado
I went to this place yesterday after my pomeranian seemed to have gotten into my trash and eaten something that made her sick. The doc took a look at her, asked a few questions then looked at me and said he can do xrays or blood work, but he didnt know what was wrong with her. So I said whatever you recommend. He said I'll run back and schedule some blood work. He quickly walked out of the office. At this point, I haven't received any estimates on the cost, I'd only been told the exam was $49. I get called up to the desk to get my dog and then am told I owe $500! The doc didn't tell me he was taking xrays and no one told me how much it would be. I feel completely taken advantage of, my dog is still sick and now I'm out extra money for the holidays.DO NOT GO HERE. It's a complete waste of time and money.
Absolutely awful and dishonest. I will start by saying two things; first, I am credit challenged and I was up front about that from the beginning. Second, I sold cars as a special finance director and internet sales manager for a number of years and I know the ins and outs of the business. That being said, I spoke with a salesman, Dan on the phone on a Wednesday evening. I explained my situation with my credit and my relatively limited income. Dan asked me to submit a credit application, which is pretty much standard operating procedure. I did, along with proof of income and a copy of my driver's license. Again, this is all standard and I had absolutely no problems with doing this. Dan said he was going to go to work on my deal with a couple different vehicles that they currently had on the lot. He told me all the great stories about getting people approved and into a vehicle who were worse off than I was, credit-wise. I knew the approval (known as a "call") they would get from the bank, if any, was going to be ugly. It was going to be a hard deal to get done. Again, I know this and I was very much up front. No problem, I was told repeatedly. I am also from Pleasant Prairie, and it would require my wife and I, along with our three children to make a trip up to Milwaukee; about 40 miles, to purchase the vehicle. I wanted to make sure that we could put something together before I packed up the crew and headed up. I was strung along all weekend, but eventually told that the vehicle Dan had selected wouldn't work, but the good news was there are other vehicles that would probably work if I was open to other options of perhaps a bit smaller vehicle. I am in desperate need of a vehicle and at this point, a reliable 4 door with 5 seat belts are my only requirements. I contacted Dan on Wednesday and he said that his sales manager was off the previous day, but he was going to go to work on the deal for me. He would get back to me. I heard nothing back. I had to be up in Milwaukee that day anyway, so I decided to stop by the dealership. I met with the sales manager, Darnell. Dan and Darnell were both very nice. I again asked them to just not waste my time. I have cash down, but challenging credit. Darnell told me "The good news is, we got you approved through GM Financial or Ally, I don't remember which one. But we got you approved and now we need to find the right car. We also got it approved with no cash down. Now that you have cash down, we will talk to the bank and find you a car." Dan offered to show me a few things on the lot. I knew we weren't going to be walking out with a car that day, but we settled on a pre-owned Chevy Sonic. Dan said he and Darnell would work on it and let me know. The rest of Wednesday passed with no phone call. Then Thursday passed with no phone call. I finally sent Dan a text message on Friday asking if we had good news yet. His response blew me completely out of the water. "I'm afraid not. Just checked w/ finance. You would definitely need a co-signer, even on the Sonic" was the response I received. Having worked in the car business for a number of years, I know one of two things happened. Either Darnell was lying when he said that we were approved through GM Financial or the Finance and Insurance (F&I) folks realized there would be no room in the deal for back end product (warranty, gap insurance, etc.) which is how they make their money. They may not have wanted to take a deal that wouldn't pay them anything. Either way, it is an absolutely dishonest business model. If I wasn't approved, then tell me that. If you can't help me, tell me that. Do not string me along, telling me that you have an approval when you don't. Simply, that is not how you do business. My best piece of advice to Dan, who seems like an upstanding guy who did everything he could at the salesman level, is to find a dealership that doesn't play these games with people. Find a place that is open and up front about everything and will take a deal, regardless of how ugly it is.
The map is accurate. The hotel is good looking at it's price charged to the customer.
Horrible customer service. They will not bill the equipment correctly, my wife and I have called them for 4 months, and they won't return our calls. Sent letters, they still do not return calls. This is the worst place I can think of to use for medical devices. The management is running it into the ground, and I've notified numerous doctors offices to not recommend Bennett Medical due to their terrible customer service.
First of all, we walked in and NO ONE even acknowledged my wife, 2 kids and I. So I said hello how are you and the hostess rudely said "alright" and carried on. Another younger girl took our order. The food came out in a family size dish and we had to ask for individual plates. No one ever came by to ask if we needed anything the entire time we were there. A white family walked in and was welcomed with a friendly greeting and a smile from the same rude hostess. As we left, no one said thanks for coming or even goodbye. We felt very uncomfortable and will not be returning. The food was average. They need to hire people who aren't racist and we MIGHT go back.
Hi guys just wanted to suggest if this is really your location maybe post a sign so people know you are actually there. otherwise this address is a private property. Just a suggestion.
It really sucks. We went in to the hall from 43C temp. No AC what so ever. Only large air blowers.
I've been practicing yoga for the past two years now and my family just recently moved to OKC. subsequently I went and tried a new studio and this is one I picked. After all my experiences at several studios around Austin, Texas i'm going to be flat out honest and say that my experience at the studio was very poor. Yoga, an experience that should be very welcoming and friendly seemed very local and the instructor was, in my opinion, very neglectful towards her duties in making me feel welcome. Upon arrival I received a feeling that I have never felt when going to yoga and this feeling continued as our instructor demanded poses, didn't explain transitions, and had the music too loud to where I could barely even hear her. Im not usually the one to rag on a certain studio but after my experience here I told my self I would never return. Partly because of the instructors attitude, and the fact that she was on her phone majority of my time in the studio, and upon leaving and saying thank you I was completely ignored. Yoga is about new experiences, cleansing, friendly, and welcoming surroundings and I did not feel that at soul yoga. I would recommend a different studio, granted they are fairly new studio I would give them room for improvement, which is why I took my time in writing this review.
Me, my wife and two kids ate here three weeks ago. The portions were very small, food was ok ( not great ), but their billing is ridiculous. The waitress charged my credit card twice by accident. They gave me a slip saying the one charge was voided, but it was not. I went in the next day ( Sunday ) to get it corrected and they guaranteed me they would call the bank Monday morning to reissue the funds. A week later I called them since it was not corrected, and the manager apologized and guaranteed me he would issue a credit right away. No credit was issued so I let a week pass and I call again. Same manager picked up and apologized, he said he would get back to me later in the day.....he did not. The very next day I get a call from Chase card services, all sorts of fraudulent charges just popped up on my account. I live in the Bahamas and rarely use this card. This meal was one of a few times I used the card in the last year. This establishment is improper with billing at the very least. I encourage you to go elsewhere.
None
I had a horrible experience at Freeway Ford. I bought a used car there last year and they sold me the Service Contract, which I understood to cost $500 at the time. When I later read more of the fine print, I saw that it actually cost $2500, and I called the next day to ask that it be removed. They insisted there was absolutely nothing they could do to remove it and made me keep it. Now, less than one year later, that same car needs a $3700 engine repair (not due to negligence or misuse on my part ) and the repair is NOT covered by the Service Contract. What a lemon!
worst customer service in the history of u p s stores, I have never been treated with such disrespect before, I will take my business to pack and ship plus
Ordered a Pizza at 4:33. The pizza arrived at my door at 6:54. I call at 6:11 and he told me the driver was right around the corner. He arrived 2 and 1/2 hours after I ordered my pizza. The delivery man proceeded to apologize and tell me that they did not call him in until 6:00. Now if I ordered my pizza at 4:33 and he told me and hour to an hour and 15 min, he knew he didn't have a driver and could not get my pizza to me in that time frame. Why lie? Do not order from this location.
Went in to buy a new car, salesman acted like he really didn't care to sell a car. Went to Shawnee Mission Ford, treated us like family and beat Louisburgs price. So we bought from Shawnee Mission Ford.
Over priced drinks ($11 - $12 for your basic mixed drinks and $6 for a domestic beer). The service was decent. The food was decent, nothing special. Music pretty good. The overall atmosphere was pleasant. What sucked is that they stopped serving drinks and food at about 1:15am, turned off the music and turned up the lights. They then began to rudely tell people to leave even though the bar closes at 2:00am. Not the kind of place you want to go to on a regular basis. This was my third time there and this is typical of each of my experiences.
Pizza was OK. Bread sticks were completely burnt. Never again.
I went in to get thousands of dollars worth of work done on my HHR after a hail storm and had to wait two and half weeks for it all to be done. They had all the parts, and I was quoted to have it back in one week. I called after a week and they couldn't give me a definite answer on when it'd be done. No one communicated to each other there so each time I called I had to re-explain what was going on. They didn't offer me a rental car until two days before they said it wold be done for sure, at which point I refused. They should have offered it day one. Once I got my car back things we still broken on it and new chips where all over the body from them. Dirt was also somehow all over the inside roof of my car. Needless to say, I will not be going back to them ever. Their service is way below par.
I found the employees to be sullen and not very helpful. I went in with barely used Parasuco/555Soul/Guess/TNA clothing and they didn't buy a single thing saying they weren't what they were looking for.....yet there were well-worn cheap clothing on the racks from Old Navy/Walmart! I'm going to sell my clothes on my own online instead - so much easier and saves you the rudeness
This place is such a scam! They lure you in with promises of cheap prices, but my husband and I ended up paying twice what we normally would have paid at our regular doctor. Not to mention, they seem to pressure you into paying extra for part of the exam that should come standard (the glaucoma test). They also told me that my lenses would be too thick for the glasses that were cheapest, so I ended up paying $300 for the stupid things, just to get the stupid free eye exam. I hate this place and will never go back.
If you are looking to rent do not go through these people! They are not only the most unprofessional Real Estate I have ever encountered but they also try to rip you off!!!!
None
Well I think the Title Mean everything....
Much costly and food is ok
Never seen such unprofessional management i my life. Several times I have gone in to this location to find out that they are out of something. Today I called to see if they were opened was told yes they are open for business, drove to the location to walk in and be told they are closed because they are out of bread. Asked if i could get a burger wrapped in lettuce and was told no. Either close the doors or find a Manager that knows what they are doing.
I am 24 years old and have only known ABC cake shop to be the place to buy cakes. History dates back to my mom buying her Wedding and baby shower cakes there. So they have always had amazing and delicious bakery goods, up until 1 year ago. At that time we started to see a change in quality, décor and pricing. Yet we have such ties to them that we all felt compelled to give them another chance or so. Yet it was this weekend when I went to pick up my sister-in-laws Med School graduation cake that honestly looked out of this world ridiculous. It looked nothing like the picture and the Manager Amanda admitted that it wouldn't be something she is proud of. There was no refund of any amount, no complimentary anything. Yet all they could do is touch up the thumb prints in the cake and fix the miss-print in name that was clearly on our order form. I was so tempted to get my money back and leave them with their cake, yet we were an hour until the reception. They treated us horribly and it look like an apprentice baker made it days before we picked it up. So sad and disappointing because I will never go back after so many years of going.
Really disappointing. The custard product has got to be the least expensive option on the market...tastes of milk not vanilla... not worth the calories. Dairy Queen is creamier. They need to taste Culvers to understand what is missing...
I wouldn't trust this place. I think that having the dogs outside leads to an unsanitary disease-ridden enviroment. My dog seemed to hate it, and I don't think that there is enough supervision of the dogs. You're taking a risk, even though this place is cheap. Good luck if they ever remember your dog's name: pretty clear sign of the level of concern.
I've had more mail lost or delivered late (in some cases, months later) than any other post office I've ever dealt with. The final straw was this past Valentine's Day weekend. My husband ordered a surprise gift from me on amazon, which was supposedly "delivered" Saturday, according to the tracking information. Nevermind the fact that I was outside when the mail ran and only found the usual stuff in the mail that day. Nevermind the fact that I called them this morning, and was asked if I wanted a re-delivery, whatever THAT is. And nevermind the fact that once again, I just watched my mailman drop a couple of envelopes into my box, minus the delivery. WHY would you update tracking info without actually delivering anything? Are they thieves, liars, or just plain lazy?
Honestly one of the worst experiences at a restaurant. Average food and RUDE staff who yelled at us for asking to split the bill. I mean YELLED! My advice: stay away.
Poor
Horrible! I have gone here 3 times and each time with a different hair stylist and and I will not come back. Each time has been a disappointment. A women even finished washing and cutting my very long hair in less time than a little boy's hair cut in the chair next to mine; and this boy was already in the chair before I walked through the door. She even told me she added a face frame to blend my bangs in when she finished. First off, you cannot do something with my hair before consulting with me first. You need to ask first with your reason then I can tell you if you can or cannot do something more to my hair. Sorry for the rant but I was very disappointed. I wish I got her name but I didn't.
I met consultant Joy Fisher at a restaurant in Denver,NC. I am getting married in October and looking to lose weight. Joy explained the weight loss program at Sona and the total cost would be $1,000 or less, which includes blood work, vitamins and 12 counseling visits. My consultation was actually $35 when I was told by Joy it would be free. Then I was quoted two payments of $658 which equals more than $1351. Joy stated this was a deal as she was authorized to give me $100 off. Afterwards, I realized there were unexpected expenses that were never discussed prior to my agreeing to go through with the program, and that because of my wedding, I was on a tight budget and not in a position to fork out money for additional un-expected expenses. I kindly thanked Joy and said I would just try to lose weight with will power. This is joy's response, "I am sorry you feel that way. Really sorry you have changed your mind about getting healthy. It isn't about will power! Hope you are successful." I never indicated I didn’t want to get healthy. I am actually a vegetarian who eats only organic food and few carbohydrates. I’m glad I made the decision not to move forward with this program if the consultants clearly demonstrate this type of demeaning and negative behavior towards their clients. I would like to also add that the website clearly states they are currently offering 60% OFF their medical weight loss program. (Posted by LeeAnn through my daughter’s gmail account)
Burgers are average. Sweet pickles instead of dill? Not a good value. No wonder the place is empty. Most restaurants smell like food, this one doesn't. That's a warning sign.
This place was one of the few restaurants that is centrally located that was available on Saturday night. We tried getting a table at a few other places before we settled for dinner at the Red Viking. The decor is hideous and the buffet looked like it had been sitting there all day. We opted to order from the menu. The items we ordered included: chicken dinner, weinerschnitzel, combination danish dinner of sausage and meatballs, ans the fried pastry treat. The food was better than we anticipated based on decoe and service but overall a poor experience. Portions were a little small for the price. Waitress not at all knowledgeable of menu and beer selection. Will not visit again and will try a wine bar or make reservations at a different place.
Just visited Buddy's and I must say I understand why the waitress was complaining about it being so slow to a bar patron. You would think we would get great service being the only customers in there to eat. Instead we got to hear her complain to the cook about not letting her know the food had been up and having to ask for a refill.. Food was not what I would expect for the price. Tasted like old fries reheated in the fryer. The flounder and shrimp was average at best. None of us felt good about the experience. I guess they can keep wondering why it is so slow. We will not be back.
Nemohu doporučit. Interiér bych ani tak nenazval hogo fogo, jako spíš, že to je jediné dobré na této restauraci. A to bez ironie, interiér je povedený. Mám zkušenosti z poledních menu. Suroviny - absolutní základ dobrého jídla - jsou zde používány ty nejlevnější. Šunka na pizze je taková ta škrobová hmota, sýr na pizze je EIDAM 30. Jen málokdy je v menu jídlo (vyjma pizzy), ve kterém by nebyla smetana. Dokonce se jednou dodávalo risotto, kde rýže plavala ve smetaně. Ano, Italové vaří i ze smetany, ale rozhodně to v jejich skvostné kuchyni nepřevládá, jak je tomu v této restauraci. Již dvakrát byla kolegům přinesena brutálně spálená pizza. Barva dočista černá. V prvním případě jsem ocenil duchapřítomný servis, který si po dlouhém čekání (1 hodina!) nedovolil nepřinést pizzu, ale zároveň byla přislíbena nová, zabalená v krabici na doma. V druhém případě (o měsíc později) servis nehnul brvou a v klidu tu černotu položil na stůl s přáním dobré chuti. Už jsem této restauraci dal mnohokrát "druhou" šanci, ale pohár trpělivosti již přetekl.
Terrible service; terrible, over-priced food. Got a combo plate which included coffee/tea but there was no coffee or tea served with the meal; asked for mild spiciness and got a fiery, mouth-burning concoction. Server did not speak to us once during the meal except to ask for our order.
This store is dirty, and the employees are very hateful. You can tell they don't want to be there. Long long long checkout lines. Don't go there and try to get any customer service.
Staff horrible there. Its a zoo.
I recently refinanced my mortgage through Roundpoint, and my two star rating reflects my frustration with the slowness in completing the process, which took nearly two months from start to finish. It felt like a week would go by without any response or progress update. The worst was when Roundpoint tried to charge me another $300+ to extend the rate lock, despite the delays all being on their end; I was able to get the extra charge removed, but that was still a source of frustration. In the end, I am satisfied with the rate I got, and I hope that the servicing of the loan is competent, but just know if you refinance with them, it may take a lot longer than expected to complete the process.
I'm usually not a critic, however my experience at this restaurant was one of the worst i've had in my recent memory. We chose Trailhead Brewery for our 10 year anniversary dinner and expected the great service and food we have had there over the years. That was definitely NOT the case this time. First, we were seated, and the server came over. He introduced himself as Scott, and took our drink orders. We didnt know what we wanted right away, and we definitely took the time to read over the extensive menu. Scott, the server kept checking on us. After about 10 mins, a new gal came over and introduced herself saying she was taking over for Scott...turns out she was a bartender, filling in, and hadnt served in years. We finally ordered a soup, she had chili, i had french onion. I ate about a quarter of the french onion and then in my spoon i pull up a white plastic steak "temperature marker", the kind that you put in the steaks to mark how done they are. I thought, well, that's not good, pulled it out and set it aside, and kept eating. Two more spoonfuls and I pull up another one!! I set the soup aside, and waited for the server. I showed her and she stated the obvious, that that's not supposed to be like that! It gets better. We order our food. She gets the "sesame seed encrusted salmon", with the "wasabi aoli" sauce. I get the mahi mahi with the three cheese potatoes. Our dinner comes and my wife notices immediately that number 1, this wasn't "sesame seed encrusted", and two, no wasabi aoli sauce. The server looks at it and says, "oh, your right, no sesame seeds", and I'll get your sauce. She leaves and comes back in a few minutes with a DISH OF SESAME SEEDS!! AND SOME "WASABI AOLI SAUCE". The dish of sesame seeds was enough to push us over the edge! What on earth were we supposed to do...pour them on the salmon? and then the "wasabi aoli sauce" was MAYONNAISE WITH GREEN FOOD COLORING!!!!! We question the server who says "yes, that's the way we make our aoli sauce!!!!! " Really..mayo and green food coloring? Wasabi is quite spicy, and there was NO spice in this! And then to think things couldnt get any worse...my wife woke up at 12:45 am with severe stomach cramping and was in the bathroom for the rest of the night and still now with what we think is food poisoning. She's been up every 2 hours in the bathroom. And on top of this, she's a month pregnant!! Needless to say, we sent her food away, my soup away, they comped both of them, we had a miserable 10 year anniversay dinner, my wife ended up with food poisoning and we will NEVER go back!!
None
Fatal el servicio en Más x Menos Novacentro, hoy había filas enormes a las 9:15 pm, después de hacerla me cerraron caja en las narices, pedí al supervisor, que me atendieran o abrir más cajas, y la respuesta no fue nada amable. Dejé mi compra abandonada y tuve que visitar otro supermercado competidor, donde la atención y el servicio al cliente sí fue de primera. Deberían capacitar mejor a los supervisores y cuidar el servicio al cliente.
Very slow and poor attitude. They try to solicit me for business but they are uncompetitive. When I complained they asked me did I think I was entitled me to better service as a premier customer .. no just service. Also the teller did no know about certain basic products.
Food is decent. If you only speak English you are going to have a major issue. Service is terrible, beyond terrible. I speak Spanish and can't stand it. Prices are good. Recommend a relleno(sweet bread stuffed with ham and cheese) which is one dollar by the way. Relleno and a cappuccino for breakfast in the morning for like two bucks can't beat that.
None
I spent more than $300 at this store buying food, vitamins, face lotion, ect. The introvert of an owner has seen me in her shop at least five times. The other day I went in her shop to purchase recycled paper towel but instead accidentally grabbed toilet paper. When I went to exchange the toilet paper for paper towel I was refused because I did not have my receipt. The owner was the one that sold me my every purchase. It is obvious the owner does not care about customer service nor has she ever been personable. If you need green items or vitamins go to another shop on the mountain because this shop does not care about you. I am proof.
HORRIBLE customer service, and misleading representatives. Never return phone calls, and when you ask them for the detail on costs, they refuse to help you. Seems like they were trying to take advantage and when we called them out they didn't want to do our job. After 4 days of running around! Within 2 hours of cancelling service with them, our window was fixed for less than $200!!!
Out of business
Very bad place. Bad food, bad service nothing like any other cici pizza. Bad restrooms too
Terrible Service Food was Sub Par did not taste like restaurant quality Went to dinner for my nieces birthday dinner and ordered the lobster ravioli and crab cakes and Cesar salad . mind you the price is $ 34.00 they brought me three small ravioli and 2 looked like 2-3 ounce so called crab cakes . i asked the waiter if this was lunch portions and he said no this is dinner portions . i then informed him i was not happy with this meal and wanted another . He told me oh well maybe they should put pictures on the menu. I then told him no they don't need to put pictures but for these exuberant prices they need to portion the food accordingly . i have eaten this same combo at many of the finer establishment and the portions were double and often times less expensive . i will never go to this establishment again and will never recommend this place. Stay Away!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
My husband originally went to Moda Italia for shirts for an upcoming business trip. He found shirts he liked but they needed to be altered. When he returned for the altered shirts, he received two shirts that were in stock (with no alterations). Now, the other two shirts were put on order and he left for his trip without the shirts in the colors that he wanted. After three trips to the store, numerous phone calls (most not returned) and almost a month of waiting for these shirts, he did receive the missing two shirts.. We had lost hope of actually receiving the shirts. (I visited the store mid-week when it was less busy to try to get their attention, and gave them our home address to please send the shirts to our home. Weekends are hectic in the store.) When the last two shirts arrived in the mail, one of the shirts was a duplicate color so he still was missing one of the colors he really wanted. The shirts probably would have been in stock at a regular department store. My husband had paid for alterations to the original shirts but again was glad to have received any shirts in his size. (Sidenote: On one of the return trips, he was pressured into buying ties and pocket silks, which he really didn't need or want.) The disorganization, the up-selling, and pure craziness frustrated both of us that you could not in good conscience refer anyone to the store; Hence the two stars (and I am rounding up, more like 1 1/2 stars)
Service ok et sympathique, Prix exageres pour ce qu'il y a dans l'assiette qui est de qualité juste ok avec en plus un supplément pour le service en terrasse...
this is the email i have writen to BMW after terrible service. sales team was fine, servicing is horrible. I have brought my car in for servicing 4 times and now will have to bring it in a 5th time. Never have they completed the work they say or are supposed to and now my car is unsafe to drive and I have to have my girlfriend drive me to and from work because I have no means of transportation. I brought it in 3 months ago for a full servicing, waited 3 hours and was told everything was done from oil change to air filter replacement as well as a recall for the battery. I then call about 2 weeks ago for a nail in my tire. They tell me bring it in with no appointment needed. When I get there I am sent back home and told I need an appointment (unprofessional). I bring it back the next day and the service provider tells me they didn’t do any servicing as promised last time and didn’t replace the recall due to no part. None of this was communicated to me. All they did was a low annual oil. So what was I there for 3 hours for? They replace my tire and I bring it in a 4th time. This time they replace 2 more tires for a total of 3 new tires and tell me it needs an alignment for $198. I don’t understand why but agree to it because I used to trust BMW. I take my car home as the service center is closing and as soon as I reach 30mph the car begins vibrating and the steering wheel shaking violently. When I get to 40mph the car is no longer drivable and I have to drive with my 4 way flashers on to get home for my safety and the safety of the other driver on the road. Never had I had an issue before I brought my car in for servicing like this. I work 70 hours a week on night shift and get very few days off (I do this in order to be able to afford a BMW). I’ve spent all my days off just trying to get a simple servicing and tire replacement done. This should have taken 2 trips not 5. Not only are they wasting my money but yours as well. My family and I have owned 8 BMW's but never have we witnessed such poor servicing. I’m disgusted to say the least. I am expecting my money back for the alignment and the tires to actually be balanced this time. Thank goodness I didn’t get in an accident driving home. Thank you in advance for your concern.
This place sounds like a great place. But the hours listed on Google (11am - 11pm) are not accurate. We arrived at 8pm on a Mid October weekday and they were long closed.
Nice property but the quality of the food and staff attitude are not up to par with the reputation of the brand. Would not choose to stay here again if I could find another option. The management approach of this property is reflected in the laxity of the wait staff and surly attitude of desk personnel. I found them discourteous and inattentive. They were more interested in continuing conversations with their co-workers than seeing to the needs of the guests. The food bar was empty and not attended, the coffee bar had no cups or creamer etc. (on multiple occasions). The elevators when they worked were slow and unkempt. For a property in the Hilton Honors program this hotel gets a C- which is not a high enough grade to warrant a return visit by us. If you have high standards and expect to be appreciated for your business this is not the stay for you.
Asked to substitute vegetables for meat in a meat sauce. I was literally charged $7.20 more per plate. You have got to be kidding me! I gave the owner a second chance to correct any unintentional error caused by the waitress or computer. Nope. That's the way it is. Sorry guys, I went back a second time and brought a friend. But not a third time. Too bad.
- broken beds - very poor quality for 3 stars hotel - dirty rooms
None
lack service, take my dogs there when they are sick and they give medication that doesn't work! their prices are too high and one time i took 1 of my 3 dogs ans they put the wrong shots of another sog on my dog
Stay away. Not a 4 star hotel! Location: middle of nowhere on a motorway. Food: poor, staff didn't even know what a poached egg was. Service: slow at best. Children roam the hotel shouting and screaming.
Cant Believe these guys would have customer service the way they did. They suck and i think next time im in from Dallas im try that custom place or someone else besides the DOC cuz he sucks and forgets screws.
This was the WORST hotel experience I have ever had. The bathroom was filthy. The air conditioning system was awful. I got sick. No internet. No one answers the phone. Richard the owner is crazy! I mean, how is he in the hopsitality business. Do not go there, I repeat, DO NOT GO THERE. Smoke alarm went off alllll night and he did nothing. He lies. You will not sleep or get rest. The worst place I have ever been.
Like the previous reviews mentioned, the service could use some help - limited English, sometimes outright rude. Regarding the half price sushi, the wait can be very long & it's mostly fillers & sauce - you don't get too much fish (slices of tuna were paper thin), they're cutting corners here. But hey, you get what you pay for.
Service is bad... they reserve tables and ask that u buy expensive drinks to sit , bad service from waitresses n yhen expect a tip... rather go to Dros
I stayed here for 28 days at my companies expense. The 'self contained' villas are barely apropriate, the extraction fan in the kitchenette never worked. The bedside lamps never worked. The tap in this so called kitchenette dripped continously the whole time I stayed there, dispite repeated requests to have the washer changed. But they didn't hesitate to fleece me of $220 when my room key was misplaced. I recommend you stay somewhere else.
I will never do business with office max again, even if I have to pay more.
None
Alors je rejoins le précédent post, et je dirais même qu'en tant que propriétaire c'est bien pire. Le locataire s'installe, on me prélève sans me dire quoi que ce soit, certains frais de son installation.On pense que l'agence gère, d'ailleurs je paye pour cela tout les mois. Au final avec un très mauvais locataire qui régulièrement ne paye pas son loyer, c'est moi qui devait prévenir l'agence que j'en été à deux mois sans paiement de sa part. Et cela c'est reproduit plusieurs reprises.Faire des réparations suite à un dégât causé par le locataire ... là encore je paye et impossible de faire que l'agence recouvre ce paiement.Les deux derniers mois de loyer là encore non payé, la totalité de l'avant dernier et le prorata du dernier.Là encore l'agence reste muette et sans action. Et vous voulez la meilleur, le locataire nous a été recommandé par la directrice de cette agence, "c'est un très bon locataire, il paye très bien", j'entends encore cette phrase dans ma tête. Après deux années, je suis extrêmement content que le locataire soit parti, grand malheur au propriétaire suivant :(
Pesimo servicio y comida malisima!
The cl was nice when it got down to the 5 vans but the wagons in and out of the site were noisy.
Well for just under 4 quid no wonder I almost shat me slacks when I got home to cheap to be true would I go again nope meal may be cheap but me jeans and shoes are not
My family used to go here all the time because my cousin worked behind the counter and would give us free pizzas. After he quit, we stopped going there. Why? Well, their pizza really sucks. I don't know why everyone thinks this place is so good. Their pizzas are either overcooked or undercooked. Rarely, is it cooked properly. Once, I had a burned slice that I swore came out of the freezer.
Not so good
Horribly rude staff that speak about you and your order in Spanish rudely, if they think you don't understand Spanish. The Manager was running around screaming like a lunatic and throwing stuff in the kitchen. My husband and I waited for 15 minutes of this rude horrible service for our food, and it still wasn't done. Needless to say we got our money back and left. Never go here, the restaurant is dirty, staff is rude, manager is a lunatic, and the wait time is not worth your money.
Prices are misleading and customer service was garbage two people said prices were less than 25 for the night. Its 25 normally at night and 35 for events. Beware!
What do want to know. Why don't you just leave me alone. Can't hardly get by today without some imaginary life device. So for peace and easy going conscience I get one, and try to continue to live and grow. But apparently the earth is too small for whoever you leaders and teachers are. ..I used to be able to get food off a tree, easily attainable free or little cost to fill needs....now the only thing I can get for free is a device so I can keep...what, reading or writing a review. You wanna know about ulvn? Go see it. Its in a nicer ghetto than usc. !
Gotuja odziennie świeża zupę. Reszta to zapewne mrozonki. Piękne widoki są bardzo wartościowe.
Service was slow. Car ok. When I left the car there was a huge line and one of the staff members offered me to leave the keys with him. This was a huge mistake! They charged me one additional day. When I realized I call twice and the problem was never solved... I will never go there again.
Basically a lower quality version of Cracker Barrel.
None
HORRIBLE place to live. I wish we could afford to move. New management comes in every year and makes their own rules. By the time you learn all of them new management has come in. Rent goes up every year yet nothing to show for it. They are constantly finding every little thing wrong with the ones of us who own our homes. Feels like they are trying to push homeowners out so they can move their rental homes in and charge an outrageous price.
Service quality is not value for money... Hotel Staff is always busy in there own stuff. They only very particular about money not for service and value for that money. Rooms are very small and congested. If you are paying Rs. 3500+ for this hen please check another option.
The woman started rudely raising her voice with me when I politely asked her to repeat herself. Learn to speak clearer English or drop the attitude and I'll order take out from you again.
the food was ok but the employee who served me was smoking a minute before he served me a cheese pie. The problem is he didn't wash his hands before serving me.
Went to Cafe Colore this weekend before a show at Comedy Works and was highly disappointed. I've been there several times before and have always enjoyed quick service and great food, but this time was different. After ordering a Chicken dish, it was raw when it arrived at the table. We were in a hurry so we asked what could be prepared quickly so we didn't miss our show and received glorified spaghetti and meatballs (not great tasting either I might add). The real kicker was when the bill came and the manager acted like a 15% discount was a favor. Having worked in the industry, usually you just take the meal off all together, especially when your mistake could have given someone salmonella. Being in a hurry, we tipped our waiter who was attentive and kind, paid our bill and left. Needless to say however, with poor management and worse cooking, we will not be returning.
Been going here for 28 years (my whole life). As of today I will no longer be going to this rinky-dink, MONEY grubbing establishment. The facilities have not been upgraded since I have been going there as a small child. Schedule an appt... and expect to be seen 45min to 1hour after that appointment time. Pretty much their standard for the last 5+ years. After your wait, Dr. Smith or Dr. Petrey will spend all of 10min attending to your needs. Express concern or dissatisfaction over their proposed treatment, prescriptions, etc. and they will ignore you. If you come to them with legitimate problems they are not afraid to brush them off and not directly address your needs. When push comes to shove... they will just whip out the pad and pen and start writing you 3 unnecessary prescriptions for something as simple as a cough (none of which will be helpful). Shuffle you out of there... CLEARLY their time is more important/valuable than yours... and pay the piper at the door. This is pretty damn pathetic given I have literally... L I T E R A L L Y come here from birth until age 28... and seen the same Dr the whole time... and I am willing to walk away. Save yourself some time and trust my experience: ANYWHERE is better than here.
The decor is bland, the service is poor, the atmosphere is similar to that of a group home cafeteria. The food was ok (their burgers & nachos), so i decided i would call to order food (since they do advertise that they deliver and i refuse to step foot in the horrid place). However... when i dialed their phone number it immediately ends the phone call, i thought maybe i entered the number incorrectly, turns out i did not. These guys have a lot to fix & fast before they can even consider themselves a "SOMEWHAT OK" restaurant.
THE WORSE FOOD EVER. Meat was soggy, rice was under cooked. DO NOT EAT HERE!
The Dentist and assistants are great. The back office help are rude and un-helpful. I have good insurance but trying to get treated with respect by the "money people" is impossible.
Se escuchaba a las de limpieza matandose de risa por los pasillos o hablando mientras limpiaban la pieza de al lado. El moviliario ya está viejo. Barato pero pobretón. Te la baja.
One bar man thought he was gods gift to woman, had a severe attitude problem and i think if he was an ice cream he would lick himself--the roof leaked and the place was full of weirdos---good vibe though--
HORRIBLE experience, my boyfriend tried to surprise me with roses at work, he ordered them at 9 am thinking they would be delivered in a matter of hours as promised, come time for me to get off and he had to call to tell me to stay at work for a lil longer b/c something was coming...come 2 hours after my clock out time, no show he called, no answer....30 mins later I got a call announcing the flowers were on the way! WAY TO RUIN THE SURPRISE! lady was rude and rushed, and the flowers were NOTHING like what he ordered, huge disappointment
Absolutely horrible service. My wife has tried to use the VIP oil service and has literally sat there for 3 hours. I would highly recommend that you steer clear of this place. We tried to cancel the service and they pulled some shenanigans on us. The horn on the car stopped working and they were unable to figure it out after 2 visits. They constantly try to bamboozle you with the bait and switch and constant attempts at up sales and hidden fees. They give car salesmen a bad name and that in itself speaks volumes.
This restaurant is closed. (As of Nov. 2011)
This school is a joke! The professors will help you but outside of that the environment is awful. If you try to leave they make it impossible. They don't send forms. Its a shady school!
Like most game stores this place pushes preowned games over new in a rather deceptive fashion. Also quite pricey
None
Horrible place, doorman is rude and arrogant. If he dosnt like you or your face he will kick you out for no reason. I'm never going back again and I will advise anyone not to bother.
Myself, my wife and our two kids went in for dinner 6/29/13. Service was very slow. Beverages took about 10 minutes to come out (soft drinks, margarita and a Guinness). The food took nearly 40 minutes from order to delivery. My open faced prime rib sandwich may have been prime rib but it was more like thinly sliced overcooked deli roast beef with a single slice of cheese on top served over a single piece of bread. My wife ordered the loaded irish fries. She described it as fries served over a layer of Mrs. Dash seasoning with canned chili and a slight amount of beer cheese on top. There was a solid layer of Mrs. Dash seasoned salt on the plate in and under the fries. You could pick the granules up in your fingers. Kids meals (cheese quesadillas and pasta) were OK. Avoid this restaurant! It has no redeeming value whatsoever. I only wish I could give it negative numbers. If you find yourself in Wildood/The Villages, do yourself a big favor, go elsewhere!
The salesman David was great, that was until I meant with the sales manager who I will not mention, I believe. He has no people skills and is everything that fake is. When the deal was not done he basically told his salesman this, " That's fine we've spent too much time on this, move on we have another day and another customer to get, hurry up and get back to work David". I have heard that the service was horrible but now I know for sure this will be the last place I shop or refer........Would not reccomend this dealership
Visited Christmas week, was seated in the corner, the temp at table was in the high 50s with cold - outside air blowing on us. When we asked the waiter about the temp, he said its always like that, that's why they don't normally seat people there. Needless to say it was not an enjoyable place to eat a meal. The food was decent, nothing to get excited about, just a burger and too greasy fries.Don't waste you time.
Cette auberge est une des pire si ce n'est la pire ou je pu rester! Le staff manque cruellement de manière et d'éthiques! Croyez moi, investissez autre part plutot que dans celui la! This is the worst hostel that I've been to! The staff is horrible and lacks extensively in manners and work ethics!!
Went to dinner two hours before Les Mis at the Erie Playhouse. Our dinners took a long time to come out. When they did my wife's steak salad was missing. Apparently the computer went down and orders were missing. The owner ( I presume) explained that to us a few times. I thought, isn't that why a waitress writes down orders? As the orders came out my daughter's steak Madagascar was so rare that I would say it was raw. The owner (again I presume the owner) said "That looks a little rare." So it went back for a little touch up. Now my daughter eats steak rare. What came back was not even pink anywhere. I suppose this is what most people would call medium or better yet medium well. I would have had her send it back but we would have never made the play. Mind you we gave ourselves two hours. My order was grilled chicken breast with brie, apples and bacon. If you are going to charge $17 for one small chicken breast it better knock your socks off. Well, it was not tender, there were a few apples and pieces of bacon. Comparable to something out of a Stouffers frozen food box. Oh, and before I forget, I hate getting my salad dressing served in a plastic cup that I need to take the lid off. Nothing home made about that! At the end of the meal, no time for desert, our waitress chuckled about the snafu with my wife's meal and said, "Well, at least you got a free drink out of it!" I don't know what free drink she was talking about becasue we were charged for everything. Which sort of surprised me, now don't misunderstand, I did not want a free drink, what I wanted was a good dining experience with exceptional food. I had neither.
Terrible service and staff.
About the PRO SHOP Worst Hockey Pro Shop ever! It took them 3 months to provide us with our Team gear ( Jerseys,socks,warm ups,hats and fleece jacket). Nasty owner who blames everyone else for his mistakes!!!!!! Not to mention, they never have anything in stock. There is No Pro in the Pro Shop!!!!!!!!!!
If you a sign a contract with them you are locked in, if you change your mind within 24 hours of signing the contact they will put you on a probation period but still charge you every month until the contract it up. Today I tried to cancel an appointment for my husband because he is sick and they are still charging him 50% of the bill. So they would rather get their employees sick than understand that their customer is contagious. What a joke; you don't go to get a massage so you can come home with the cold, flu or worse.
I stayed here on 7-2-13 and the place looks nice and the front desk lady was helpfull but when we finally got into our room about 9:15 we noticed that we only had a full sized bed and not the Queen that we paid for. So the next morning I said something to the young man who was working the desk and he looked at me like what is the problem? So i decided to call the next day when the manager was on duty and she had the balls to tell me what i slept in was a queen bed. I know how big a queen is i have one at home. I will never stay here again.
Why waste time going to North Wales when The Jolly Farmer is so much closer?
Reviews from two years ago and a previous location are still true. The name Flashback, with emphasis on ice cream/fountain, creates expectations of a festive, energetic experience that recalls a 1950s soda fountain shop. My experience was the opposite. The place looked drab and no employees seemed enthusiastic. Since these were the consensus of the two year old reviews, I suspect the problem begins with apathetic owners. The shake was good, but it's hard to enjoy when you're in a depressing setting. Sad and drab are the most descriptive words for this place, and I don't plan on doing this to myself again. I hope that someone there realizes that they can create an experience that customers would thoroughly enjoy, especially on vacation, and begin creating that instead of the sad experience that is currently offered.
Ordered the pizza in store, 30 minutes later I come in to get it and it has a wrong ingredient in it. No tomato but pepperoni instead. They comped me a free 20oz drink.
They need a health inspectors visit. Food was ok. Nothing great. Plates were at buffet with crusty stuff on it and don't let me get into how many forks I went through to find a clean one. Oh and was there ever a waiter waitress or does everyone handle drinks and all themselves.
Just poor. Not even a little fair. The customer service is terrible. Three months after canceling my service, they continue to bill me. Now I've been on the phone for over an hour, talking to no less than 6 representatives, and this one is about the transfer me too. Despite having a receipt, they claim I still have a piece of equipment. They've taken more than 500$ and want me to wait at least another 2 weeks while they "look into it." I'll be calling my bank and the better business bureau now. Assholes.
thou it has its own importance .. But The Services and Show pieces are quite Empty...
Am 01.04.2013 haben wir versucht um 19 Uhr bei Don Calzone zwei Pizzen zu bestellen. Geliefert werden sollten sie zwischen viertel vor acht und acht Uhr. Als wir um 21Uhr angerufen haben um nachzufragen ob wir vergessen worden seien wurde nur gefragt in welche Strasse geliefert werden sollte. Keine Entschuldigung oder Erklärung. Mit der nächsten Fahre sollten die Pizzen dann rausgehen. Um 21.30Uhr haben wir die Pizzen dann abbestellt. Auch bei diesem Anruf wurden wir wieder gefragt in welche Strasse denn geliefert werden sollte. Entschuldigugn, Fehlanzeige! Nie wieder!!! Nachtrag: Wie das Essen schmeckt kann ich natürlich nicht beurteilen. Musste allerdings etwas angeben
Look for the result with no space. 'ChessPalace'
I absolutely hate coming to this Walmart. I seriously doubt the validity of the positive reviews of this store. 2 years ago, I didn't mind shopping here late at night, like 2 a.m. There are 2 good employees here, Angel and Diana that work the night shift. But every other time I've been here it's been a negative experience. One day, it was the cashier COMPLETELY ignoring me and carrying on a conversation with a cart pusher, and even used foul language in front of me while ringing my items. (I'm talking f-word foul language) I reported her to the CSR on duty, but he didn't seem interested in resolving the issue. And tonight, I rushed in to purchase a clear nose ring retainer before the jewelery department closed. I needed one for work and I barely made it at 9:50, 10 minutes before they were supposed to close, only to find it already closed down. I asked an employee working in the area if there was anyone who could help me, because I have to have it before work tomorrow, and she simply shrugged and said "Once it close, it closed" (verbatim) I said they were supposed to be open till 10, and can she call a manager to open it for me. It's a $5 piece of plastic, not like a $300 ring. She said no, she couldn't call a manager, they can't open it. I mean, really?! I know that's a lie. Why would a manager not have access to it? I've worked for Walmart before, and I know they can access the jewelery department. The parking lot is filthy and you're lucky to find a parking spot that hasn't been turned into a buggy corral. the employees don't give a crap and are rude. And you can hardly walk in the store with out getting second hand smoke poisoning from all the employees smoking by the entrance. I recommend driving 2 miles south to the Red Oak Walmart, or 3 miles down Belt Line to the Desoto Walmart. They seriously need to just shut this one down.
I came with my wife to celebrate Valentine's Day and the service was poor. The taste of food is good, but if I have to recomend someone to come here I will say go to the other Brazilian churrascarias in town.
Closed at 10:30 when we showed up. We drove 40 minutes after being told they were open until 12am only to find locked doors.
We have been traveling to Hocking Hills for the last 6 years to get away from the Cleveland life for a few days and "just Be". We have always stayed at Lazy Lanes and been 100% satisfied except for our most recent trip. We were so looking forward to this get away because it was the first time we were able to get time off in the Fall to appreciate nature's beauty. Seclusion is number 1 on our list when booking a cabin and that is how "Creekside Hideaway" was described. It wasn't, there was another home or cabin not even 150 yards from ours, plus the main access road was within view from the hot tub. The couch in the cabin was disgustingly dirty and smelled of urine! The pump of the hot tub never shut off and was so loud you couldn't enjoy ANY sounds of nature. We had to run the AC just so we could sleep without hearing it!! But you can't request another cabin and you loose money if you leave. Unfortunately our days with Lazy Lanes is over. I'm very sad!
None
My daughter and I had the unfortunate experience of attending Edge Dance Studio for one year. Not only do they have inexperienced teacher's teaching our children but they also have 16 year old students substituting at least twice a week during paid class time. The owner of the studio Barbara Everett continuously belittled the other parents to myself and a group of mother's who also left the studio last year and my first thought was "If she is talking about them to me, a person she just met, what will she be saying about myself and my child behind my back"? I could have put up with the favoritism that the studio shows for some of the girls who clearly have no technique although, it isn't their fault, they were never taught any technique at EDGE, but when Barb at the final competition in Orlando, Fl got into my car with a glass of wine at 9:00 in the morning with three children in the car I was done! We recently moved to California and my daughter attends another studio where she was at the bottom of her class after summer try-outs and was considered one of the best dancer's at EDGE when we left. Now I am happy to say she is at the top of her Company for her age group and has learned the proper technique and etiquette that a beautiful, strong, honest dancer should portray. She also stated to me that she wished some of her friends from Edge would attend just one class with her so they can see what they are learning isn't correct! That came out of a ten year olds mouth!!! The instructor's at Edge have no formal training and that was my fault in the beginning for not doing my research! If you're thinking about spending money for a hobby in dance, I would still urge you not to attend a studio that only cares about gossip, drinking and favoritism as a way of business. They also charged the team over $180.00 for a costume they bought from a thrift store and had only a week of class in June last year and charged everyone in the studio for a month of classes. Before anyone from that studio comments (only their kids and friends usually), think about why you lost half of your students last year and why you only compete against your own studio in competitions so you can call yourself winners! These are facts, not opinions Peter Everett and freedom of speech is on my side so before you pull out the "I'm going to sue you" line like you've threatened the last five mother's from your studio....look in the mirror and try to better yourselves instead of spewing hate and lies about people. Oh please do your research before even spending a dime here!!!
None
This kohls has poor customer service. The employees are rude and unhelpful. The hiring manager complained on a job interview about about how unappealing the job is. She make strange remarks about how she was so glad she was a manager now, so she did'nt have to deal with the people. I make it to the second interview and ended up being denied the postion because I have a criminal background of assult from when I was younger. I obviously did well and they wanted me back for the second interview but as soon as I checked yes for the background, they denied my employment. They disrciminated against me when they told me it would have no affect on my employment.
This is the worst library I've ever had the misfortune to visit; it is almost always loud -- kids crying, screaming, or just jabbering away like they're at the mall instead of a library -- cell phones making their own noise and the noise associated with people rudely talking on them while in the library -- terminals that don't work, so you have to stand in the most ungodly line; librarians that are downright rude -- though a few have been pleasant and helpful -- and just the most ungodly racket and confusion ALL THE TIME -- the librarians apparently have no idea how to be librarians and make people be quiet and respectful to others, nor how to effectively police a rowdy gang of kids. I'm looking for a new library branch IMMEDIATELY, I can't stand this place anymore. Plus, instead of shelving fiction in the time-honored fashion of alphabetizing by the first 3 letters of the author's last name, they have all their fiction shelved by genre, and THEN alphabetized -- which totally eliminates the serendipity of finding some strange book on a subject you never considered before, but take a gamble on and find a great read -- how lame, and how tragic for adventurous readers. On a scale of 1 to 10, I'd give this library a negative 100. The best thing Gwinnett County could do with this place is bulldoze it and start over -- and hire some responsible librarians to keep proper order!
Estan bastante malitos
I received a call from Cindy. She mentioned that she saw the resume I posted and invited me for an interview. I suspected a cattle call she said I could interview the following day at 10:30 AM or 10:45 AM. I could hear other voices in the back ground speaking the same lines and appointment times. This, to me, was a red flag. I have been to group interviews but with my unique education and experience, I expected this person to ask a few qualifying questions or at least identify to whom she is speaking. The address offers an applicant the feeling it is a legitimate business but after reading these other reviews, I'll pass.
First off, I had the worst possible experience you can have at a body shop, besides your car actually being stolen or destroyed while under their care. I took my car in with $600 in damage and they returned it to me with $1000 of NEW damage. Go figure. The initial repair was 3 days and the new damage took another 2 days. THE WORST PART IS THAT THEY DELIVERED MY CAR TO ME THINKING (MAKE-BELIEVING) IT WAS GOOD QUALITY WORK, I HAD TO FIND THE DAMAGE FOR MYSELF WHICH WAS EASILY VISIBLE AND I HAD TO MAKE SURE THEY SAW IT. Good thing I checked it out before leaving so they couldn't try and blame it on me. They must think I am an idiot and possibly everyone else who goes there. Their mission was to repair a small dent on my wheel well, and when I got my car back, the headlight was chipped ($500 for a new one) and so was the paint around the headlight, the bumper was protruding about a 1/2 inch and the bumper was not flush. It looked like they tried to put my car back together like an Erector Set (put together without finesse or care). On top of that, I never received a single phone call from a manager or the owner about the terrible damage that was caused to my vehicle due to their extreme neglect and not noticing it before giving it back to me. The owner, Mike, never contacted me to follow up and apologize during the 2 days they had my car after they damaged it. He apparently does not take his business seriously and has no integrity or sense of good business practice. Any other business transaction I have ever done where the person made a mistake, and in this case a glaring mistake, I have received an immediate apology/remedy and most definitely a phone call from the manager and/ or owner. IT IS UNBELIEVABLE THAT THE OWNER, MIKE, NEVER EVEN CALLED ME!! He didn't even come out personally to inspect the vehicle the 2nd time after they fixed their own damage done to my vehicle. Mike also still lives in the past and believes that good service a person tells 3 people and bad service a person ONLY tells 10 people. He actually said that to me. He obviously has never heard of the internet, where people can tell the ENTIRE world. The absolute worst service I have ever received in my entire life. Do yourself a favor and please tell 10 other people about the bad service from this place so Mike can retain his pride and wishful thinking. Update...It turns out...When I got home I realized that a screw is missing from my bumper and a small ding has been added to my fender thanks to the incredible service they provide. They damaged my car for the second time in a row!! I WONT BE GOING BACK EVER even to have the other new damage fixed!! This business is incapable of providing good service. Way too many mistakes at all levels... quality of work, quality control and inspection of final product, customer service, and most importantly Integrity and accountability!! FAIL!
This is last place in Yuma anyone should consider renting from
Ill second that. These guys are on Meth!
Dropped off a tv to get the screen fixed. He gave a great estimate and told me two weeks, three at most. Its going on 2 months and I've made repeated calls to get a update or anything and there has been no progress. If anything he has suggested his estimate was grossly understated. He has never called to update me, let me know he needed more time, or if it will be more expensive.
I just want to add my comment to others in an effort to help someone making a choice of plumbing Companies. This is our experience only, and it may differ from others. We had a minor leak under the sink in our master bath. I attempted to repair the leak, and I was not successful. Rather than continue trouble shooting my wife refered to the yellow pages. They do run a nice ad. The service many came out, very polite, and said he would work on the "peeTrap" under the sink for "$286. That had been the first thing I tried and felt it was not the problem.. BUT $286... WOW that was nuts for a peetrap, and very doubtful that was the problem, as the service man said it would be more if the peetrap was not the problem. We sent him on his way, and he wanted $69.00 for a trip charge to tell us "NOTHING". We called another plumber "Reeves Family Plumbing". They were out the next morning at 7:30 sharp. It was NOT the peetrap. The line was stopped up due to the air conditioning drainage and they ran a rooter through the line cleaned it out. Checked for other leakage, and a charge of $128.00. It is my thought that the Hutinson guy would have said the obvious the peetrap was not the problem and charge us another overpriced fee. Like someone else probaly in the $500 range while they tried different causes.
I tried to send a package I forgot to put on the postage. They sent i back no biggy my bad. I put the postage and sent it. They sent it back with a bunch of marks all over. I brought it in and asked for help. She said the lot I am sending it to is vaccent. (Uh no my sister lives there.) Next they said I could not send it in that envelope because it was all marked up. (UM you guys marked it up and crossed out the address. So I said can I use this stamp on the other package. She said no it has been use. (No you never sent it to the person, it wasn't even marked.) I went to Fedex, I was very happy they helped me out and sent it in one day no additional charge.
Don't bother. Received a gift certificate to this place as a Christmas gift, found it in my purse and decided to finally use it only to find it had expired two days before. Went in to see if they'd honor it anyway. "Nope, we can't honor it" Can we say totally poor customer service? Rather than win a customer for life by honoring it, and a great tip for one of their employees, they blew me off and lost me as a customer and anyone and everyone I can tell not to go there. They probably don't care at all, they got their cash up front. Sad sad sad.
pesce avariato, gelato avariato, proprietari arroganti e maleducati.
None
Terrible experience ever for online order! My order was placed July 4th. 2012, about $6000.00. after 3 months waiting, of course with over 30 calls, just heard a bunch of lies from their customer service people, then I finally got my bedroom set, but the headboard and footboard had been scratched; the dresser was on hold, and I still didn't get it yet, today it is Jan. 7th. 2013, more than 6 months now. I called today, the customer service changed their phone number, nobody ever pick up the phone, I left message, nobody ever call back either. I emailed to Ann Marie and 3 more other emails, just give them 24 more hours, if no response, I have to dispute this charge throught credit card company, because simply nobody responds any more to the internet order customers. They also changed their name to the furniture plaze, I was told now there are different company from the furniture place galaries any more. It seems this company use customer's credit card payment to do business, never refund, until customer can't tolarate anymore and suffered too much, then dispute through credit company. At the end of Sep., I had to cancel my living room set, 3 months after the canceling date, still no refund. then I had to call credit card company to dispute it. I will file this to Attorney General in NY, BBB has less power to do anything to them, even some customer said the Attorney General is also just a paper tiger. We all have to do something to protect ourself, victims of the furniture place galaries.
Don't confuse this place with the Hotel Serena Del Mar, which is a upscale wonderful hotel with a great quality food. Villa Serena is right before this hotel and has great music and drinks but the food is horrible and not fresh. The lobster was overcooked, the beans were not fresh, nor the rice and the salsa was watered down. This is all okay if your drunk, but if your a foodie you will not appreciate this place.
Any of you getting food to go, please check before you leave. The staff has this wonderful habit of giving you less than what you ordered.
None
Where to start. I wanted an oil change and full inspection. What I got was a loosely reconnected alternator when the wrong tool was used for my oil filter, then a day later my Axel came away from my lsd. Turns out someone unbolted it (probably to check LSD fluid.) And didn't bolt it back on properly.. if at all. I cant believe I even got my car home. No euro car should ever be taken there. In then end they couldn't get my filter off so I didn't even get my oil change.
None
El sitio es precioso pero el servicio y la relacion calidad-precio de la comida es regular. Volveria para tomar un cafe o una cerveza, quiza para desayunar pero nada de almorzar o cenar alli. Hay sitios mas interesantes y con mejor calidad-precio en los alrededores.
Dave's Furniture World is no longer at this address. It is now "Woof Central" a dog daycare.
Is it the lighting that makes everyone inside this walmart disgusting to look upon? Also, the lady working the far left counter is incredibly rude and needs to be fired immediately. It won't happen, but barring legal reasons, this person would be fired from almost any other job.
Currently stuck in the car wash which shut off. Okay now back through for a second try. Would not recommend.
Do not go here! We took our newly bought '78 Chevy pickup to them in July. What was supposed to be a two week job ended up taking two months, in no small part because because when they Rhino-lined the bed they let it drip all over the new paint job and had to redo that. Later they were supposed to send us some touch-up paint and never did. My husband ended up just picking some up when he had to go back (big surprise!) because they had messed up the quarter-panel. Finally, last weekend we had some bad scratches done, so he called this week and scheduled an appointment for this morning at 9:00. We get all the way up there (Did I mention we live in Longmont?) and the place is empty inside except some guy dry-walling. Needless to say, no one answered any of the phone numbers we had. With such a pattern of both poor work and customer service, Maaco should have revoked their franchise license a long time ago. They also should have had calls to the shop rerouted, starting immediately once it was know that they would be closing (as it appears that is what has happened), so that they couldn't spend their last few days setting up unsuspecting customers just to get back at Maaco.
Did not eat there because I was not greeted when my sister and I walked in the door. Plus all the tables was dirty and the place had a sticky smell. I advice anyone to chose another place to eat.
Bought some fish and chips there. They went straight in the bin down the road.
Most of the people I've met from Montana since I've moved here have been extremely friendly like the people back home. NOT AT SWANEES... the regulars are a little stuck up and definitely not the typical, friendly Montana people I know. Have been here a few times, the first time it wasn't very busy and we had a good time. Each time after that they've been pretty busy and the atmosphere was horrible. We definitely felt uncomfortable and the service was very poor. Food isn't bad, just your typical bar food. Nothing special. Looks kind of like a dive, which I usually like places like that, but the people treat it like the country club with some of the most unfriendly people in town.
自然風光漂亮，傍山臨溪。入住雙人小木屋溫泉套房，盥洗用具簡陋，是紙毛巾，房間內無蓮蓬頭，熱水只有水龍頭有溫泉熱水，無法調整溫度，且此水龍頭每20分鐘後會自動變為冷水，需休息一段時間才會回復。雖有浴池，但因熱水自動斷掉設計根本無法放滿。入住剛好是下雨的冬天，房內並無除濕機以致非常潮濕。假日價格3k up，無法反映在住房品質上。
Stay away. Although I had a reservation, I was pushed to another hotel, not even a Marriott property, because they were over-booked. I was given no notice or choice. I'm even a Marriott Rewards member. I cannot believe a company would treat its best customers in this manner. Never again Marriott!
Good customer service in this area. Haven't had any problems with Comcast customer service. However, the internet is atrocious. More specifically, the wireless "capability" (calling it capable is a stretch) on the TG 862 is just bad.
Food was not that great, worst general tso's chicken ever.
None
Go to Tamarindos instead, its just a few miles away from El Sarape, on the corner of Skippack and Butler Ave. Food is way better, way more flavor, and the FREE margaritas are delicious and not watered down.
I had my water pump blow out on my 2006 330xi. I had my car towed to the first BMW mechanic that showed up on google search which happened to be Boyd Motor Works. They called me when they started working on it to give me the quote. They quoted me at a little over $1300 to replace the water pump and the thermostat. I called Portland BMW dealership and asked for the same quote. They quoted me $1100. I called Boyd back and they stated that it was a computer glitch that caused the high quote. I accepted that and they told me $1100 for the fix (This seamed very strange to me based on previous experiences that a private small mechanic would charge as much as the dealership but I had not choice at this time). Once finished, I talked to my old mechanic and two BMW dealerships to compare pricing. Boyd charged me for the initial inspection ($100) even though I had them fix the problem. BMW dealerships don't even charge you for this if you have the work done with them. Boyd charge me the same amount for the cost of both the thermostat and water pump that the dealership charges. Previously private mechanics charged less than BMW dealerships for work I had done. Boyd charged $100 per hour (BMW dealerships charge $120). In the end Boyd charged me $70 less for labor (3.5 hours) yet $100 more for assessment then two BMW dealerships would have done. This means that in the end I paid $30 more to have Boyd do the work that Portland BMW. Does this make sense? I called my old mechanic (John's Auto Care in Medford Oregon) and they quoted me $850 for the work. They said I should not get charged the $100 for assessment and they would have sold me the parts for a discounted rate from what BMW sells them. To make things worse, I asked them how much to replace valve lifters in my engine that cause a ticking noise. Boyd said this would be a 3-4 thousand dollar fix because of how far into the engine they had to go. I asked John's auto care about this. They quoted me $1000 - $1100. They said it was a 4 hour job. To be clear, John's is a certified BMW mechanic. They have all the required equipment and computers to read all the sensors, and to correctly do the timing for the vehicle after a job like this. Their mechanics are ex BMW dealer mechanics. They quoted me 2-4 thousand below Boyd for this job. Bottom line, based on this single experience, Boyd overcharges for their work and appeared to rely on customer ignorance with regard to cost of service. I would have gladly been a return customer and raved on this review if they had treated me fairly. I would like to reiterate that the work they did appears to be done well. I do not have any problems with my cars coolant system since my fix. This poor review is purely due to being taken advantage of financially.
From check in to check out my girlfriend and I had a terrible experience. Personally I felt disgusted in the way the hotel manager conducted himself whenever there was an issue or complaint (never apologetic or sympathetic - always angry and threatening). The room was only cleaned once from our 3 night stay, and the noise from the hallways was enough to keep anyone awake all night - thin walls and poor construction. The customer service at this hotel is beyond disgusting - I barely complain and see myself as an optimist, although after staying at this hotel, I wanted to leave the minute I arrived. Almost ruined our holiday.
Apathetic staff & the quality is no longer justified by the price. Even the bread is no longer as tasty as it once was! Sad!!
If you live in a ground floor apartment as I did, you will hear your upstairs neighbors make a loud unexplained thud every morning at precisely 5:30 AM. You will also, in the afternoons when you are not at work, hear them walking from the front of their apartment to the back of their apartment repeatedly for a period of no less than one hour. You will hear your next door neighbors having really good sex. Your heater will break down in the middle of February and maintenance will come out to fix it eventually (maybe half a day, even if you have an infant in the apartment and it's below freezing). It will work for about an hour and then it will break down again. They will come and fix it again. It will run for a day or so and break down again. You will give up and just buy more blankets and soup. You will, after one year and two requests for a locksmith, still not have access to your storage locker. You will suffer crippling depression and misery after a prolonged stay in these overpriced apartments. Still, washer/dryer in house. Maybe it's worth it.
My boyfriend and I went here for lunch on a Sunday. We had to wait about 5 minutes at the 'please wait to be seated' sign when they were not busy. Then we were told to sit where we would like. It was VERY cold. Our table was dirty and the bartender never cleaned it off for us. The menu's were dirty, from front to back. Our starter was very small. Five mozzarella puffs for $7? It took our server another 15 minutes to come back and take our order. Food got there in a reasonable amount of time. The wings had a very odd buffalo flavor to them. Also our server was very akaward, had to ask for everything that we wanted. Even refills on drinks. It was not a busy time of day so I don't see why service was so horrible. I do not reccomend going here if you are looking for good food. It is average, but I would rather go to TJ Rockwells over here.
I took my car in because the gear shifter had worked it's way out of the pattern and was missing third. I knew it only required some adjustment but was told I needed a new clutch and more work which would exceed $1200. I told them just to put it back together and it's been working fine now three YEARS later.
Terrible. Over charged for our stay and WAY too many complaints. when we got there, there was a dead rat on our roof. The upstairs shower leaked to downstairs and had two settings: hot or cold. The down stairs shower was very touchy and almost impossible to get to a useable temperature. the lady at the front desk was VERY rude and unaccommodating. There was no real maid service. Our fridge had no shelves in the door so it was hard to store things. I'll stop here but out list of complaints went on and on. P.S. don't believe the bottom review. It was left by the owner of the place just to have a good review.
The room seemed clean and fine, and the front desk staff was polite and helpful. However, the back doors into the hotel were not very secure so I did not feel incredibly safe, especially in that area of Tacoma. I'm also quite certain there was prostitution occurring across the hall from us... I would never stay here again.
Placed an order on GrubHub that said it would be ready for us to pick up. Their site said they closed at 3pm. Co-worker got there to pick up food at 2:55pm and they had closed already -- no one was in the place. We never got our food.
always out of cash
People do not pick up after their dogs at this park. There are trails of woodchips, presumably because it's muddy, but it's best to stick to them, and watch where you walk, or you'll step in poop. Personally, I will never go back there. I don't want my dog running around in unsanitary conditions. When people don't pick up, I can't help but speculate about what else they're not doing in terms of upkeep of their animals. Where poop goes, so goes disease.
542 Little Bourke St, VIC 3000 Nine floors of carparking really does requires a working elevator but sadly this is often beyond the capability of this carpark. Located near Spencer Street and the airport bus, one often sees exhausted travellers with heavy suitcases joining the executive crowd on the march up their filthy staircases. In over a month I have never seen one attendant but I have witnessed the breakdown of the ticket machines, the boom gates and both elevators. When I recently tried to trace lost property Wilson Carparking let me know they have no procedure to identify, manage or return lost property. Their indifference to the customers who pay hundreds of dollars in a week is actually corporate contempt.
None
I love the glen but not the food. Never rate this low before. The dipping sauce so sweet, should call this place Jardinia Uno.. The dipping sauce so sweet it can be used for pizza sauce. Asked for sliced jalapeño, it even taste like green papers. Used come to this place a couple year ago and the owner used to give me original souce which very spicy and original. I just can't shake it..even Italian place,Bravo, 2 block down has spicier calamary sauce..
They are ok with cutting off dead ends on a woman's long hair, but I wouldn't have any greater expectations for them outside that. The same applies for men. A simple trim or shaping of short hair typically goes well, but anything beyond that is unreasonably high expectations for a First Choice establishment.
Antes era uno de mis italianos favoritos. La última vez el camarero nos trató bastante mal, estaba solo en la sala y se le veía saturado. No fue de agrado que los platos en vez de servirlos parecía que los lanzara en la mesa. Al "lanzar" uno de los platos tiró un poco de agua de la botella encima de la comida y ni pidió disculpas. La comida está muy buena, pero el menú del día tiene platos demasiado básicos y no muy italianos, también es aburrido ya que siempre es el mismo desde hace un montón. Una pena, espero que cambie a mejor.
Only popular.........no true education not good teachers
I had the lumberjack breakfast. The eggs, potatoes, and bacon tasted like they were all cooked in the same reused oil. And you can't pat the oil off the potatoes? I think people like this place for the hip and trendy look. It's got that "hole-in-the-wall feel, but hey, our waiters have retro hair" style,. The coffee was so-so. It had a slight taste of dirt - like the mug or pot hadn't been washed in awhile. I honestly think IHOP does a better breakfast.
If you have other options, go to them instead. As others have mentioned, customer service here is exceptionally poor. One employee stopped helping a customer mid transaction because he was "off the clock".
I bought my car from them 3 weeks ago and I have only driven it for a total of 3 days, otherwise it has been in the shop. It was a brand new car!!
They have poor product selection. Their customer service is below average. Why would anyone want to shop at Gunnies? Go to Cabelas or anywhere else. I tried to do a return. They went to great lengths to make sure that it was impossible to do. If they are going to do that on a $30 item, what are they going to do to you if you try to return a more expensive item? I know that I will *never* shop there again and will tell anyone else that will listen to never shop there too.
None
The service was so bad I almost don't care that our food was overall very good. Our waiter was horrendous. As soon as we ordered sodas and water to drink he treated us like crap. We got a single drink refill (no exaggeration, one single refill) the entire night, our food was served by wait staff with our waiter refilling the wine glasses and laughing at the next table. His name was Miguel, just so I don't insult any of the other staff, and it was one of the worst restaurant experiences I have ever had. It was also my birthday, so that was just dandy.
None
I have nothing good to say about LaserShip. I consistently order packages from amazon and pay extra money for next-day shipping and do not receive packages when they say they should be delivered. LaserShip will mark packages as "Delivered" without them actually being delivered. I have repeatedly complained to amazon to no avail.
i had a horrible experience with the pharmacy. they conveniently switched me to the generic version of the prescription i was on for my painful disease of Rheumatoid Arthritis. Went through months of pain as i did not want my insurance company to be charged twice. went there to pick up my prescription and they again conveniently tried to provide me with the same version of the drug. I ended up getting into an argument with the pharmacist who rudely asked me "do u even have a job?" after that rude and racist remark i blew up and swore at her. I was already frustrated and feel foolish for my inappropriate behaviour. However, i am the customer and have worked in customer service for five years now for a financial institution dealing with frustrated cranky peoples finances. THAT IS NOT HOW YOU DEAL WITH FRUSTRATED CUSTOMERS. I was very upset and they tried to "escort" me out of the store...i would not leave however and the police were called. finally after realizing i was not going to get anywhere by sitting there, i left. i called the main line, gave them my information about her racist remark and left it at that.
As a Prescott local, this is one local Prescott establishment that I will never visit again. I love the beer at the Prescott Brewing Company. The service has been mediocre at best, unless you set at the bar, Katy is wonderful. Either way the beer has been worth it. My recent visit was during happy hour and the prices were great. I found they offer wings, only during happy hour, at 45 cents each, with a minimum of 5; no problem. I ordered a dozen. I finished six and ordered another lovely pale ale. When I ordered a desert to go, for the fetching Mrs. Sullivan, and asked to have the remaining wings wrapped to go, Katy said, "you can't take them with you"...I thought she was kidding. When the night bartender came on, she confirmed that indeed, I could not take them with me, it was a restaurant policy. WHAT? I paid for them, this is not a buffet, why can I not have them packed to go? Susan, the manager, confirmed that that has been the policy for 19 years and that the owners are unwilling to change this. They would rather throw away good food than let the consumers take it with them. As a Prescott local that visits the PBR two to three times a month, they have lost a customer for life. My entertainment dollars are limited, as are many other families. I can assure you that I will not return to this family owned establishment; that is the most ridicules policy I have heard of in my twenty plus years in the restaurant industry. My advice is to not visit them or to buy their beer in the few locations that offer it. This just goes to show you how a mom and pop establishment can ruin a good thing with goofy policies. There are many other very good pubs within walking distance to the PBR and whisky row in Prescott that I will be visiting with my family.
I am unable to call. Their phone line is always busy to the point that I think it may not actually function at all.
I don't often get to eat at I-Hop but I had an early work day start today (5 AM Friday) and thought I would have a good breakfast first. I found that although the door signs say they are open 24 Hours a day Friday and Saturday that for I-Hop, Friday does not start until 6AM. So off to work w/o breakfast...lesson learned. Makes me wonder when the 24 hour day ends.
The pumps here will rob u blind and the clerk will play stupid redneck clerk. It's hard to get 20 gallons in an 18 gallon tank with a quarter tank left on the gage.
Hi, I'm a top producing Real Estate agent with RE/MAX here in Calgary. I work with Real Estate lawyers on a daily basis, and frankly, THIS IS BY FAR THE WORST LAW OFFICE I HAVE EVER WORKED WITH! Please learn from my clients' mistakes, and DO NOT WORK WITH THEM. It's shocking how a such an unprofessional, unorganized law office is still in business today. Through the course of a month in dealing with them, the paralegals have MISPLACED OUR FILE, never called me back (after many many calls), the receptionist HUNG UP ON ME, they've lost documents, sent the wrong documents, and failed to complete the necessary work by possession, and NOW WE CANNOT CLOSE ON TIME!! Please learn from our mistakes, do your research and DO NOT LET THIS COMPANY HANDLE YOUR BIGGEST ASSET!! I'd be happy to explain our experience to anyone who is interested. I feel like this entire company is ran by crooks, and I'd hate for someone to share the same struggle that we've been through. -Caleb Reich
We rented a room with a hot tub for 50 bucks more. When we got there they gave us a room that stunk like menthol cigarettes and In and Out burger which we could see directly out our window. We went back down to the desk to get a different room. This room also did not have a hot tub. We were told they'd take 10 bucks off. I'm like "Are you KIDDING ME?!?" The manager was too chicken to talk to me on the phone. The place is crazy noisy right next to the main road and there's some sort of machine running across the street at all hours. Trust me when I tell you my room doesn't look a damn thing like the pic above. While the room was clean, the water pressure was abysmal, and they gave me tiny dish towels to dry off with and I got to stand in my own dirty water as I showered because the drain clogged. They said online it was steps from the beach and what must have meant was two thousand steps because it's a 12 minute walk which is not bad but it's not the point. It's dishonest to label your hotel near the beach when it's truly not. Expensive, noisy, small, stuffy, as well as rude, lying cheating, dishonest staff. Oh and highly unfriendly. They did absolutely nothing to try and compensate us for their messed up booking knowing they had us over a barrel. When we got here there front desk area had five families complaining about a variety of things. The people who run it are idiots. They should be fired, rehired and the fired again just for emphasis. Oh and my pillow case had blood on it! WTF?!? Don't stay here. There are many MUCH nicer hotels right down the street. While my experience at the Comfort Inn in Ventura was hideous, and the city itself is very chill with a lot of cool people and places to see.
None
Don't even bother. Been to both T-Mobile stores here in Gvl. Waited for an hour each time and couldn't get served. Was going to switch my service to T-Mobile but if this is how their customers get treated - NEVER!!
Worst room service and behaviour of staff very rude, overall bad choice of this hotel
I LOVE IT
Nice cabins but they claim it takes 10-21 days to "process" the security deposit inspection. While most places will put a hold on your card, Timber Tops actually charges you ($1000 in my case) in advance, therefore will most likely show up on your next billing statement. I advise looking elsewhere.
Wrong location
Warning. I bought two pairs of circular needles from them a few weeks ago, my first time in this store. After I started my project I realized one pair was too large. I went to the store today to exchange for a smaller size and was told they do not exchange. I did not asks for a refund, only an exchange. The needles were in there original plastic baggie that had never even been opened. The saleswoman was very blunt. What an unethical business.
Very unreliable company with extremely poor customer service. Do not even bother to call to let you know that they won't show up to deliver the heating oil you ordered and they promised to deliver the same day. Do not use them, call another company!!!
Nice decor and food pretty decent at reasonable prices . Shame the service let's it down a bit. The staff are friendly but take their time getting drinks or coming to get your order. Would visit again but for coffee and a cake next time. Update... Came back for my coffee and cake. Coffee was lukewarm and carrot cake was disappointing! Such a shame......
They have managed my rental property for the last 2 years and nickle and dimmed me at every opportunity. When there is an opportunity for them to make money they call me right away. However, when I am losing money because the tenant is not paying rent they don't contact me. In the latest incident they let my tenant go 4 months without paying rent. During this time they racked up charges on the deposit and made away with more than half of the deposit. But that is just the tip of the iceberg. During that 4 months they charged me to inspect the property and called me to tell me all the things I needed to fix. However, they left out one major detail. The tenant had trashed my property. If your looking for someone to manage your property, go else where because this guys are not looking out for you. All they care about is how much money they are going to charge you. The only time they will communicate with you is when they are making money from you. The level of communication when your loosing money will be very poor. I would call and email multiple times in a week before I got a response. I have never called the office when I have a problem and reached someone who can help me. Most of the times I don't even get a callback when I leave a message so I have to callback later.
육질이 좋게 말하자면 쫄깃쫄깃 하고, 나쁘게 말하자면 질김. 손님은 많고 직원은 적어서 직원들이 친절할 수가 없음. 너무 바쁘니까 땀을 흘리면서 음식을 들고 오니까, 음식에 땀이 떨어지지는 않는지 걱정이 됨. 남은 반찬을 손님 앞에서 모두 버림. 남이 먹던 음식을 주는 것이 아닌가 하는 불안감이 없어서 좋음.
Aucun rapport avec un Novotel français.A rénover complètement... Cuisine nulle. Seule la piscine peux présenter un intérêt.
None
unfortunately the service was awful, very long waits, many items did not arrive, and the restaurant was under staffed. All things considered, the staff worked hard to deliver and meet demand, but it was questionable whether this place is managed well. The washrooms and floors were disgusting to say the least. Food quality was moderate and prices are not awful.
Sérieux oubliez ça
Horrible
Closed
Stay away from this dealership; if you have a problem they are rude, un-kind and can care less. We bought a brand new car and took it to this dealship due to a electrical problem and was treated like crap. Yes a brand new car and already three problems with it; thats why we bought new not to have the problems!! Also to top it off we made a appointment and took off from work and was the first one there to be told "oh" we over booked you can come back another day. Focus on your customer service as you lack this in a major way. Las Vegas use one of the other TWO dealerships in Las Vegas.
None
We stayed at your resort over the weekend for the very first time. I just wanted to bring it to your attention that as returning FL Key visitors for the last 12 years I was very disappointed in our stay. Marathon is where all my immediate family lives so you can image I visit the island numerous times a year staying at many locations. Our initial room when we checked into Banana Bay had a broken A/c. No air what so ever. After loading everything into this first room, bags coolers and our two year old we were VERY irritated after a 4 hour drive when we had to move again. Our second room the lady moved us to was just as bad with roaches and the smell of cigarettes and dog. I feel this was very unfair to us and the price for the rooms was not justifiable.
NASTY!!! HATE AMERIMEXIC!!! REAL MEXICAN IS BETTER!!!
No military discount provided unlike other stores; one of the employees was really an a.. unpolite to customers
Horrible. Misrepresentations galore. Do not use this company.
Formerly known as Menara Naluri
The manager is rude and they didnt make the coffee correct even when they ask how you want it
The White Rose is overpriced. I received frankly the worst hair cut I have ever gotten and it cost me much more than it should have. On top of that, the receptionist never told me that they do not accept tips on credit cards and I was forced to return later in the day just to tip my stylist. The service was poor and I would not recommend it for haircuts.
Great when they show up on time... but at least double whatever they tell you the wait is. I would rather know it will be a hour then lied to and told 15 mins...
We purchased a fridge and stove from the location at Bowles and Wadsworth. We received extremely poor service from Eric Ashby. He failed to help us find a fridge that fit our dimensions, even though we had measurements with us. Eric failed to mention the amount of space needed for the doors to open, failed to mention the $15 extra we would be charged if it didn't fit in the front door, and didn't mention the re stock fee if we were dissatisfied with product, and failed to mention anything about the extended warranty. Great salesman huh!?! Called to complain, never heard back from manager(Nate), after leaving two messages, until he got an email forwarded to him from Corporate. Never will we use Appliance Factory Outlet for ANY appliance purchases!
Ridiculously overpriced... noisy and not a good spot to work at all... First and last time
Went here for a simple steak dinner. Got a 14 oz sirloin that was over cooked and took them an hour to make. Every one was nice, but if I'm willing to pay $50 for a sirloin, then you need to be willing to cook out correctly and in a timely manner. Should have gone to Ruth Chris. Would have been far better steak at a similar price.
Biasa
Bad
Everything is dusty as f*%&. Stains on everything. These maids suck at cleaning; (LAZY) Used hairy bar of soap left in tub, piles of garbage behind the TV. Wifi is active but with no service . Vending machines snacks/softdrinks have been vandalized and out of order. Cell service sucks in room. If this place had no power it would look overly abandoned. Complimentary CRAP to eat. Structurally this place should be condemned. I've stayed in better crack motels in Hollywood,FL.AVOID THIS PLACE LIKE THE PLAGUE. YOU'VE BEEN WARNED!!!!!
None
Just as others have said, Grismer is over priced. Last week my daughter took her car in for new brake pads, rotors, and a new caliper on one side. The cost, $1000. I don't know if they thought they were trying to take advantage of a young woman or what, but we didn't let them do the work at that price. We took it over to Sears at Fairfield Commons and they did the same work for $428. I got an estimate from the new foreign car repair place across from the Meijer gas station, and it was about $450. Be careful of Grismer! They may OK for tires, but that's about it!
One of the worst TeamSport venues I have been too. Dire customer service and the worst marshalling I have ever seen in any motorsport. This is what indoor karting was like 15 years ago! Health and safty should pay this place a visit.
This wasn't the greatest experience. Was sold something that had aftermarket DVD after being told it included factory installed. On top of that I spoke with the GM and was expecting a phone call on options to resolve this situation. I called the day after and was told he would call me back. I haven't heard anything from them and feel this place is very shady.
This place is incredibly slow. Make sure to bring a quilt to knit, because you'll have plenty of time. I've been waiting for over an hour for a drug test.
My boyfriend took a job with these people. Everyone in the area loved him and called him all the time for rides. Said he was THE friendliest cabbie ever. Metro is so worried about lining their pocket they make it impossible for cabbies to make a dime! They kept shutting his comp down for 'unpaid lease' and he was giving them almost everything he had. He had a call from a customer he had the previous day and got in the cab and his comp had been shut down. This guy needed a ride to the airport (a GOOD fare for him). He was obligated to the customer and took him on his own dime. He called the 'shop' and told them what happened and they told him to bring the cab back. He was fired! I know good, honest and friendly cabs are rare, shame they let him go when he gave them a GOOD name!
The worst haircut I ever had in my entire life! I have been served by Giovanni, he is a real butcher... I asked for a simple short mens haircut and ended up with non-simetrical sides, long single hair sticking out here and there... A nightmare for which I paid 15£! And now after I showered I realise that I urgently need another haircut!
Tracey is the RUDEST person I have EVER met! My bff & I went there to put in our apps, We live almost an hour away from Falcon Staffing, We wanted to carpool to & from Alliance Airport to save on gas. Now if One of us couldn't go in for that day no problem we both have our own cars so the other could have still gone. Tracey goes on (all but yelling to our faces) "Do NOT call me & say/ask one word of the other! I am ONLY dealing with you if I call you to work!" We agreed that that made since and was totally fine with us. Few days goes by & she calls to tell me that The temp Cell phone refurbish we was doing was ending and had to let US go! Now where does she get off asking me if I talked to my bff and then precede to tell me how she was let go also!? How in the world is that fair/right?! The woman is crazy & I think shes drunk on her power of "I can hire or fire you!" She's a bitch! excuse my language......
Rudest chef and worst experience in LA. I've been here once before, thankfully the Chef was nowhere around. This time, while my wife was sampling the new meat curries, the Chef went off on us saying he's letting us sample as a courtesy and we should limit our sampling to 2 curries ( and when I mean sampling, my wife asked for half a teaspoon without any meat, just the curry). And he didnt stop at that. Im guessing he was drunk, because between that and his horrible accent, I could only pick out words i wouldnt expect from someone in the service industry. When he said something about 'next time...' I cut him off saying there would be NO next time. He said he cant run a business if everyone came here and just sampled his food and that he was extremely busy ( all the while, sitting idle in the corner like a zombie and with no other customers). And then he compared his food to Panda Express!!!! The food sucks and the customer service is non-existent.
None
This review is about Wells Fargo as an institution and not about the specific branch. While checking my balance on line, I accidentally signed up for a service that had a monthly service fee. I called the bank to cancel the service. I was told I could not cancel the service online or over the phone. First, I had to go to a branch and set up a password then call back. I explained I signed up without a problem and asked why it was so difficult to cancel. To comply, I went to the branch and set up a password. I then called the bank. As of this moment, I have been hold for over 50 minutes listening to the phrase: "The next available banker will be with you as soon as possible. Your call is important to us and will be answered momentarily." I do not believe I am important. It is way to hard to engage in simple transactions. I also believe the bank intentionally does this to generate revenue. If it is hard to stop a service, the bank makes more money.
I love these reviews by the staff!!! The new indoor pool is attractive and the general area around it is clean. Although the average age of the health club members must be high 40s to low 50s, the (actually quite unresponsive) club management insists on playing the "Top 20" which makes many of us absolutely cringe. Young people with their ipods can much more easily listen to the stuff they like than us older folks. Ladie's room, while not filthy, is not clean. Hair everywhere. Having a female attendant come through with a mop a couple times a day would make the experience much more pleasant. Members have to wash the floors before classes. Will look for a more responsive club when my membership expires. On the plus side, the two classes I take are fine.
My son's experience with Bliss Bakery. He asked them to fill out paperwork regarding his work experience and they told him that they would complete the paperwork. A month went by and when my son phoned to see if the paperwork was complete they told him that they lost it. My son then dropped off more paperwork and two weeks later called asking if they had it completed in which they told him “he wasn't a priority.” I then called Bliss Bakery and tried to explain to them they were not obligated to fill out the paperwork, but since they had told my son they would, to please follow through with their promise. The female owner was quite rude and told me that my son was not a priority. I told her that I didn't expect the paperwork to be done that day but perhaps in the next week since they had already told my son twice it would be completed. Well instead of completing the paperwork. The owner phoned the school, wasting the councellor's, my son's and my time stating that they would not be filling out the paperwork. The school then had to phone me and let me know but told me that regardless of the way Bliss Bakery acted that he would still be getting his credits. If Bliss Bakery had just told my son from the beginning that they were not going to fill out the paperwork all this could have been avoided.Unfortunately, sometimes kids have to learn the hard way that not so reputable companies do exist. I do believe that because a grown up called them on their lack of actions they were trying to be spiteful to my son which is highly unfortunate. THEN, I received another phone call from the school because Bliss Bakery was upset I wrote about about them on another review website. When you run a company and subject yourself to websites that have reviews, if you treat people unfairly, you will receive a poor review. You can't ask that it be taken down because you didn't get a good review! I believe when you promise anyone, especially a young individual that you are going to do something you follow through with your word. Bliss Bakery lacks integrity and I will never shop there again.
味は美味しいのですが、衛生状態が問題です。地面に落した氷を店員さんがひろって水のピッチャーに入れた場面を観てしまって、それまで月二回ペースで通っていたのですが、それ以降はこの店には足を踏み入れられなくなってしまいました。衛生面をそれほど気にされない人には、味はいいのでお勧めです。
Hotel muito ruim, quartos precários, chuveiro não funcionava água quente, funcionários sem proatividade nenhuma, tive que pedir mais de 10 vezes para eles colocarem água no frigobar e não colocaram tive que descer e pegar, localização e boa mais garagem externa precisa o manobrista ir buscar, sem contar a má vontade do manobrista que tive que esperar ele voltar do lanche para buscar meu carro. nem piso mais nesse hotel.
Bad vibes.. I'll give them one more try. I live a few blocks away and love local shops. I've been riding bikes for years but road biking is new for me. The girl that works behind the counter was very short and dismissive of me the first time a few weeks ago and this most recent trip she was more overtly rude. I asked a very simple question which must be frustrating to someone that knows so much more about bikes than me. After looking at me for a few seconds like I'm an idiot she finally gave me a few condescending suggestions. I left as quietly as I came in but felt a little discouraged after my encounter. Hopefully she was just having a bad day, either that or I should wait until I'm an expert to shop there again.
worst Courier service. We wont get mail in proper time. No telephone will be picked. customer care wasting telephone bill. Even after 10 mins waiting nobody answering. I am going to complain in right information act. How to file a case on these kind of services
I dont wanna go there again
J'ai voulu y manger un soir avec mon ami et un copain. En arrivant nous étions que deux et il fallait attendre que l'on soit trois pour que les serveurs hyper speed puissent nous placer. Donc nous attendons. Le monde arrivent, la queue se fait plus longue derrière nous. La troisième personne qui devait manger avec nous arrive et j'annonce que nous sommes maintenant trois. On me dit qu'il va falloir attendre que les gens derrière moi soit d'abord installer avant que l'on puisse se faire placer. Pourquoi ? J'ai pas compris alors que les gens derrière mois sont arrivées après. Le responsable m'a dit en m'agressant que c'était normal car nous n'étions pas au complet quand nous sommes arrivés. Franchement j'ai trouvé inadmissible que l'on me fasse poiroter pour rien !!! Je suis partis... En tout cas, c'est vrai que les plats sont bons mais le service et l'ambiance est déplorable. Et je trouve cela vraiment dommage car l'âme d'un restaurant doit être agréable et conviviale. Et ce n'est pas la cas dans ce lieu.
I entered this establishment to inquire about getting my newly adopted dog spayed. The Woman I dealt with was smug and unhelpful. When I was asking about appointments, she began to shake her head before she even started looking. It turned out there were appointments available, so why the head shaking? This came off as very negative. I inquired about pricing and when she told me, she totally had an air of, "You can't afford this." I told her that I had heard that they participate in the c-snip program and offer affordable spaying and neutering. She donned her smug smile again and shook her head while she took great pleasure in telling me, "no." If this Woman has pets, I feel sorry for them.
Are you people insane?? You have just created a sh__ storm!! Why don't you concern yourselves with, I don't know, TEACHING our children and stopping BULLYING?? Just a little something for your suggestion box! Arresting a child for wearing a shirt? Rediculous!! This is a free country, remember? I hope the family gets a lawyer. Geeeeez!
I came to this restaurant because there was a guy outside with a sign that said 5 dollar buffet. So when I went inside there were like 10 more people. Some people were arguing about the fact that there buffet was empty because all the pizzas were consumed and no new pizzas came. It took like 8 minutes for new pizzas to come. Pizzas tasted great but the selection was not big. The waitress was not so great, no refills were offered and my sweet tea tasted more than water than tea. When I checked my receipt it said 6.49 for the buffet so I felt uncomfortable because I came for the single reason that they were advertising 5 dollar buffet. I honestly do not plan ever going back because they made me feel uncomfortable, waitress should be better service oriented, check should be correct, iced tea shouldn't taste like water and most important, in a buffet people should not wait more that 8 minutes for new pizza to come...
I'm sure that weddings and other events at Veritas are beautiful since the venue looks so pretty just during normal holidays, but if you're just going for wine tasting... I wouldn't. The tasting room wasn't too crowded on a Sunday afternoon, but it still took 10-15 minutes for service. The wines weren't spectacular--I'm glad the pours weren't overly generous. The smaller vineyards around the area have much better flavor. The patio is a nice spot for a picnic, but the views are average for the beauty of the area.
What a joke took the girls today to see monsters University at 12:30 and we sat in the dark for 1hr 30 mins watching a blank screen. Then we where given pass to come back any time that are only good for 72 hrs. I spent $31.25 on popcorn soda and to kids packs for nothing. And what made it bad was how it was handled. The staff there has no training on how to deal with this kind of stuff. I will never waste another dime on such a poor excuse of a movie Theater.
Extremely outdated. Many stations are broken, even in the newer areas. Not much has changed in the 25 years that I've been going there. Bright spot is the butterfly exhibit. Have two kids who have fun there for about 15 minutes before they get frustrated with broken or hard-to-operate stations.
The apartments are okay (if a little old). The maintenance is a little haphazard, in my opinion, and little things (like a broken window in the laundry room door, or a busted sprinkler head) can take months to get addressed. They talk about a "Courtesy Patrol" that no one sees. And they have had at least one case of people squatting in an emptied apartment and that required the Irving Police Department to come and get them out. In my opinion, the current manager (Michelle) is not a friendly person. Nor is she interested in actually doing things for the residents. She is, from my perspective, on some kind of power trip. Why else would she be harassing residents when their occupancy rate is low enough to offer a $99 first month's special? It defies logic. So while the apartments themselves are okay, the staff have enough issues for me to personally recommend that you look elsewhere. Too bad, too. This used to be a pretty nice place before she came.
I went through the drive through and asked what kind of sauce was on the Doubliicious sandwich and the lady said it is "secret sauce." I asked her to describe it please and she said "I can't, I don't eat it!" I asked if it was like another sauce? "I don't know!" She said. Ok, so I know I am not going to get anywhere and ask for it to be on the side, and then ask if she can add pickles to it. She said "No." Really!!! I asked again and said seriously you can not add pickles to the sandwich? The sandwich pictured on the menu right below it had pickles on it. I could not believe she said no! I was about to drive off and she came back and said in a rude voice "Never mind we can add them." At the window she told me she could not put the sauce on the side! Then I find out she charged me $.22 for pickles!!! Really!! Who does that? Worst service ever and this is not the first time having bad service at the KFC, although it is the worst. I will not go back to this dump, and it is a dump as the previous reviewers mentioned.
Update. On Jan 1st 2013 I ordered General Tso's Chicken. It was one of the worst attempts at this dish I have had at a Chinese restaurant. The cuts of chicken had large amounts of gristle and sinew. Instead of the traditional General Tso's sauce they used a bland duck sauce with little spice. The store front was filthy.
STAY AWAY! This pet store is fun until you actually purchase something. I bought a puppy and was assured that there was a 48 hour return policy wherein, in the case where the dog would not be a good fit within the first two days, I would receive my money back. I went into the store one day later, as my roommate and I were suffering from the breed's allergic affects, and I spoke with a manager and the owner. The manager claimed they could not refund my money AT ALL. After just 20 HOURS! I spoke with the owner and he brought up some loophole in the agreement I signed. The salesperson mislead me about the return policy and got me to sign the agreement under false knowledge. The owner was very impatient, and I am planning to pursue this with my lawyer. I was out $500 after one day and received no rebate for the puppy. Absolutely ridiculous. STAY AWAY FROM THIS STORE!
We went in today to look at (and potentially purchase) a new Nissan Pathfinder. We already own a Nissan Altima and really like it. So we decided we would buy another Nissan. The initial sales guy, Joe, was really good. He was very easy to talk to and didn't pressure us at all. It wasn't until we met with the manger, Mike J, that everything went downhill. Unfortunately Joe lost the sale because of Mike and I will never return to Larry H Miller Nissan Mesa because of him. To sum it up, when he walked up, he immediately told us that we would only pay sticker price for the Pathfinder; no one ever pays sticker price. He also told us that there were no Pathfinders on the lot and this was why sticker price was the best deal. Joe had told us there were 17 on the lot. When I got home, I verified on their online inventory that they had 17 Pathfinders. So bull on this too. Every word out of this guy's mouth was a lie. He indicated that the only way he would talk to us was if we would be buying right then and there with no questions or haggling. When he was done with us, he told us good bye and didn't even give us a chance to say anything before he turned around and walked away. Because of Mike, I will never return to or suggest Larry H Miller Nissan Mesa to anyone. If this is the attitude of the managers, I can only imagine what the rest of the buying process or even service at this place would be like.
Given a choice between plague and eating here, choose the plague. Slow and rude service, the fried fish was watery, chips were soggy, not licensed, and if you want a glass for a soft drink, you have to buy four plastic cups for a dollar. Cutlery consists of disposable plastic forks, though the bent tines on my fork suggest that it may have been through the dishwasher I assume that the person who named this "Best Fish and Chips, seven years running" was Horrible Henry, the Headless Hobgoblin who, lacking all organs of taste, wants humans to suffer because they have a sense of taste. The claim "grilled in garlic, chilli and rosemary" is NOT satisfied by slopping some sauce over the fish after it is done. We noticed too late that the Wharf Restaurant next door offered a light lunch for $20--we had dinner there several nights earlier, and everything was excellent.
Awful!!! Do not take your child here. I took my 2 year old in because he was running a fever of 104.2. The Dr was extremely rude, and started off the appt by criticizing my parenting. He was also completely wrong in his diagnosis...his best guess was an ear infection and prescribed antibiotics. I felt like he was in a hurry to get me out of there since we came close to closing time. We took our son to his Dr when we got home, and he had the flu...
The service here was terrible. All I wanted to do was ship a 0.2 lb package, and apparently that's not enough to warrant basic attention. I filled out the shipping slip and stood there while the employee helped another person who had come in after me, finally tossing my package at another employee (who had been chatting with a friend since I walked in) with the question, and I quote, "You can do this while you're talking, right?" Apparently she could not. I was forced to just stand there while the employee happily gabbed away with her friend, not bothering to greet or even acknowledge me, let alone do her job and assist me with my package. The friend finally left but the employee even never looked at me once, just punched in the info and charged me. The prices were extortionate as well; I was charged nearly $12.00 just for a 0.2 lb package. Never use this location unless you want to be ignored and overcharged. I'll never be coming back.
I'm willing to give them a second chance because of all of the good reviews, but I was not impressed. I'm pretty sure the gyoza came frozen in a bag, but the server was not able to tell me one way or the other. My entree, the "drunken noodle" did not look very appetizing at all. The actual flavor wasn't bad, but it tasted like the noodles were not seasoned. In truth, it was better the day after. I spent 21 bucks and wasn't especially impressed. Like I said, I'll likely give them another shot, but my first impression was not a good one.
2 years ago I was soon to be getting married and my fiancé's car needed tires, being low on money I thought I would shop around, this was a mistake. I went to firestone and about half way through I was regretting it. I felt like they wanted to charge me for every little process thus bringing the end price up to the competitions. I should have gone to shwab, in addition they were really pushing their protection plan for the tires. I refused it. Though now two year later and 38,000 miles later a bulge on the drivers side sidewall formed. I had my wife take the car in, because the tires have 60,000 mile warranty. They claimed that the bulge was road damage, even though it was not on the curb side of the car and was clearly a manufacture defect. My wife called me and handed the phone to them. After arguing with the sales person I asked for the manager, though the manager was little help and said he would get back to me. Well 45 minutes later with my wife waiting they got back to me saying they would not cover the tire. It was so late that I couldn't go anywhere else and had to take the car on the trip next day and reluctantly bought 2 more tires at a "deal". I will never buy tires from Firestone again. The service was terrible, they made my wife wait for nearly 2 hours.
I loved their Chinese food!! I moved to Jacksonville a month ago, and I found Wok n Roll. I fell in love at first bit, when I tasted the Singapore style rice noodles. BUT, after my third time ordering from there i found a Huge bug in my noodles. I know Ive them asked to hold the onions, but I didn't know I would have to ask them to hold the bugs. At this point, It saddens me to say that I'm officially disgusted with this place. I will never eat there again. UGH!
Save yourself time and money. Go somewhere else. I got my hair cut by a stylist who left it an inch shorter on one side. She was a friend so I politely asked for my money back after my mom gasped when she saw my hair. Terri the Manager, was argumentative and very rude. After "refunding" my money I spent 2 hours at another salon getting it fixed. When checking my account I see that she charged me again instead of refunding me. I called she said she didn't have a district manager and argued with me some more. After reading me the riot act that my money would be returned I grew angry and lost my temper. I contacted my bank who told me she did not attempt to return the money but instead charged me. They would immediately see a refund which they didn't only that when she swiped my card they actually charged. I'm a former Cosmetology student myself and know when someone messes up good customer service is to refer them to the district manager which Terri so conviently does not have. This situation has frustrated me to no end. DO NOT go to this place unless you want screaming kids and rude stylists not to mention a horrible haircut.
Where do I begin? I needed an SUV (2005 Chevrolet Equinox with over 200,000 kilometers) to go to Arizona and rented this vehicle for 6 days...to which I paid for the 6-day rental plus extra insurance. When the owner showed my friend and me the vehicle, the check engine light was on and would not turn off. He said it was nothing to worry about. I asked him about it 3 times in front of my friend and same story. I even asked for a van instead and the owner ignored me. The vehicle was also horribly dirty inside the cab and the engine was caked with mud. We needed a vehicle, so we took the owner at his word on the check engine light (sensor issue) and headed out. It drove all right all the way south and after a couple of days, while I stayed longer, my friend drove the SUV back to Calgary. He got 10 miles outside of Nephi, Utah and it broke down. It was about 10:30 at night and he had to call a tow truck, which we paid $145 to have it towed to Nephi to have it assessed in the morning. The mechanic said the air filter had never been installed properly from the last service and it was jarred loose. We paid $80 to have that replaced. Then the mechanic discovered the reason for the engine light -- the 2nd cylinder trip code was shot. That would have been a $6000 bill in Calgary, but this mechanic said he would do it for $2,000 or offer to buy the vehicle from the rental company. The owner of the rental company said he would talk to the mechanic. I think what happened is he learned his insurance wouldn't cover it because it had broken down and wasn't in an accident. He actually said it would have been better if we crashed it. Then he tried to make us responsible for it. I also had to fly my friend back to Calgary from Salt Lake City because the rental company offered no other alternative transportation, other than trying to force us to tow it back to Calgary. Then he tried to say we violated the agreement, but didn't say how. We did everything to inform him about the vehicle once we assessed what was wrong with it. The owner also took it upon himself to double charge me exact amount of the rental and extra insurance on my credit card, which I had to leave an imprint of when I picked up the vehicle. He also took it upon himself to try and take out another $1000 off the same card. The credit card company reversed those charges, and a few weeks later, when he kept waiting for me to have the vehicle transported (or sell it to the mechanic -- even though it is not my vehicle to sell), he tried to take another $2500 off my credit card. DO NOT RENT FROM THIS COMPANY! I did contact a lawyer, who unfortunately was no help because even though she said she would, she was too busy to even send him a letter. The vehicle still sits in Nephi, as far as I know, and hell will freeze over before I pay him another red dime. When I calculate the mileage versus what I paid extra for the tow, filter, and flight, the owner owes ME.
Spent time looking for the first car for a 17 year old. We found several that were at All Star, researched the value and were prepared to buy. WE HAD CASH IN HAND. A man by the name of DINO come out to help us. He asked who the car was for and I stated a teenager...first car...He looked at me and said "I have been in the business 20 years and if I want to stay in this business 20, I don't work with teenagers. Hmm...We had cash in hand...we were prepared to purchase a vehicle. He walked away. looking at us but refusing to help us. This upset the teenager. Why because of his age should he not be helped? We walked away...We drove a good distance to look and purchase. NEVER BUY FROM HERE! THEY ARE UNPROFESSIONAL, at least this man was. They lost out and will never get our business.
Out of business
Very Rude. Went in to price out a sleve, and the guys didnt seem interested in helping me at all. Two of the guys went outside to smoke and the other stayed and just looked in a book while I tried to talk to him. Not gonna be going there again.
Totally unprofessional. Showed up at 8:30am for my jump at 9am. A few instructors didn't show up. We didn't jump until after 12. We ended up waiting over 3 hours to jump while the staff was playing frisbee and smoking cigarettes. Nobody was apologetic and most of the staff smelt like alcohol. Once we actually got to jump the jump was great but the facilities and the staff were not.
Sales people are not knowledgeable and can't work phone systems.
None
Two friends and I ate there and a roach crawled out on the booth behind us. When we told one of the workers, he walked over and killed it. No apology, no refund. It was as if it was normal. Will NEVER eat there again!!!
ليس جيدا
I'm new to El Paso, and when my car started to need work, we asked around. We were told "just take it to the dealer" by a bunch of people. So I took it to the Ford dealership nearest me...which happens to be this dealership. I regret it ever since. They charge a $90 diagnostic fee if you decide not to get the repair done. That's PER ISSUE. So if you have them look at two issues, get one fixed, and wait on the other, you'll still get charged the $90 for the issue you didn't get done. On top of that, their prices are astronomically high. To top that off, they charged me $200 to fix an electrical issue. I got it home to realize it's not fixed. I called them, they asked me to bring it in again. It's almost a week later, and I still don't have a car. I don't know what's going on with it either. I've called numerous times and my "service advisor" won't return my calls. I'm never going back to them, and you shouldn't either. You're going to just get ripped off and treated poorly.
ABSOLUTE NIGHTMARE OF AN EXPERIENCE. Don't bring your car here@!!!! The owner misquoted estimates, the staff left my car unlocked in their parking lot 3 separate times, I now have warning lights blinking on my dash, and I finally said ENOUGH and moved it to their competitor next store. The managers are incapable of resolving a situation. I wouldn't bring my car back there if you paid the bill!
The Customer Service at this Banana Republic in the Asheville Mall was way below what any customer should experience when shopping in a store. I had purchased some merchandise online that did not fit well, and when i called the store they told me that i could return the products to the store with no problem whatsoever. When i arrived at the store the shorter lady with glasses (no name tag available, but obviously someone of upper management) did not even take the time to open the box to look at the product, she just immediately brushed me off and said she would not be able to return the product without any explanation. She was very rude to me, not to mention the fact she gave me no other alternative to resolving my issue. So now i drove to the store, waited in the line (which took about 10 minutes by the way), and resolved no problem with horrible customer service. Thanks Banana Republic, i'll never be shopping with you ever again.
My experience was the worst within the last 2 months.. I found debri in the bottom of my soda cup, called them for 10 minutes the line busy... Went back up there for the manager to get smart.. I called the D.M, she was very friendly and i felt she handler the matter well. I informed her that it will be in his best intrest to give me my money, or i will call Channel 2, 5, 11 and CNN... The cashier stated that she knew they was serving soda with debri in it...SMDH!!!!!Never again will i visit KFC ....
Sloppy just sloppy
This place sucks... service sucks most unorganized place spinx needs to tear this place down and open a Qt in its place.... go here 1 a week for my son still sucks will never be back
Security check is ridiculous.
None
可能是生意太好了，紅棗飯是很有風味但就是飯粒太乾太硬了，紅棗雞湯的雞肉太柴湯是很好喝但是太少又不能加湯，可能是我們太少人了(一家3口)有點愛理不理的。
On a fait que le restaurant. Mauvaise expérience et je ne reviendrai plus. Frites noyé dans de l'huile, un café liégeois, on (on était 3 à l'avoir goûté) avait l'impression qu'il y avait de l'alcool. Dégueulasse.
None
The coffee was horrible the eggs where lacking in taste too much onions and peppers no eating utensils or butter for toast and the delivery girl had no receipt so she didn't know what to charge had to edit 10 mins to find out my total on the bright side at least the driver was nice.
Pooooor service
My Name is Erin. I am currently living in knight's circle and I HATE IT! No one that they've got employed in the front offices can answer any of the questions that i have, they constantly have people coming in and out of my apartment for various reasons. In the 4 months i have lived here my toilet has broken twice (by leaking) and flooded my room after the problem was supposedly fixed. Our stove spontaneously sparked and blew out while we were only trying to make dinner. Our ice maker broke and flooded our entire kitchen, for which we had to listen to a large loud fan for a week when they said they'd have it out the very next day. I was also very disappointed that when i moved in, my apartment was NOTHING like the apartment that i toured (i know they're made to look nicer, but i wasn't expecting hideous torn up couches and chairs. I can say that maintenance are rather fast at responding to problems, but they are problems we shouldn't have in the first place. All in all, the bad outways the good and i am not at all impressed.
Crooked as a dogs hind leg. Spent exactly 3 minutes talking to me about my case, then tried to get me to plea bargain. Said "I really do not want to do more on this case than I already have." WHAT A CROOK! Please do not use this attorney.
hotel en perte de vitesse, manque d'entretien général et hygiène douteuse, le tout pour un prix "montagne", qui apparait tout à fait excessif...
Doesn't exist any more. Couldn't find it at yonge and Alexander st.
Weak. Go to sand hollow instead. Better track better staff just simply better... Sorry Johnny.
Tried them out (through Ortho Print Source) and their color printing did not match my current pantone colors. When I asked if they could correct it, he does not return calls or emails. Average print quality with poor customer service.
Just left this crap place. I was given a room that was clearly smoking when I asked for non smoking. Then after being given another room I found bed bugs. The hotel had some very shady people roaming around the grounds. I left and will never return.
The restaurant is named after the Biggest mountain in Thailand. Although this restaurant is not to the scale of the mountain, the owners Chris and Busarsa more than make up for this lack of size. A warm welcome should have been the start of a great night but was unfortunately its peak (not a pun) Whilst the ground floor looked more inviting we were sat alone on the first floor and with its cavernous roof was not a comfortable place to dine. Drink orders were taken quickly but had to wait an age for the drinks to finally arrive. Again starters took and age and were quite nice. Mains appeared within a minute of starters disappearing, which was a bit disconcerting. The green curry was well presented, if not small, but lacked any depth of flavour compared to the same dish in other venues. The bill for a bottle of wine, 2 starter, 2mains with rice, no dessert came to almost £70! Fine for exceptional service and wonderful food, but not for the middle of the road meal we received at the Doi Intanone.
Ungerechtfertigter Preis!!!! Schlechter Service (Kundenbetreuung), zu wenig Geräte (unter anderem weil viele ständig kaputt sind), stickig und stinkig, völlig überfüllt und Samstag und Sonntag Abend nicht geöffnet. Nicht empfehlenswert...Den zweiten Stern gibt's nur, weil ein paar Mitarbeiter sehr hilfsbereit waren.
Confused finding it since Ramada signs were up, too. First room was filthy, hairs, smells, horrible stains on carpets and linens (incl pillowcases, etc.). We asked for another room and it was a little better, but not great. We only stayed because we had arrived very late and it was near where we needed to be. By far the worst condition hotel on our 2900 mile trip. They should have paid us to stay there. It was $130 for 2 nights. Ripoff.
Saturday I decided to go for 25 mile bike ride in 111 degree heat - tire popped halfway through the ride, walked 18 blocks to the nearest bike shop - got there at 5:02 and when I got in the shop, I was presented with a pleasant "Sorry, closed at 5" - After explaining my situation, again "sorry, registers are closed, there's nothing I can do" - Thanks Bike Barn at 36th St & Indian School - You recommended me to walk my bike another 10 miles to another bike shop "just down the road" that was also probably closed. Luckily I didn't attempted that and a friend came to the rescue and gave me a ride home. If you want a bike or good, friendly customer service, Bike Barn is not the ideal place to go.
Only 10 entrees on the menu, for the price the food was poor and an even poorer menu variety. I do not recommend coming here unless you just plan on eating chips and drinking liquor!
The Grog restaurant in Newburyport, MA has an average menu. My review of this restaurant has more to do with the service. Over eager door men create an uncomfortable and stressed environment.
Extremely poor service. Fly's in the food. Strange people lurking outside the premises. Unfriendly staff. Booked a room for two, AC would make weird sounds, bathroom stinks. Avoid at any cost.
I felt that the studio was decent (backdrops, props), the photographer quick (which was great since we have two young kids that would have got tired and cranky had it taken longer), and assistant semi helpful, but the fact that they advertise the photo CD (told me when I was making the appointment that the package comes with the high res photos on a CD) and instead give you only low res thumbs and encrypted files that you can only have them reprint (for a hefty fee), really rubbed me the wrong way. It's not that I don't respect photographers keeping the copyright to their work, or that I don't understand this common business model, it's that this was a plain-as-day bait-and-switch misrepresentation of services. When I called corporate, I was told that I misunderstood the purpose of the disk, and that they didn't lie: the disk really does contain the high res photos, they didn't promise that the files wouldn't be encrypted... If you have young kids and want a quick and cheap photo shoot, this place is fine, but don't trust the prices; they're low to bring you in, and when you start to order prints, it adds up quick.
I have gone multiple times but with the prices going higher, the screaming children, the loud chatter and the overcrowded pools, I'm starting to go less and less. When they first opened, it was AMAZING! That was the Peninsula Hot Springs I miss and hope comes back. It is supposed to be a relaxing venue (as they've advertised), therefore I do think they shouldn't allow children in there or open up a day care, even have certain days or hours where children are allowed into the pools and before the "no children" policy time comes, give the pools a thorough clean. The pools are overcrowded but I do understand with it becoming more popular over time. I haven't had an issue with customer service at all. Also, I do think they need to urgently do something about the tiles in the bathroom as I have slipped multiple times and have seen many other slip and it is a serious OH&S issue. Otherwise I do occasionally enjoy going there (when it's quiet)
Very unhappy with their services and the diagnosis of our puppy!! Not to mention,they are insanely expensive!! As soon as we get his puppy shots done,we are transfering to another vet!!!
These people left a huge pile of garbage in the lot after the Cannabis Cup with their banners and their booth still attached days later. They basically gathered their products up and just left a massive mess... They obviously don't care about their image or the image of the cannabis movement. I wouldn't support them on that basis alone. People who are in this industry solely for financial reasons don't deserve anyone's support.
This school boast serving children ages 2-12 but they only focus on ages 2-5. They have some great elementary teachers but dealing with the politics and the "gossip" over shadows what they can do. I considered the school because I was told about the director who was big on diversity but when I arrived diverse it was not. One parent described it as the country club only members. There was no sense of inclusion and it seemed that they lived in a world all their own. A friend recently took her child out and the child struggled with adapting to the lessons of "regular" school. For 20K, you expect so much more. I will use my money at some of the better schools in the area.
The restaurant that cheat you with cheap dishes under South Indian label. The management will mske you feel that you are at their charity. If they notice any take away items in your shopping, even if it is from western brands like pizza express, the bald headed moron would come to your table while you are having his charity food and ask you either to put your items on floor or to leave the shop. Whoever expect better service and quality indian food must find other indian restaurants somewhere else.
Three years ago I went in for some crown work. It was disasterous to say the least. I have never been happy with the fit and the ordeal of having it put in was painful. I had to go back twice as they couldn't get the fit right and even after that it was clunky and the Dr. had to grind it and play with it for an hour to FORCE it to fit. I have two other caps that are fantastic from a dentist I used to use in Indiana. That was nearly 15 years ago and they have not budged. Now, about 3 years and this one pops off! I will NEVER go back to Dr. Prasad.
Very smoky & rude when we asked for non smoking. So we walked out.
The service is not good:( ! Your large is really a medium:/
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCE STAY AT THIS HOTEL UNLESS YOU ABSOLUTLEY HAVE TO. RECEPTIONIST ON SATURDAY 27TH OCTOBER AT ABOUT 11.20 PM WAS ABSOULTLEY AWFUL AND WAS THE MOST UNHELPFUL PERSON I HAVE MET. ASKED FOR A DOUBLE ROOM, GIVEN A TWIN AND WAS REFUSED THE ABILITY TO CHANGE. RADIATOR SQUEAKED ALL NIGHT AS DID THE BED. CLAIMED MY ORIGINAL BOOKING HAD NOT BEEN RECEIVED, WHEN I HAVE SINCE DISCOVERED IT HAD SO CHARGED ME AGAIN FOR ROOM WHEN HE KNEW BOOKING WAS THERE. ROOMS ARE NOT CLEAN AND FOOD ABISMAL
Ordered pizza and hot wings had it delivered they for got our wings but remembered the hot sauce but dropped it on our porch and both the pizzas not only did not have our extra cheese we ordered but no chose at all and barley any saise called the manager and he just gave us excuses call the home office and they promiced to fix the problem and the way they fixed it was sending us a coop on for 5 dollars off next meal for a 45 dollar fucked up perch as needless to say we will never ever go or eat from a pizza shithut again you have been warned
This is probably the dirtiest and most poorly maintained gym I've ever been to. The staff simply does not care about the condition of the place and it shows in every possible aspect. Broken equipment often takes months to fix. Water fountains routinely have problems and don't get fixed. The locker rooms are simply disgusting...dirty towels on the floor, hair everywhere, broken urinals, mold all over the showers. Before I started my last workout, somebody had vomited in one of the sinks. An hour and a half later, it was still sitting there. Besides the condition of the place, nobody on staff seems to care that the equipment is abused and almost never returned to its appropriate place. As a result, good luck finding dumbells you need...most times, I end up walking around the floor searching for one or both. They don't have enough clips for all of their barbells so there's a good chance you'll be using a barbell with loose plates on the end. Even pull-cord extensions (rope, bars, etc.) get misplaced and you'll have a hard time finding what you're looking for in any kind of efficient way. It's simply not a well-run place at all. They seem to care about bringing in new clients as they will have anywhere from 3 to 5 salespeople working at all times. Despite this, there's apparently nobody responsible for managing the freeweight areas, taking notes on broken equipment, or even taking an occasional look in the locker rooms to make sure they don't present a health hazard. (They do at most times of the day.)
Poor doesn't even come close! One meal was so bad the manager refunded the entire thing!
Always missing something from my meal when ordering from drive thru.
Bad one ... Soups are bad ... Didn't like the starters too ... Main course was okay .. I don't think it's worth spending time if theme alone won't satisfy you ...
Bel Red was called to my home for a gall furnace service (change filters, etc.), but the serviceman tallied up $1700+ in repairs, but said I really need a new furnace. My house is only 10 years old. After he walked out the door, I tried to turn my furnace on, and it would not work. I paid him for the service call only - something wasn't right. I then called Bob's Heating & A/C. They sent a serviceman who found wires to the blower had been disconnected and left dangling. Nothing else needed to be done. Nothing else faulty with the furnace. I gladly paid another service charge to Bob's Heating - they saved me the cost of a new furnace. I am an older, single lady and I believe Bel Red was clearly taking advantage of me. Be smart, get a second opinion.
Odd shop.. Expensive which is ok if they are knowledgeable.. Unfortunately these guys did not know a thing about LiPo Batteries, even basic questions.. I am always happy to pay over Internet prices to keep a local shop open, so I jumped down the road to HobbyTown in Sunnyvale, much more friendly staff and happy to share expertise.. Way less expensive too! Such a shame...
One of the worst clinics I have ever been to. Went on a weekend and ended up waiting three hours to be seen. The medical assistant doing triage hardly allowed me to speak because she wanted to rush through the process. The doctor spent more time making fun of me and my life rather than examining me. After waiting for the three hours, the time the doctor spent with me was no more than five minutes before he threw a prescription at me and sent me out. Not once did he even ask me what my symptoms were or if anything else was bothering me. He just assumed based off of the medical assistant that didn't allow me to speak. I would rather go to the ER next time than to ever go here again. And to top it all off, the medicine he prescribed doesn't even work!
No decent shops. But it is free parking.
Really? A young mother with 2 babies tries to eat here and gets yelled at because her cart is too big? After witnessing that debacle there is no way this joint gets any more of my business.
The place is awful. They have a very unethical business practice. They try to convince the kids to ask their parents for more classes so that they get more money. After we cancelled our enrollment, they continued to charge our credit card, despite sending them an email asking them to stop it. We had to threaten to take it to court and call the bank to dispute the charges.
There is old section of the hotel which is very old and the new section is much better. If you book the discount room you end -up at the old section. The staff is not friendly. The only good thing in this hotel is the breakfast. I wont recommend this hotel with those prices.
Pivo ujde, ale jídlo nic moc. Tak hnusné knedlo vepřo zelo za 95 Kč už jsem dlouho nejedl. Ceny za jídlo jsou vzhledem ke kvalitě jídla vysoké. Už tam nepujdu.
BED BUGS!!
My husband had a procedure done here in May 2013. Even though Dr. Horwitz seems to know what he is doing and my husband is now fine, all the other parts of the office are disappointing. Appointment requests were met with 'phone tag' and appointments were moved on the part of the center (not my husband). We asked for insurance verification and were told we were covered at 100% after waiting almost a week. I sat in the waiting room during the procedure. It was dirty and the other clientele were questionable. I was really turned off by their signs stating different must dos and the fact that the staff kept themselves behind this almost amour wall, separated from the people who are providing their income. The staff at the desk were not at all interested in patient relations. The nurses and other attendants were quite professional but did give different aftercare advice than the doctor gave. We placed a clarification call after the procedure and never received an answer. After the procedure, we received a bill for nearly $200. This doesn't sound like 100% to me. I complained and then was threatened with being sent to a collection agency. I currently need attention to one of my feet and under no circumstances would I return to Feet for Life Centers even though it is very convenient to our home.
Went in to buy a battery. HORRIBLE!! Jacob and Sherry should not be in customer service postions. Go to Auto Zone do yourself a favor.
None
Went at 1:30pm to avoid any lunch 'rush" I had the shwarma combo with Fries. Fifteen minutes later I received a nice basket with the Shwarma and hot fries. The fries however, were also greasy -- they had been put in the oil before the oil had reached its correct temperature. The fries were limp, flacid -- although they tasted as though they would be excellent if cooked properly. The meat in the shwarma was a bit dry. I watched two other customers wait 10 minutes after me for a single gyros combo.
Phoned up for a Brompton spoke - they promised to get them in stock for me, but this didn't happen - alas I only found out this when I called in to pick the spoke up. Disappointing.
The units are "okay", but the staff is frustratingly incompetent and dishonest. I lived there for 2 years and had my own car towed several times! I had outrageous charges at the end of my contract that were inconsistent with what I was quoted when I signed a lease. I was told by the leasing agent that the carpets were always replaced after 2 years and that I wouldn't have to worry about charges related to stains or tears, but in the end I was charged over $700 for wear and tear. Do not give them your business!!!
I have had the worst experience!! I never thought i would be so stressed out with buying a car. First of all i traveled 3 hours to go to carmax because i had heard great things. (mind you i was with my 10 month old daughter) I previously spoke with the associates weeks in advance before i went up there and they assured me i was approved and all i needed to do was come in and sign the papers. Well that was NOT the case!! I went in and spend all day going back and forth with these people (with a baby!!) finally at 9:00 at night they tell me i will have to come back tomorrow. so i drove 3 hours home then 3 hours back the next day.(with my child!!) Finally i picked the car up and thought my headache was over. WELL IT WASNT!!! two weeks later my check engine light comes on and they are telling me that they documents they scanned in were not clear.So i had to resend EVERYTHING all over again! To make it worst this dragged out for almost a month. I never heard anything back from them so I called up to the dealership and asked if everything was ok. I was assured by The manager that everything was ok and i would recieve all my paperwork in the mail. So finally i thought this nightmare is over. NOPE!!!! After another month of not getting anything in the mail i call to figure out were to send my payment in ( a month and a half i have had this car) Now the Manager Ellen tells me that i am still not approved because someone put the wrong social in the computer ( best not to point fingers just try to solve the problem the lady tells me) So at a time were i drove to Tx to be with my family because i had a loved one pass away and my aunt had her baby, I have to deal with this car sales nightmare!! I think these people are untrustworthy and have no idea how to do good business. I would not recommend this place to my enemy!!
Agree with another person's review that we wanted to leave after receiving our first dish. They forgot about our second dish and we sat waiting patiently while others around us received several dishes. Worst service we have received at a restaurant for some time. Would not recommend.
Wife's review: Yesterday had my dog groomed. I called ahead of time to notify the groomers that my husband would be picking up my dog, and they said she would be about 15 more minutes. Perfect! So when he got there about 20 minutes later, she wasn't finished and another dog was being groomed, not her. So he waited about another 30. Fine. But this whole time the staff was arguing with each other in front of him. He said not to take her there again because they were rude. I wouldnt have minded if the service was still good. But today less than 24 hours later, she is still leaking all of her anal fluids. Anal gland expression is part of the "Dog Bath" and it was clearly not done. This was the cherry on top of a bad experience. Won't be back... sorry to say.
لا اكلة يسوة و لا الخدمة تسوة و لا هو كلة يسوة و البنكال يلعبون النفس و مثل استاذيتهم وجوههم مبقلية و شايفين رواحهم على الفارغ حيل و القوزي برمضان قبل سنتين جان بتلاثين الف يعني تشتري كيلوين لحم و توكل عشر نفرات بفلوسة و هي جانت آخر مرة اروحلة و الي يخرب من الضحك انه هم صدق متصورين نفسهم مقدمين فدانجاز للانسانية ههههههههههههههههههه هيجي تكول دكتور كاشير مال مطعم هههههههه يعاينك بطارف عينه هالشكل ههههههههههههههههههههه و الله لو يظل آخر مطعم بكربلة هوهم ما اروحلة
Upon arrival room was so dirty I called front desk, they came up, agreed, went to the next room, checked it and didn't let me in, when I asked why the answer was: this room is also dirty! Upon checking out they bungled up my invoice, have been trying to get a correct invoice for more than a week, awful!!
Interestingly enough, this is one of those rare times I have actually taken the time to read the reviews on a business before exploring them in person. Based on the (mostly) negative feedback - which I was honestly surprised to see - I don't think this is a business I am willing to drive almost 2 hours to see a product; despite my need for exactly what they are advertising to have. Perhaps many would say this is too hasty a decision. . .but what's that old say "where there's smoke there's fire?" Public perception is often the deciding point on where we do business. I sure hope this dealership does something about the overall apperance of how their previous customers percive the quality of the service they got at the time of sale.
Dislike this company. You can't schedule a pickup, they won't give you a notification call, they twice got the address wrong, the last time caby had to make a gas run. Simply poor service?
Wow!! What a joke... Greg at fast signs of Cutler Bay is a total scam. After getting all my details about my car, I provided the artwork.. He charged my credit card what he quoted me.... then he realized he needs to look at my car... It was the same car we first spoke about, a Jeep Liberty... He tells me to come down, so he could look at the car, then tells me has to charge me $30 more... That was the 3rd time he changed the price on me! This guy should be a car sales man... a total swindler! Avoid this place!
Terrible customer service! Terrible is a understatement they have the worst management of any place I've ever been to.
I Just had the misfortune of meeting the jerk that works at this store. His name is Greg and it was the most distateful customer service I had ever been met with in my life. I have purchased cars, expensive furniture from ACTUAL furniture stores and had the ability to buy whatever I want from anyone else, but my money is NOT good enough for this douche bag. He was disrespectful, curt, over talked me and my roommate without letting us get a word in. He called us dumb, and said "don't come back" when all I said was goodbye and thanks I'd like to shop around. I wish there was a way to give him a negative 100 but unfortunately, Google doesnt match his level of douche baggery. Heres to you greg and your 2 million dollar inventory that you will probably hold on to because your an @ss. Take care :)
Where's the toppings? I ordered two large two topping pizzas to be delivered. The delivery boy apologized for not providing parmigiana cheese,(they ran out). I didn't care about the cheese but after paying and tipping him, I opened the boxes and began to wonder why he didn't apologize for the severe lack of toppings. Oh well live and learn.
Had my truck broken in to and had my cannon camera stolen and a bunch of other stuff told the staff and they did nothing but suggest i go file a police report.
I wrote one excellent review just yesterday about nice atmosphere and service in this Restaurant, but I will have to take back my excellent review about service part as one of the employes I knew named for 5 years whose named is Jakša, turned out to be not only with inappropriate attitude, but downright rude.. Since I am Connoisseur of good Cognacs, single Malt Whiskey and good coffee, I was ready to give them FREE advice for which I charge £120 per day to teach employes in restaurants, hotels and bars.. He rudely interrupted every word I tried to pass on saying he knows exactly what I wanted to say. He doesn't want to accept the suggestions because HE KNOWS I am wrong! Being waiter or cocktail bartender as I saw in the past does NOT make you expert in coffee making! Big headed and cooky only because I told him I can explain to them in 4 minutes how to make espresso or any other coffee taste great instead of bitter and acidly! Simple mistakes everyone makes because 99.99% of people are unaware of basic hygiene procedure which has to be followed to the letter every time you make new coffee. Dragiša Braunović - Bata
Totally agree with the last post, great up until you sign the papers. Then your at the back of the line. Had Ford Credit calling for weeks cause Sherwood Ford failed to pay out the lease on my trade in. Papers had been signed for 2 months. They even lied to Ford Credit and said it was my fault cause they couldn't get ahold of me. If Ford Credit can get ahold of me then a local dealership should have no trouble. Also was promised that the vehicle would be ready several times and everytime was let down. And lastly they even called me on a saturday, the day after I got the new truck to complain about my trade in!! Are you serious!?! I hope Ford takes away their SVT status.
None
These apts have gone to hell. There is a lot of crime and there are no security officers on site only curtisy officers who look around scan the area from getting out of their car to opening their ffront door. Poor lighting in the parking lot and the office is friendly upon move in only. When you call to speak w management no one is in the office and they dont call back. This company like most have become money hungry and have forgotten about taking care of their residents June of 2011
Great coffee with... interesting service. Paid my bill of $4.55 this morning with $5 and no change was given. ??? I had a dollar ready to drop in for a tip which went back in my pocket. Counter person did not care, did not want to be there, and REALLY wanted my $.45
Customer service has been ingrained into my personality since I've worked retail and the Plato's Closet in Raleigh lacks that entirely. They are so incredibly rude and cold and not personally at all. I always I have a crappy time at this store. It seems to be an ongoing theme in about all Plato Closet stores. It's too bad because I think they'd be amazing if they actually liked their jobs. On that note, they're selection of clothing sucks. They "say" they take things no less then a year and a half old but they will take my three year old destroyed American Eagle shorts and deny quality barely worn Lilly Pulitzer pants that are a couple months old! Their priorities are poor in selection.
I ordered a large Veggie Pizza, they said 45 min, Pizza arrived 90 minutes later, totally cold and tasted like absolute crap.. my girlfriend got sick all night.. I call the manager to give him a chance to rectify the situation.. his weaseled out saying my phone number wasn't in his computer .. we paid cash , so we have to record of it... this is the worse place ever to order a pizza.. avoid it.. we will.. I will tell all my neighbors..
Poor/Fair doesn't seem low enough. This is my second time using their service. Both times the wash and hand cleaning were poor. I had to point out every little spot the first time. The second time I just drove away.
Do yourself a favor and do NOT shop here. To be fair, we found some nice desks (we shopped for a computer desk) for a pretty fair price. Nelle, the owner, seemed to be happy to help at start but quickly got distracted. He tried to push more products and suggest a special drawer stand for the desk for us for an outrageous price. Since we had no time, we agreed to it at the end. Drawers cost us more than $100, where I could get something similar in Staples for probably as little as $40. And then things started getting worse. Nelle promised us a delivery date he could not back up. We ended up waiting for more than two weeks for an order that was supposed to show up after a week. He did not contact us, did not leave messages, he basically did nothing to inform us that there's a delay, we had to call and find out on our own. The was a delay twice. In order to sweeten the deal, Nelle said the desk will be assembled for us. That never happened. The desk came in three different parts, still wrapped up. If someone tried to put it up, they did not finish the job. The guy who delivered the desk was in a hurry, mumbled something, and left the table as is. The furniture seem to be in overall okay shape, but I could have just showed up and take it on my own, for the price they charged us for the delivery (the table is not put up together anyway). The owner also confuses his customers and doesn't seem to know who he's talking to. I gave him identifying information, but he cut me off and told me he left a message, when in fact, it wasn't me he was thinking about. After some back and forth he gave me a quick "yesyesyes" and assured me the table is on it's way. Good thing I called to find out. In short: They have okay things, some of which are for normal prices (do not get drawers and chairs there!!), but they know nothing about customer service and responsibility.
I called ahead and told the person who answered exactly how much I had to offer and what vehicle I was interested in he said it would be no problem. Then, I drove an hour test drove the vehicle and the manager wouldn't negotiate. It felt like a bait and switch type operation. I don't appreciate having my time wasted. That's why I had called ahead and gone through the financing process before showing up.
I was unsatisfied with a couple of customer service things that occurred during my purchase. First, I was upset with how the financing was handled. I was pressured into financing with the dealership so that the sale could go through that night, which didn't end up being in my best interest. I knew my credit score, and my history, and no one could give me even a rough estimate of what the APR might have been (before I was sitting the office to sign the paperwork). I had already been approved for a lower APR loan through another company, and I said how I would rather do that if the dealership couldn't match the lower APR. I also specifically asked if having my parents co-sign would lower the rate, and the response I got was, "I think it will be fine." It seems like someone could have found a ball-park estimate for me, instead of just assuring me that it would be a good deal. Or maybe someone could have found out what the difference might have been -if any- from my parents co-signing the loan. Or, perhaps talked to me about what the best option for me would have been, instead of just pushing financing with the dealership so that the sale could go through that night instead of the next day. So, because I trusted that the APR rate would have at least been comparable to the one I had told them I could get with the other company, I ended up paying the fee to finance with the dealership. Which ended up being for nothing, since I will have to refinance with someone else in order to get the lower APR. I was also upset about the tires, and how that was handled. I specifically asked what ply the tires were on two different occasions- once while test driving the vehicle, and once at the dealership, and I never received an answer. The sales person said that he would check, and somehow, never did. Additionally, I did explain the reason why I wanted the truck- which was to go off-road in the mountains- and still no one ever mentioned to me that the truck came with two-ply tires. It seems like the sales associate would have known, or at least mentioned that fact. I would have liked to know that information before I was actually driving the truck away, so that I could have either planned my finances differently (in order to buy the tires I wanted), or worked something else out entirely. Being a first-time buyer, I feel like I was taken advantage of, and that my best interest was not a priority. It seems like pertinent information was kept from me in order to make the sale. I assumed that if I was open about my concerns, that the sales associate and manager I spoke to would have been more upfront and honest with me about resolving them. But, that didn't turn out to be the case. I would recommend anyone buying a vehicle at this location do your financing elsewhere, and make sure that you do your research. Turns out making the sale might actually be more important than finding out what's best for you, so look things up yourself, don't expect a straight answer from the dealership. Don't be bullied into doing something that might not be in your best interest- honestly, if they say they're not going to give you the price that you just spent and hour and a half agreeing on unless you buy it that night, walk away. There are other places. And it's not worth feeling like you've been taken advantage of or lied to after the sale has taken place...it just doesn't sit well.
WOW...never in 20 years have I been threatened in a retail store! I went to Moab to meet up with a bunch of old friends from Aspen and do a some favorite rides and some of the new rides...I've been going to Moab for over 15 years. Naturally coming from the Bay Area I needed to rent a bike and decided to give Moab Cyclery a try as they had a 29'er I wanted to try. Having done the research I understood they are more expensive than the other bike shops like Poison Spider, Chile Pepper bike Shop, Rim Cyclery and Uranium Bicycles all of which I have rented from before. So I rented the 29'er for two days and also organized a shuttle from Moab Cyclery for my 8 pals at $160 for the shuttle and $150 for the bike. On the last day of riding I called into the store ahead of time to let them know I would be a bit late witht he bike. I returned the bike 30 mins late and was told that their late charge is $30 to which I responded, 'that is a little harsh don't you think, given how much business I have brought your way?' Without any warning, the next thing I knew one of the mechanics (who had previously been friendly enough - dark hairy bearded guy) appeared brandishing a seat on top of a seat post in a threatening way to intimidate me into paying over the $30, which I did. I hadn't been aggressive or threatening in anyway, otherwise I would have expected it, but certainly felt like I was being threatened and intimidated into paying. I would imagine that they are 'jaded' because it is close to the end of the season there, but there is no excuse for what they did. I have been in retail for over 20 years and have never seen the strong arming that I experienced at Moab Cyclery. Make sure you carry a weapon, cos next time I will be!!
Two bites into her rama spinach peanut curry, my wife reacted badly to something in the dish and almost coughed up a lung. I sent the dish back, explaining that my wife was in distress, and asked for something else on the menu. Management refused to provide a replacement dish and insisted on charging us for the mostly uneaten plate. We refused to pay for it, paid for the rest of the bill (no tip) and left. We will never eat there again.
Over the last few years, Umpqua's service in online banking and mortgages has been lackluster. This location has some particularly unhappy/unfriendly tellers.
I rented a house through Coldwell Banker recently and had to wait 2+ months to get the security deposit refund. After the first month of waiting I called the office and they told me it would be mailed in a day or two. After another week I began calling a few times per day and was transferred to the property management department each time with no answer. I left multiple messages and none of my calls were returned for over a week, yet I knew that he was at the office because each day they told me he was there. Finally got an answer and was told that my check would be mailed in another day or two. After waiting another week, I began calling daily again. A few days later I was told that my check was ready and I ended up having to drive down there and pick up the check. Ridiculous. I will never do any form of business with Coldwell Banker again. Maybe my money isn't too important to a company their size, but nearly $1000 is a big deal to me.
So bad.
Went on Sunday, March 2, 2014, 6:30-8:15 P.M. Got a table fairly quickly as the restaurant was about 1/3 full. Took around 15 min for waiter to get our drink order. Took another 20 minutes to get our food order. Took another 35-40 minutes to get our food. I had the meatball dish. Tasted bland and had what seemed like 2 cans of mushrooms in it. Never got a refill on drinks. Took the waiter another 15 minutes after we finished to bring the check. First time there and wasn't impressed at all.
Table 3 Market: This is pretty nice setting in the Mall at Green Hills Area. The food is usually great: Panini, soup, and a great assortment of patries. The coffee is really hit or miss. It's kind of sad to see a place like this serving 2-hour old coffee out of a thermos like you're at the Holiday Inn. That aside, if it wasn't for the incredibly creepy employees, it would be a nice place to hang out instead of Starbucks.
Otřesná obsluha, špinavé stoly a židle, jídlo zcela průměrné. Především ta obsluha je příšerná, neochota, obsluhující slečna se tvářila, jako by ji hosté nevýslovně s#ali, celý personál ani neodpoví na pozdrav, možná tak leda svým známým a kamarádům, kteří asi psali další zdejší recenze. Není to jenom moje zkušenost, fakt děs, nikdy více...
i attend dulaney high school and i can say with confidence that it is run by desert lizards because the air conditioning is STILL NOT ON and 3/4 OF THE BUILDING DOES NOT EVEN HAVE AIR CONDITIONING YOU ARE NOT SENDING YOUR CHILD TO DULANEY HIGH SCHOOL YOU ARE SENDING HIM TO HIS UNTIMELY DEATH
I live less than 1 mile away. Yet this Pizza Hut does not deliver.
You have to pay extra for the internet and it doesn't work. Everything else was what you would expect for the price, and no refrigerator.
Se han trasladado ya no es ahí, está en Alcorcón
I second the multiple poor reviews on this site. I am an unhappy, dissatisfied customer. DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME OR MONEY WITH THIS RIDICULOUS COMPANY. You will be disappointed. Our AC went out. We had a 1:30 appointment. Chris showed up at 2 pm. He left b/c he was unable to fix it at that moment and said he would be back in 30 minutes. 6 pm comes--no Chris. 7 pm---still no Chris. I took off work to sit in a hot house all day and wait for a repair man who never returned or called back. We called him several times and the phone went straight to voice mail. Ridiculous. So unreliable and unprofessional. A complete waste of time.
The bouncers here are ridiculous bad. They are a bunch of try hards with a beef head persona. Probably have insecurity issues.
I wouldnt go back a second time they take too long plus to pricey
Food is fine, but under no circumstances should you depend upon this location to fulfill a catering or delivery order.
I'm new to the New Car buying methods. So naturally I did a lot of searching online on the car I'd hoped to buy. I came up with a number that I thought was a fair price and I called most of the dealerships in Florida. Some of the dealerships stated that I was never going to get the car I wanted for the price. Others like David Maus said it wouldn’t be a problem over the phone the salesman (lets call him Sally to protect his integrity) "that price is easy! There will be no problem. You can come pick it out." So I made an appointment with Sally. Picked out the car, had a little test drive, and then started on the paperwork. Sally came and sat down next to my fiancé and I with a piece of paper that had a number on about 1000 dollars more then what we had talked about on the phone, but it did have 0% financing so I was willing to proceed thinking that this would be the deal. Sally then took the paper went into a glass room and talked to some other salesman (Judy). After a few minutes the Sally returned with a different piece of paper with 2000 tacked on to the original sheet of paper. My fiancé and I discussed this with a Sally and Judy for a few minutes. They were unwilling to respect the quoted price over the phone. So after driving 30min down to the dealership, 2 hours on paperwork and test drive we had to walk away. If you are shopping around via telephone (which is a great idea) get the deal in writing have them text or email it to you. After Leaving David Maus (who will never lose your business over PRICE). I made my way to another dealership that had given me a quote over the phone that was only 200 over my original price point. I asked for them to start the paperwork and send me a copy before I made a trip to the east coast. EVERYTHING was great!!! Go to MIKE ERDMAN TOYOTA in Merritt Island. Ask to see either Christopher ( Sale Manager I think) or Dan (our sales guy). They were great on the phone. Once we got there the car was ready the paperwork was exactly the same as the said. There were no hidden fees and if we had any question about anything they were willing to explain it/give us time to read over the document not rushing at all.
None
Tooooo heavy OIL!!!!!
Crooked, Crooked, Crooked. Richard Carvalho (Owner Of Hawaii On Wheels and Eco Mopeds Hawaii) is not to be trusted. This guy will do whatever it takes to make a buck. Check out his reviews on Yelp and you will see that you should most definitely not waste your time with this company.
Called salesmen about listed truck and described my need for a clean rust free truck( I live in a very snowy climate where they salt the roads heavily). Salesman went out of his way to take pictures and start truck while on phone to verify condition. In pictures truck showed minimal surface rust on some front suspension. Question condition with salesmen and was reassured again that it was a great truck that had been serviced and thoroughly check out and I would be happy with the condition. When questioned on records for servicing they seemed to be misplaced but the oil had been changed for sure I was reassured again. I then got a bank loan and drove 2 hrs and flew 5 hrs then rented a hotel room for the night. Following morning I was graciously picked up at my motel for the sort ride to the small car lot. The truck was set aside as promised, but battery was dead and had to be jumped and brakes were locking up (probably rusty from not being driven?) and large wet spot on rear axle housing near plug( maybe from having fluid checked or stripped treads?) Worst part as feared this truck was well used and frame rust had been painted over(at some point?) and was flaking off when poked. This truck was in decent condition exterior and interior and motor and transmission seemed great, but as I questioned and feared the rust was extensive and far more than a close inspection should have disclosed. Dealer honestly, could have saved me $500+ in expenses and the dealers wasted time picking me up and returning me to the airport to rent a car to drive home. Called car lot owner to request reimbursement for rental car home, was unable to ask or explain and was hung up on! DON'T TRAVEL FROM AFAR TO PURCHASE!
My Office
None
Took my girlfriend to Westside this morning, she was complaining of severe abdominal pain. Was treated okay, they did an ultrasound (vaginal) which she said was very uncomfortable. After they reviewed the results, they transferred her to Plantation General - stating they had to transfer her because they had no OBGYN there to perform the laproscopic surgery on her. Why surgery? They diagnosed her as have a vaginal torsion which requires surgery to fix or remove (if necessary). So we go over to Plantation where they tell us they want to do their own vaginal ultrasound - stating they have better techs and staff then Westside does. I figured they just wanted to work the system because we have insurance. My girlfriend wasn't happy about going through the procedure 2x within 4 hours, but she did agree and she came through like a trooper. So, we were wondering why it was taking so long for the surgery, when finally Dr. Tombeck came in and told us that there was no vaginal torsion, it was a ruptured cyst and it would heal itself in some time. Westside? You should fire your ultrasound techs and radiologists who had anything to do with this grossly deficient diagnosis. I travel to this area often, and will tell any and all persons willing to listen how Westside botched a simple test - and Plantation obviously knows it becuase they told us they were doing a second test because of Westside's poor history.
Don't apply for a job at this place. the boss has all kind of reasons to not pay you on time. He will run you & run you, compliment your skills and it ends up the driver don't get paid. My friend worked there and made them a lot of money & they still owe him $4000.00. He received $1000.00 and some change in the beginning. He kept driving, believing their excuses & lost a lot of money these skammers will never pay him. These are the kind of people that should be tarred & feathered in the public square or put into prison. I spoke to Egor, the boss & his reason not paying the man was he had a part that cost $3000.00 . It was broken down every other day as it was. My friend was broke down in a town wher he had a friend that was a diesel mechanic. They got the part, went to repair worn out truck & it had been towed. The driver still had not been paid. Egor lied to me about why he didn't pay him, with me knowing he was lying all the time as the driver hadn't gotten paid for 6 to 8 weeks. I actually packed food for this man to eat because the company was not paying him. Egor said he had a $3000.00 part. I saw my friend, the part was $400.00, he still has the part. Egor said the part is why he didn't pay him, but what about all those other weeks of paychecks? The driver will be glad to give him his part for his wages. This company is a rip off. don't work for them. Better get hold of me Egor, I am still waiting for your faxes for the parts. The next step is the labor relations board. I will put you out of business. My sister set up and ran trucking companies for years. She can help me with anything I don't know.. .
Arrived late 9.45 pm and I asked about getting food. The receptionist said you can get food from bar but neglected to say that the bar closes at 10pm. So I arrive at 10.02 to be told at the bar that they had stopped serving food that I should go back to the room and order. Lo and behold when I try to order food which is supposed to be available 24 hours the person at the other end of the phone tells me that much of the menu is no longer available and that the chef has gone for the night. On top of that I had to ask for additional light to be brought to the room as it was too dark to be able to read from together with a substandard worn mattress and you can bet it was a great time. However after complaining to the manager Steven he did appear to be quite responsive. Why oh why wait for a complaint before delivering a quality service is it too much to ask to expect a little hospitality. To their credit they did try to put things right. The laugh was they brought along another taller light which was no brighter than the previous one. If you plan on working in the rooms at night better to bring your miner's helmet you will need the extra light.
The appetizers were great, then it goes south fast. The chicken dumplings had no chicken... The chicken basket had burnt chicken... And they still charged full price for food that we couldn't eat...the chicken dumplings were cold. They tried to"fix it"... The photo Is the fix... We won't be back.
None
Very disappointed in their lack of integrity in not only their horrible people skills but also in their lousy equipment.The rented equipment broke and they were not interested in making it right. One of their workers didnt know any one was in the vehicle and just ripped this huge pressure washer that takes two people to lift, out of my vehicle by themselves which would probably also explain why they rent broken equipment. I would definitely NOT do business with them.
Lame, lazy, location. Did not care about my business. Do not waste your time here. Signarama is normally my go to place, but not this location. The smell of the food being eaten here was very strong also. So if you do not like strong garlic and fish do not come here.
The Cliffs looks good on the outside, but is not too great on the inside. Maintenance was lackluster. Things were never replaced. We lived in an apartment for 2 years with a refrigerator that made so much noise we had to run a fan in our bed room and close the door to sleep over the din. They saw no problem with it because it kept food cold. The carpeting was very old and impossible to get clean. The appliances were all old. Our toilet barely worked, but was never replaced. These things nag at you and make life annoying. We finally left because the non-smoking policy in the building was not being enforced by an ineffectual management staff and I was suffering terribly with asthma and migraines due to the smoke seeping into our apartment. Nothing was done, and an investigation of air flow or the smell inside my apartment was never attempted. Doctor bills and moving expenses were high, yet they didn't refund our full deposit, citing carpet stains. They did let me out of my lease due to my health issues three months early, because all they could find for me on the property was an apartment which would amount to a $400 rent increase which we couldn't access it for a month and a half. I would never live there again. Too many maintenance hassles and ineffective property management. But the smoke in the building, which we had to sign at lease renewal we would not do, was the last straw for us. Can't live without air.
SUCKS. THIS PIZZA IS NOT WORTH YOUR TIME. GO TO SOUTH SIDE OR PIZZA HUT OR SOMETHING. PAPA JOHNS IS THE WORSE EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!! I HOPE THEY NEVER GET A CUSTOMER AGAIN!
This used to be one of my favorite places to go to dinner so I feel really bad writing this review. I had been going to Vince's for 20 years. For some reason, the past couple of years it has gone completely downhill. Service and the food had always been impeccable. You always had to wait awhile for your meal but it was always well worth it. I asked to go for my birthday in August this year and it was horrible. There were 4 of us and only 1 of us had A beer. We waited for an hour & a half and when the food arrived, all the pasta was overcooked & the sauce did not taste right. I ate 2 bites and that was it. My guests finished half of their dishes if that. The bill was $130.00. For not drinking & getting terrible food, that's a bit much. I realized was had at least 2 to 4 refills of sodas and they charged for each one, which is a bit ridiculous when you are spending that much on a meal. So, I decided maybe it was just an off night for Vince's & returned a few months later to try again to no avail. It was as bad, if not worse. I miss going there, I hope they read or hear what's going on there & fix the problem.... :(
I strongly regret to ever go to Gina's. My boyfriend and I wanted to experience authentic mexican lunch/atmosphere. We arrived and were alerted by the cook sitting outside of the restaurant and not quite looking clean and professional, however, we decided to give it a shot anyways, Service was all right, however, the food was a real disappointment: not seasoned AT ALL, tasted and looked quite old. We left the place very unhappy about our 60$ lunch that totally did not worth it. The story does not end here. Few hours later, my boyfriend got very sick with his stomach and spend the whole night and the next day in pain and severe discomfort from food poisoning. If you really care about your health, dont go to Gina's! Well overpriced for getting food poisoning.
Was unimpressed with hotel. Lobby was well done, but nothing but mirrors everywhere...the real hotel starts appearing when you step onto elevator with fake linoleum floor and it gets worse. "Partial Ocean view" actually means if you hold on to rail from balcony you can see some water. It is however in a nice location, but that did not make up for the fact that the walls were paper thin, then deadbolt on the balcony door seemed to have been kicked out and then painted over (obviously noticed and ignored), there was even an exposed outlet in our room w/o a cover behind the bed (dropped phone and had to move bed). It was fairly priced, but can do way better for same pricing elsewhere - and will next time.
Closed on Sundays because the owner is a religious zealot, hates a third of their customer base (gays) and wants us to continue eating their crap? How does a business get away with this?
The pharmacist at this location is terrible.I guess "customer service" classes aren't a requirement for a pharmacology degree. I've dealt with this Rite Aid for the past couple of prescription refills and each time the lady tells me (in terrible broken English) "Herro, NO your prescriptions is na reaty yet, roo need to kah yo docta fo da refeel" And each time she has been completely wrong. If she would just look at the computer and DO HER JOB, she would see that my prescription was IN FACT sent over electronically the day before. Never once does an apology follow...fire this woman or I'll transfer to Walgreens.
None
Facilities typical of older hotel. Were and tear on the furniture; holes in apholstery. dirty. Burn holes in comforter. Heavy smoke smell as forewarned by management. I didnt feel comfortable leaving the bags on the floor. After my stay saw other review of bed bugs and glad I hung the bags by the door chain to keep guests from coming home with me. If price is only consideration, hotel is suitable. .
I ordered the shrimp pad Thai and it was amazing. I ordered my "Thai spicy" and they did just that for me. We ordered the cheapest Pino Nior on the menu which was $65 and tasted like the bottle had been open for a week (yes, we paid for the bottle but never saw him open it). I am torn on this review because the food was so good, but the wine was so bad. I got sick about an hour after this meal as did my husband and the only item that we shared, was the wine.
I wish I could give the same Excellent ratings as everyone else. My experience started out great and once we reached financing and realize they snuck in over $1000 in hidden fees(paint and seat protection scam plus high priced VIN # window etching) that was never disclosed up front. I got angry and left. I had a similar experience at Tomball Ford and was warned about it from one of there employee's. Talking to the salesman I learned that both Boerne Dodge and Tomball Ford is under the same ownership. That is what set off my radar and sure enough the same sleazy sales tactics were being used at Boerne Dodge. So be careful, not everything may be as it seems up front, always check and understand the final numbers. If you don't understand make them explain it. I am headed to Anderson Ford...
I was very disappointed and financially set back by very poor representation. There was no communicating with me to keep me informed of the case. His weak and agreeable approach with opposing attorney, cost me substantially more then it should have been. Not recommend and be warned of potential problem if you deal with this lawyer
My husband ordered the food online for dinner around 730 and he went to pick it up and returned home around 8pm. He enjoyed his shrimp with lobster sauce but my beef and mushroom was too salty. My fried rice was too salty as well. These cooks should taste their food before serving it to customers. I could not finish my food. That will be the first and last time I eat Wok On Wheels.
Nettes Hotel, aber Wifi kostet €15 extra! Da gibt es Besseres in der Gegend.
One word - ORDINARY!! This was my first Aria experience and I was so looking forward to it but what a disappointment. Once seated, we were given menu's. About 20 minutes later, we were served some sort of luke warm soup compliments from the chef. This "treat" was plonked on top of our menu's (that's right - no-one had taken our order) with no explanation of what it was. I had to ask. About 10-15 minutes later a waiter took our order. I had Stradbroke Island oysters as an entree - 12 of them at $4 each and they were swamped in what tasted like vinegar. It was impossible to taste the flavour of the oyster. I had the pork as a main and was presented with 4 pieces of something on a plate. I have no idea whether all four were pork or two were something else. It tasted ok but again the flavours of the basic ingredients were very hard to detect. I shared a cheese platter with my husband to finish and this was lovely. The best part of the evening apart from the company at our table was the 3 bottles of Pol Roger 1999 Winston Churchill champagne. Maybe Matt Moran needs to spend some time back in the kitchen rather than promoting himself on TV.
I went to this doctor last week on 14/06/13 for male genital issuses not aid or any sexual problem's the doctor did not know what it was he looked on his iphone for help and then when he still could not find any thing he gave me a shot and some pills and told me i should feel better if not i need to go see a urologist! so i got some thing set up with them but i am still having pain the pain meds he gave me make me feel sick and want to throw up! So the urologist told me since these where making me feel bad i should just be able to talk to dr dan and he would be able to get me some thing knew to at least try!!!! Dr Said no you will have to come pay me again to get any thing different since i do not know what is wrong with you! i do not have insurance so you know how lovely that bill would be again plus the urologist bill will also be sky high i just done understand how this doctors office has done this same bs with other family members i would not go here if i was dying and it was the only place
In the beginning you think: "WoW! That's a beautiful place, that's amazing!" But in the end you realise that the motto of the restaurant is if you have money you are allowed to do all things coming in your mind! I was a witness of situation when a company of drunk people yelled in Russian and used a lot of dirty words and nobody of security guys stopped them, sincerely they tried to do it but failed very very soon. So all that evening passed through that drunk company's yells. Also you should note it's more trendy place where some people arrive to show themselves (usually not very intelligent). Cuisine is good enough, but the value is for sure overpriced. Our waiter was really good guy who showed very high level of customer service. But security issue also should be taken into consideration, so for service is 1 of 5. Unbelieveably rude house manager, indifferent wait staff, vending machine food. Don't waste your money here, no matter what its previous reputation times have changed, it is awful.
I walked in to purchase a bouquet of flowers for my wife and after being initially greeted and attended to they ended up taking 20 minutes to put the flowers into an arrangement. No acknowledgment that the service was slow and they just ignored me the whole time I was in their store (with nowhere to sit down for the wait). Very impersonal and unprofessional. Upside was that my wife did like the flowers, but in the future I will get them elsewhere.
Ayer domingo, en la funcion de "Corazon de Leon" en la sala 7, del complejo, durante toda la emision de la pelicula, habia dentro de la sala, un murcielago volando y chocando con la pantalla, con lo molesto que era, tambien un tanto peligrosa ya que estos animalitos trasmiten rabia
I would not recommend Church Services. I called for air conditioning services and specifically asked if the technician would come out and look to see what the problem was and not just add more Freon to my unit. The lady said this would happen on the phone. The technician came out and did not even bother to look at the inside unit nor the outside unit. He recommended just adding Freon. The issue is I had a leak somewhere but that was another $300 to find out where the leak was. I asked him he was going to bother even looking at either the inside or outside unit. The technician said he could only add Freon. At this point I have a hot house and not many choices. I spent $300 on Freon plus the $80 service call. I wanted to find out where the unit was leaking so I did not have to keep adding Freon. I had another service come out (who I would highly recommend) and the leak was on the outside unit right and very visible. The customer service department from Church Services called and I let them know my frustration with the service. I have never heard back from them. I typically do not write reviews but wanted the buyer to beware.
This is the worst car wash ever. I came to get my car washed and there where teenage girls humping each other in the outside waiting area. All the attendants stood around watching, and when I complained, they told me the manager told them not to do anything about it. Shameful, not a good place at all.
It's not a college - it's essentially an overpriced high school. Lack of communication and lack of community.
establishment closed!
Only reading the bowling experience: The bowling lanes are kind of cramped next to each other and it feels that the lanes do not have the same physics laws as in other places that are solely for bowling. Did I mention? On a Saturday night, we paid 50$ for an hour to get a lane. Pretty expensive...
I paid Craig a $10,000.00 dollar deposit, and I got NOTHING!!! No only did I get attitude, and hang ups from Craig, but he actually STOLE my sofas that he was going to re-upholster!!!! He didn't make a contract with me, and before he was going to deliver he threw a curve ball stating that his Policy ( which he had NEVER mentioned before) stated that payment needed to be made in full prior to the delivery!! UNHEARD of. Save your money, and go somewhere else!!! You don't need his attitude, and shadiness and lack of integrity!!!
The film was fine, the staff were rude, the seats did not stay down properly and if you sat in a comfortable position the seat would raise your legs, moved seats about 6 times and gave up in the end. Girlfriend lost a ring that cost roughly £200 pounds in there and when we went back the next day and asked if we could look in the bathroom near the screens, they would not let us and showed very little compassion towards us. We had planned to watch another film after looking for the ring but after that I wasn't in the mood. Terrible service, get new staff and seats basically...
Ordered "Red, White, and You" for my girlfriend's birthday, as I live out of state. It was delivered timely, but I paid $60 for the bouquet, which I was told would look "as shown." The product picture had at least fifteen roses in it, while the bouquet my girlfriend got only had three. Not what I paid for. I have the pictures to prove this.
None
I agree with other users that finding this place can be difficult at best, and gaining entrance is even worse. You must scroll through a directory, them call them. Its not clear whether you will reach a live body, or get buzzed in. (The sign says you will be buzzed in, but instead they answer the phone). Add to that no evening or weekend hours, and you'll see that its more about them, and less about you, the customer. There are way too many other places that will provide you better service, for the same price,
First we waited a long time for our food. When it finaly arrived the steaks were well done and not medium as we asked, the vegestables were bland and boring and the sauce bernaise was stone cold to a point where it had a consistancy like warm butter. To top the awefull food the waiter gave us one check even though we explicitly asked to have it split up. When explained we wanted seperate cheks again, he then kept insisting we had not told him to do so. This has by far been one of the worst restaurant experiances i have had. Stay away from this place, I travel on a daily basis and therefore stay in a lot of hotels and eat out a lot, so I know what I'm talking about.
I had the worse massage ever there. I was burned by the hot stones, came out feeling sore, and I felt like the therapist was not only rushed, but didn't want to be there. Wouldn't go there again if I got it for free.
Horrible management and unwillingness to step-up and help out their customers. Repair person failed to make two appointments in a row. The company was not concerned that I had to take off work and wait more than three hours on two separate occasions. I was only given an apology and informed they didn't expect me to re-book my appointment a third time. If they really cared about customer services they would have had someone at my house the following day for no charge or at least a substantial discount. I can't comment on the quality of their repair work as it never happened. If you want to potentially waste your time for no reason feel free to give them a call. They'll try and entice you with their cheap prices, but it is not worth the aggravation.
Lots of harsh grades. Very disrespectful and arrogant teachers. Lots of anti-semitism and bigotry on campus. It's way over-rated, and should be investigated for a long history of Title 18 violations. Probably the most red-necky backwater place I've ever lived. The truth is that all my fellow students complained very often about the obvious problems there, and the Administration never cared. Save your money. Professors there tend to be extremely unintelligent, often bizarrely so. They have a lot of skill at being hypercritical, but very little at being genuinely creative, constructive or thoughtful. Mozart's 14th symphony (Koechel #114) in A minor contains extensive passages of instrumental speech synthesis describing Princeton University as being a "bedwet". Mozart's 14th symphony was probably composed around 1774 (a decade or so after the founding of Princeton University), but still reflects an extremely modern and intelligent viewpoint which should not be ignored. Albert Einstein himself admitted that he found his inspiration for Relativity Theory in the works of Mozart.
Haneef haneef
Don't buy an engine from these people! They are crooks that sold my husband a $1,200. worthless engine! Buyer Beware!
Horrible experience. The desk manager who negotiated the deal was patronizing and condescending. If you could avoid working with Andy, you might have a better experience than I did.
My daughter is leaving this school as although they have some fantastic equipment and new building etc the school is very poorly organised even cancelling after school groups and not informing parents etc it is also very unwelcoming unfortunately for us this school has by no means been a pleasant experience.
I called today to ask a printing question.... long story short, they pretty much insulted the USPS and the gentleman I spoke with must have had a bad day because he was kind of rude to me. Not a good first impression on someone calling to ask a general question.
My wife and I bought two Dealfind vouchers for this restaurant, and had a terrible experience at the establishment when we tried to treat some very important colleagues out to dinner. We were seated for more than half an hour before the servers finally took our order. After we placed our order, we had to wait for more than a whole hour before the food had finally arrived. And when the food had finally gotten there, they had gotten our orders wrong, so we had to wait another half hour before we could properly start our meal. The servers were also very rude. We had to flag a waitress down to finally be served, and she behaved very passive aggressively towards us. And when we sent our orders back to be corrected, they reacted very defensively. It was very unprofessional of them. My wife and I have not returned to this restaurant ever since, and we did not even consider gifting the second voucher to a friend because we would never recommend it to anybody. We have since received a full refund for both vouchers from Dealfind.
Customer service manager at the Austin location was unwilling to partially move a vehicle so the customer could work on it after a very hard rain.The vehicle is under a good 2 to 4 inches of water. I was told it is not their policy to move vehicles for customers. regardless of that, all that had to be done was to pull it out of mud and water to be placed on the gravel surface. The long drive in (50+) miles was a COMPLETE DISAPPOINTMENT and had to leave because of the unwillingness of the employees to take care of a large paying customer. The potential sale of $300.00 plus dollars TOTALLY baffles me how on on a rainy day when there is no money to be made they could just let all that $$$ just walk right out the door. I'm sorry to say this will be the last time I use wrench a part for my restorations... If anyone from their management or ownership would like to contact me,... I would be willing to listen to their reasoning.
I can understand if it's busy things might go slow, even for 'fast' food, but 1 hour for two shakes is ridiculous. There should always be a manager, always. As usual the drive thru gets their food promptly while everyone else waits. We are not the only ones tonight who are having serious issues with the service.
happy's is the most nastiest pizza in the city. taste like cardboard.
Panie sprzedające usługi operatora ORANGE kłamią w żywe oczy.
Tried to charge my wife $20 to repair a tire, when she asked if they would price match with Discount they agreed but then told her she needed a new tire and refused to fix it. This place is a joke.
The food is nasty and not fresh at all! Its not authentic chinese food, I can make better at home! The kitchen is really filthy i heard and the products they use are frozen junk. The prices are too high for the food as well. I heard the employees are treated horribly so lord knows what they do to the food. I also heard the owner is a real bitch and they are all american haters! Please take your business elsewhere!
The service is horrible, for one. I waited and I waited and I waited for about ten minutes to be seated. I finally asked the lead waiter if I could have a seat and he acted as though I ruined his life just for making the request. Extremely rude. Not to mention one of their waiters copied my check card number and tried to defraud me of $1300.00 the NEXT day. Fortunately, my bank was on top of it and I filed charges (also called the manager as well). Don't eat here. It was the worst experience I've ever had in a restaurant, ever.
None
Na początku był to mój ulubiony hotel, ale zaczymywałem się tam tylko sen i szybkie śniadanie. Niestety ostatnio musiał zostać nieco dłużej i wyszło WIELE mankamentów hotelu: 1. restauracja czynna TYLKO do 22.00 - po tej godzinie zostają, ale też tylko do 24.00 chipsy i orzeszki w barze! 2. w pokoju JEDNO gniazdko: albo laptop, albo komórka! 3. biurko w pokoju jest niefunkcjonalne i na pewno nie może służyć jako podkładka nawet pod namniejszego laptopa 4. w łazience brak normalnego lustra 5. łóżko małżeńskie to dwa pojedyncze zestawione razem 6. widok z piętra 1 i 2 fatalny 7. wyjazd z hotelu tylko w prawo (wg znaków) Plusy: 1. bardzo dobre śniadanie 2. czyste pokoje 3.duży parking i garaż
It seems abandoned. Scary for kids.
What happened to "customer service"? Have attempted to call twice today looking for an item that I can't locate on their website, and have purchased parts of in recent past....Both times I hung up after being on hold for over 15 minutes. I can drive to the store faster......
Taste of the good is good as daily have food overe their as my office is in front of slv only, but rates are too high need to reduse rates.
We went there not expecting high class for for obvious reasons but when a menu says "Ribeye Steak $16.99" you think well it may not be the best ribeye but hey lets give it a try. My girlfriend got the steak fajitas and they came out on a sizzling platter and were pretty darn good. My steak came out and it was what i guess you call a t-bone though very thinly sliced. And the mashed potatoes were cold so i sent it back to get the correct steak. 10 mins later our server came over to me to inform me that they only had the 10oz left when i had ordered the 12oz .... ok fine but they should have told me 10 mins ago. 20 mins later my steak finally came and i honestly could not have been more disappointing. it was the FARTHEST thing from a ribeye and for them to advertise as such is ridiculous ... it looked like the same meat that my girlfriend got in her fajitas just not cut up and obviously wasn't cooked medium because the cut was so thin it's just not possible. Worst steak EVER! On the upside the honey BBQ wings were really good and I'm sure they have some other good food but please don't advertise a $17 Ribeye and then serve crap steak because you can go down the road to Kroger and pick up a 2 pack of Ribeye for around $10 .... nuff said
None
I've never dealt with a landlord or management company that had less respect for their tenants. The employees are all nice, but that doesn't cut it. A month or two into my lease the fire door was replaced in my bedroom. (Varsity Management has a tendency to do maintenance on the apartment without any explanation of why or much notice). The guy who installed the new door and door frame left huge gaps between the two--I could see light from outside coming on--which resulted in my bedroom having an average temperature of about 50 degrees during the winter. When I complained, a worker was sent out to put some foam between the door and door frame. This did nothing. On another occasion near the end of my lease, Varsity decided to do electrical work in the middle of the week in the evening requiring the power to be shut off for the whole building. They did this two Tuesdays in a row. One of these days, the power was off when I got home from work, about 5:30pm, although it was probably shut off at 3pm, and didn't come back on until 11:45pm. Varsity Management's treatment of its tenants is ridiculous. I would recommend avoiding them for housing.
The men working in tools and hardware would be better suited in a dress store, or a nursing home. Service is mediocre at best, there are a couple people who do their job well but good luck finding them. Parking sucks, product selection sucks, this sears just plain sucks. I am honestly surprised this store hasn't closed down yet. Get it together! This store should be on par with the suburban stores, Oakland deserves better.
went there to set up a spare account. He told me the min. balance and that he would transfer funds from my other account here so I could avoid the monthly fees. after the first fee I realized he did not transfer the funds like he said. after the second fee I realized he also lied about the min. balance of the account. I am not pleased.
BEWARE: They're more interested in getting your money than fixing the problem. I went to the Auto Diagnostic Center to FIX A GAS GUZZLING PROBLEM of getting only 11 miles/gallon when I should have been getting 20 miles/gallon. The diagnosis was that a full tune-up was needed: the tune-up was completed and I left with happy expectations. However, THE GAS GUZZLING PROBLEM WAS NOT FIXED. So I went to AutoZone for a free auto diagnosis of my car. The computer diagnosis indicated; 1. Fuel pressure or MAF (Mass Air Flow) sensor is defective 2.Oxygen sensor is defective 3. Ignition misfire 4. Fuel injector problem. Altho I paid over $340 for repair, the Auto Diagnogistic Center didn't perform a simple computer analysis to confirm the GAS GUZZLING PROBLEM had been fixed. For that reason they earned this Google commentary.
Mal atendiendo a los clientes
I purchased my MacBook at this store in April and am already experiencing tech issues with track pad. I called to get some questions answered and before I could tell them what the problem was they transferred me to an automated Apple Care teller that took me through several minutes of questions then said "number invalid" and hung up. I called back, spoke to the same person and he, with as little interest as he could muster, told me I needed to schedule an appointment. As a first time Mac user, I needed a few basic things answered though it's obvious they have to ensure you are the owner of the machine or they are not allowed to help you. I've still not received help for my computer that I just bought in that store. Disappointing to say the least.
Nice coffee on a nice location... Gelato is tasty but unfortunately the hard wooden chairs make it difficult to sit and enjoy the atmosphere for very long, which to me is kind of the purpose of a café. Shame really.
You get what you pay for... the location should speak volumes!
Girl at the counter was super rude. When patrons came in she'd just blurt out "Are you going to eat anything?" Not ask "How can I help you?", "Would you like a menu?" So turned off from the experience. Fudge was bland and over priced.
The milk section is always disgustingly filthy. Dried milk on a lot of containers and the shelves and floor. Check expiration dates, they keep stuff on the shelves past the expiration dates.
I have NEVER liked this place.. and I don't know if there is new management now or what but it has gotten even worse.. it was dark.. dirty and the food was so bad that my 10yr old son refused to eat it... the kid is normally up for eating anything and everything!! When we complained about dried out chicken.. burned food and lack of items on the bar at dinner we were told " we always make it like that" and " nothing is wrong" We will NOT be back!!! If your looking for great local Chinese go to the one in Fosterbrook near walmart!
Can't wait for Walmart to put this store out of business.
I recently purchased a 2004 jeep grand cherokee and decided to take it in and have it looked at to see what type of maintenance needed to be done and if there were any issues. On my way there, both my husband and I used our windows while smoking and the dash was fine. However, after the dealers inspection my windows, locks, guages and alarms are no longer working. I asked them to fix it being the vehicle was working when I brought it in and I was told no, that if I wanted it fixed it would be over $300.00. I have never been treated that way in my life. I was told that the tech must have done it while opening the doors, but that it's a common problem with this model jeep. Maybe if he would have gentle then it wouldn't have happened. Funny that all week long I drove it without an issues at all but all of a suddent 3 wires are broke? Even looks like one was cut or spliced. I feel as though this was done on purpose in hopes to get additional money out of me. I was refered to them from a friends but will never, ever, ever go back. Terrible customer service and they wrecked my car. What type of dealership doesn't fix an issue they caused. Then I get a dang voicemail from the manager saying he hopes my visit went well. Really? I left crying- how well do you think it went? ..grrrrr
If going to trade in clothes, be warned: they will offer you SIGNIFICANTLY LESS than you could ever imagine! It really is shameful. I had empathy for the employees yesterday when they offered me 3.50 per Halloween outfit (WITH accessories) that I had worn ONCE! (mind you: I paid more for all of the accessories COMBINED than they offered me in TOTAL for ALL of the outfits which I paid around $50 for.) I was prepared to accept at LEAST $5 per outfit, but was genuinely offended when I heard 3.50! Claimed that they would sell the outfits for $10 each, $12 with accessories. I would love to go back today and see what they're currently marked on the shelf for...you would probably be better off using Ebay, donating, or recycling your outfits.
Suspend a little boy for THIS??? This is incredible... How could a partially eaten Pop Tart possibly be a danger to ANYONE? Your school will do more to advance the Home School Movement than ANYTHING!
The food was marginal but the thing that truely amazed me is they couldn't, or wouldn't provide me with a saucer to give me a place to put my tea bag when I took it out of the tea. They offered no alternatives and acted as if my request was an imposition.
I was at Galvin's last weekend. This is in Kentucky, which is horse racing country. The manager refused to put the audio on for one of the biggest races of the decade because he felt that nobody was watching it. Didn't matter because the entire bar went crazy as they finished the race, but it did show how many people were watching the race. I really like the food at Galvin's, and most of the staff are generally friendly, but the way that I was treated by the manager last weekend means that i will not visit Galvin's again.
This shop nearley always short changes people! Its nearley all the Nepalese. this shop used to be good and friendley.
Pretentious.
Just terrible.
Took over an hour to get pizza.
Würde nicht wiederkommen, war nichts besonderes, Vorsuppe war eine Päckchenbrühe mit eingekochtem Fleisch, bei den Käsespätzeln würden sich die Schwaben totlachen - es war ein Gratin mit Fertignudeln und zu viel Butter, überbacken mit Billigkäse für 10.90 Euro. Für den Preis erwartet man wenigstens frisch gemachte Spätzle. Der Salat vom Büffet war nichts besonderes, hätte lieber einen angemachten Salat bestellt. Bohnen, rote Beete aus der Dose, Paprika, Gurken, Tomaten und Eisberg waren frisch. Ambiente eher altbacken, aber dennoch sauber.
unmatched photos plz do not upload
None
I have been to this place a couple times now and I can say that the folks working there are unprofessional; I think the manager herself is unprofessional. The hairdresser *will* try to sell their Matrix line; other reviewers have voiced the same feeling. On my last haircut, I mentioned that I was using Nexus and I happened to divulge that I purchased it from Sams. Oh boy what a mistake, the lady went on and on - products sold at Sams is expired, it is a closeout store so components would have deteriorated, middle people mix different stuff into the products. What !! She wouldn't take any explanation from me .. and had nothing to back her theories. She extended her views to all stores like Sams, Walmart, Costco. In essence, anything bought else was fraudulent. Back to haircut; the haircut was not good. My hair was left zig zagged; the hair dresser also didn't have all the clipper sizes.
None
Service was good, good consultants. Employees detailing the vehicles, a completely different story. Broke my USB a/c adaptor, left my dash cluster ( mph gauge) covered in armoral and switched my floor mats to another car with different color interior.
I was member for 1 year. Lifeplex cancelled my membership because they did not like that I made a statement about how they do not appreciate members. They think they are the premier gym but the only thing going for them is the price. I'd rather pay a little more and get customer service.
If they hire me things will change
очень плохое обслуживание, невнимательный и пассивный персонал. "ждите - и возможно дождетесь" вот слоган для этого заведения :(
I found this company to be extrememly frustrating. After receiving a quote that I found to be fair, I requested the tree removal to be scheduled. They were booked 2 weeks out, which at first was fine, and I was told I was slotted in the 8am appointment. The day before, when they called to ask how I was going to pay for the removal, I was told I had been moved to the Noon appointment. Fine, a little strange, but fine. The day of the appointment, at 2:30, I called to ask where they were and was informed by the scheduler that the previous appointment had added on a lot more work than what was contracted for and they would not be able to make my appointment. The girl said she would call me back after she looked at the calendar to reschedule. After 45 min, I called back and was advised she was still working with a supervisor to work something out. She called me back 10 min later to say the first they could reschedule me for would be the following Friday (a week later). I have never had a company noshow a job before and was completely bewildered that after having noshowed me they couldn't come for another week. I contacted another tree service, Empire Trees, they came out immediately, gave me a lower bid, and took down my tree within 2 days of my contacting them. I was really disappointed with the service I received from Diamond Trees and would definitely not recommend them to anyone, especially if you value your time.
I purchased a bed frame from Wolf Furniture. The bed frame cost 400 dollars. It is very poorly constructed. The wood is not solid, it is hollow. The finish on the frame is not well done. There are portions that have a different color from a lack of time spent doing the job. It took four weeks for this bed frame to arrive after I ordered it and the quality is so poor that it should not have cost more than 100 dollars. This furniture store is, by far, the worst store I have shopped at.
None
Overpriced. Unwilling to educate the customer or answer basic questions over the phone. Only interested in getting a tech to your house for the $84 service call fee.
None
Phones are never answered. NEVER. Printing errors when we finally received our documents. Typically Africa in the heart of London. Good luck everyone else!
Will not answer phone after midnight
Restroom filthy. Service slow. Store has a bad odar. Don't go there
None
Service was fast, people friendly and nice. My issue was with the food. I had the shrimp pad tai, with the shrimp being an extra (almost) $3. I got a grand total of three full pieces of shrimp and the pad tai didn't taste like pad tai, but a lot more like a heated up frozen dinner. It was terrible. One extra star for the service and friendly atmosphere, nothing else for poor food and over pricing. I paid $8, which is at least double what it was worth.
EXTREMELY OVERCHARGED for diagnosis, Wanted what a new one costs to fix, and then charged additional shipping to return it when I refused the service. COMPLETE LOSS. HIGHWAY ROBBERY! DON'T DO IT!
Made a reservation weeks in advance, was kicked to curbside parking. No electricity. no water, not level, high volume of traffic in and out of campground, additional truck traffic noise from I-15.
Appalling web site. Tried to book seats at the 3D Imax session of "Gravity" and was left wondering whether only qualified astronauts were permitted to get tickets. Eye candy is no substitute for usability.
I recieved one great shellac mani from one of the nail techs at 4 tip to toe. Every other service I have had here was terrible. There is a huge language barrier and if you do not know exactly what you want, you will likely have trouble communicating that to them. Customer service is very poor. I recommend you find another salon.
Like so many others, I was attracted to Nebraska Furniture Mart. I first went there for a new TV to surprise my husband. The experience was fine, and nothing was really notable. When we ordered our bed frame from them, we were escatic. Too bad the service was terrible. First our product was discontinued. Then it wasn't. When we finally went to pick it up, we waited for 45 minutes to be helped even though we had been told to move through to the loading dock. The bed quality was terrible. Customer service was terrible. All-in-all, NFM is over-priced and full of things that you can find for much less if you just shop around. It seems like the best place to buy items, but it's not. Do yourself a favor: research EVERYTHING before you go in there. Don't just think that the TV or lamp you found is going to be the best deal. It's not. In addition, salesmen and women are NOT going to be honest with you. When going there to look for a couch, I noticed that one had quite some wear to it. I questioned whether the same would happen to our couch if we pruchased it (we have two kids). The saleswoman was FLOORED that we would speak so low of HER furniture. Do yourself a favor: go there once and take it all in. Have fun dreaming. Don't buy anything. Take care of your curiosity and never go back. This is a place for cheap furniture, cheap appliances and cheap services.
None
Went through the drive thru and ordered a strawberry sunday while they were almost empty, and it still took them over 20 minutes. When they finally brought it, it was just a cup of (mostly melted) ice cream with about a tablespoon of red syrup on top. Needless to day, I asked for a refund (which took another 20 minutes) and will never be back. This is simply one of many negative experiences I have had there.
The first year I lived here wasn't too bad. You can't expect a 5 star apartment for as little as I was paying, especially for the nice neighborhood the apartments are located in. However, as soon as I resigned my lease, everything went down hill. Quickly. As hot as it was outside, my was not adequate to keep my apartment under 80 degrees. After ignoring my complaints for awhile, they finally put AC units in two windows. When I did not leave them on when I wasn't home, they came in (without prior notification or consent) and took them out. Long story short, I continued to sweat in my own apartment until I was forced to move out. Other problems: screens always fall out, are never put back in, the top management appears kind and helpful when you're there, but then do nothing for you. The maintenance guys are super friendly and responsive, but it shouldn't be their job to advocate for changes to happen. All in all, if you're just looking for a cheap place, go for it. Otherwise, it's pretty awful. **Also-Pet Owners Beware- There is a $178 pet cleaning charge upon move out that is hidden in the lease and not covered by the pet deposit**
Had a 3pm Saturday appointment booked for myself, wife and daughter. 3:40, we still hadn't been seen by anyone and no apologies. Finally my daughter is called in. The receptionist tells me that they don't work with our insurance company. My wife tells me that she told the person who booked the appointment who our carrier was. A total waste of time. Paying a monthly premium for vision care, I wasn't about to pay out of pocket for their exams. VERY poor customer service, very disappointing.
I got there @ 3pm on Monday. It was an under warrenty service, and the wait was estimated to be 2 hours. I was hoping to take the shuttle home since I live very close by. But I waited 1 hour 15 min in the waiting room. There was any shuttle available. So I walked to the near by outlets to kill the rest of the 45 minutes. By the time I got tp the dealer it was 5:10, and my car wasn't ready. I need to walk up to hurry them to get my car by. By the time I left the car dealer, it was 5:30.
None
The most expensive shop I've seen. They quoted me $200 dollars to assembly and tune a bike from a factory box, when all other shops quoted me between $80 and $100.
Driver beware! On Saturday, January 5th I drove my car through the drive-thru here - and a big piece of warped plywood got wedged under my car. The plywood damaged the undercarriage of my car and the repairs are going to cost $370. If you happened to be at this McDonald's on that day around 10:30am and saw anything, PLEASE get into contact with me. Even if you had a similar issue with the plywood board at that location, or witnessed other cars have a problem. The manager (Chris) who came out to help me remove the plywood says he's doesn't remember anything happening, and the insurance company says I made the whole thing up. Of course there's no video! This location is owned by James Dotson, who hasn't returned ANY of my calls. I definitely *do not* recommend anyone take their chances on this place. Dishonest management, disconnected ownership - really a horrible example for a national brand like McDonald's.
I have never been to a bar where the security guards/door men treated people with such little respect. My family and I have lived in North Park for most of our lives and go to this bar often because of the location and because we love this bar, but the men at the door are very rude and disrespectful to a lot of my family because they are in law enforcement. My family is loyal to the city and work hard to protect it and never expect any sort of special treatment but get treated like total crap because they are cops and they are resented by the security staff. I have worked in the bar industry my whole working life and have never witnessed such blatant disrespect towards people who dedicate their lives to the safety of these streets. It is so frustrating. Power trip to the highest level. Such a shame because this bar is a great bar. The security staff just really need to be put in check, or replaced.
Today is the last time I would ever order Pizza hut for delivery.It was overpriced for 14 tiny chicken wings, also I ordered HONEY BARBECUE chicken wings and I received BUFFALO WINGS, extremely hot for my taste and not even my dog could eat it, $$$ wasted and still hungry!!
Very bad service
worst bike center you will ever see. dont buy or ever service your bike here...
At first blush this looks like an inviting Mexican-themed bar. However... the Patron margaritas we ordered were in plastic cups (ok, it was Cinco De Mayo) and the food was cold. Service was lacking although the waitress was busty. When our bill came we were charged $12 each for the margaritas. Did I mention they were served in plastic cups. As a reference point, I normally expect to pay $8 to $10 in downtown Chicago or one of the premium places in Grand Rapids (Marriott, Ruth's Chris, Chop House, etc.) for a top-shelf drink made with all premium ingredients, served in beautiful glassware. This place is a rip off. If you happen to stop in, stick with bottled beer and skip the food. Beyond that fare it's a joke.
I never even got the chance to become a customer of Drexel due to its horrid customer service and response. I emailed for two days to no response and called nearly a dozen times over the course of two days to a busy signal each time. At this point, I had given up on the company -- imagine a landlord that won't answer their phone or email for two days! Finally, I was able to get through on the phone, and a gentleman rudely informed me that I had to call a different number to get a hold of "Pete." The number rang all the way through and went to a voice mailbox for someone who was not "Pete." At this point, I once again decided to stop trying to contact the company. On the third day since first trying to contact Drexel, I got a call from an agent who told me that I needed to call "Pete" again, and gave me a different number. I called Pete who was clearly not happy to receive my call and informed me that he wasn't going to be able to show any apartments in my available time frame. I explained that I have been trying to get an appointment set up for three days, to which the man had no response and simply told me to call back at another time.
None
None
Pas bien content, le garagiste est sec, réponde pas bien à des questions...
Wrong address. Nothing here.
Get your head rubbed by a hipster! OMG I went in here by mistake. I haded got my hair cut in 6 months. My hair was curling over my ears and starting to look like a mullet in the back. I specifically told the barber that I didn't want to lose the length but wanted the mullet gone. The barber immedatly took out the shears and buzzed by hair off with no gaurd; nearly to the skin. I could have got my hair buzzed off for half the price else where but I thought these people could think outside the box. I got some jarhead hair cut and had to go back the next day because there were long spots missed in the back.
DO NOT GO TO THIS HOSPITAL UNLESS YOU ARE IN MAJOR AND I MEAN MAJOR PAIN OR IF YOU ARE AN OLD PERSON. I GO IN THERE ABOUT 5 DIFFERENT TIMES FOR EXCRUTIATING BACK PAIN. I TOLD THE DOCTOR THAT I WAS TAKING 800MG IBUPROFEN AND FLEXERIL(LEFTOVER FROM MY RECENT PERIOD) AT HOME AND THAT IT WASN'T EVEN PHASING THE PAIN. WELL, AFTER MAKING ME HURT MORE BY LAYING FLAT ON A HARD TABLE FOR 5 DIFFERENT X-RAYS, THEY SENT ME HOME WITH A PRESCRIPTION FOR 800MG IBUPROFEN AND FLEXERIL. HELLO......IF I WANTED TO TAKE THAT, I WOULD GO BACK HOME AND TAKE IT. I WENT TO ANOTHER HOSPITAL BECAUSE IT WAS LATE AT NIGHT AND THEY TOLD ME I HAD A SEVERELY PULLED MUSCLE IN MY LOWER BACK AND THAT IF I HAD MOVED A CERTAIN WAY, I WOULD TEAR THE MUSCLE. THEY GAVE ME PAIN MEDICINE WHILE I WAS THERE AND GAVE ME A SCRIPT FOR VICODIN AND SOMA'S. NORTHSIDE TOLD ME NOTHING WAS WRONG. I'VE HAD SEVERAL FRIENDS BE TREATED THIS WAY. ONE FRIEND OF MINE WENT TO THIS HOSPITAL FOR A PAINFUL SHOULDER. COME TO FIND OUT, SHE ALMOST TORE HER ROTATOR CUFF. THEY PUT HER IN A SLING, GAVE HER A PRESCRIPTION FOR IBUPROFEN AND SENT HER HOME. UNLESS U ARE IN MAJOR PAIN(A MAJOR ORGAN CAUSING THE PAIN OR AN OLD PERSON IN PAIN), U WILL BE LOOKED AT, SET THERE FOR LIKE 2 HOURS, BE TOLD U ARE FINE AND SENT HOME WITH MEDS THAT U CAN TAKE AT HOME.
I have been going there since they opened and the past 6 or 8 months quality has gone down hill. Service is great people are nice but having to take back shirts with stains bothers me.
Wrong info..Im in Udugampola...I know closest in Minuwangoda..Bt the map says Galle rd...
Párkrát jsem tam byl. Pivo mi tam osobně nechutná, pizzu ale umí. Dejte si však pozor na ingredience, na mém kousku jich chybělo pět a zažádal jsem výměnu. Taky nás tam jednou slušně „natáhli“ při jedné větší akci (nakonec jsme se složili), ale to už je jen detail.
Location is nice
Political entities should be taxed. This church needs to be audited.
None
None
Very Bad, The staff was less interested in doing a good first exam/cleaning than to to try to set me up for an expensive deep cleaning procedure. A subsequent dental appointment I set up at Sunrise dental stated that this deep cleaning was wasteful and completely unnecessary. Furthermore, the exam here was the most painful I have ever endured at a dentist office.
Found out recently place shut down for RAT DROPINGS! NEVER AGAIN! People who work there has a bad attitude. Be grateful you ppl have a jib!
The service SUCKS. I made an order for 144 cupcakes. thats ONE HUNDRED AND FORTY FOUR beige cupcakes for my sister baby shower (for a boy I may add) we get there to pick them up. They hand us 12 (TWELVE!!) pink freakin cupcakes. -___- and instead of apologizing and getting to work they decided to argue -__- (wait but the argument -- not about that we got 12 instead of 144) the woman wanted to argue that the color wasnt pink -- thats their version of beige. -- we just stood there and waiting almost 2 hours for them to decorate 144 chocolate cupcakes and they didnt even offer a discount smh. HORRIBLE never again. apparently its not the first time my friend order for a sweet 16 and they got the order all wrong as well and began to argue. screw them
None
None
Wir waren am 1. Mai dort zum Mittagessen und wurden sehr sehr enttäuscht. Wir gehen öfters in der Umgebung essen und so schlecht haben wir noch nie gegessen. Spätzle, für ein kleines Kind wohl gemerkt) statt diese nur zu kochen, hat man die danach noch im Fett ertränkt. Mein Salat ist im "selbst" gekauften Jogurt-Essig Dressing geschwommen. Die Hähnchenstreifen waren gekocht und nicht angebraten; also nicht von knusprigen Hähnchenstreifen. Da hat die Küche wohl Spätzle und Hähnchen verwechselt. Das Essen von meinem Mann, war ebenfalls ungenießbar, der Schnitzel trocken und roch sehr merkwürdig und viel zu fettig; die Pommes dazu waren wahrscheinlich die günstigsten, die es zu kaufen gibt und auch noch dazu nicht im heißen Fett frittiert, man hat auch hier den Produkten Zeit gelassen, sich schön mit kaltem Fett zu füllen, bevor dieser heiß wurde. Was noch ganz schlecht ist, aber für uns nicht mehr relevant, dass für Kinder absolut Garnichts als Auswahl gibt, nur das was Erwachsene haben. Nun zu der Bedingung, in dem Fall möchte ich nicht persönlich werden, aber das Rennen durch das Saal in schrecklichen Latschen und einem verschwitzten T-Shirt und Schweißperlen auf der Stirn ist alles andere als Verbesserung der Ambiente. Die Einrichtung, wenn das Essen und die Bedingung einigermaßen OK wären, dann hätte man in dem Fall drüber weg schauen, aber alles zusammen war einfach nur schrecklich. Alles sehr alt und abgenutzt, im Gang zur Toilette stand eingelieferte Ware und andere Sachen. Der Raucherbereich ist ganz nett gemacht und für die Dorfgemeinschaft abends für ein Bierchen völlig akzeptabel, was vom Nichtraucherbereich man nicht sagen, total lieblos das Ganze. Nur ein einziger Tisch, der für wenige Stammkunden reserviert war, war gut gedeckt und das geht finde ich gar nicht, dass man sich gleich als Gast nicht willkommen fühlt. Die Bedingung meinte sei heut allein in der Küche und beim Bedienen, dann würde ich doch glatt die Hälfte von der Karte streichen und trotzdem kann ich nicht verstehen, warum die Fritteuse nicht heiß genug ist (weil alle Gäste Pommes oder Schnitzel bzw. Cordon Bleu) aßen, müsste man sie doch nicht jedes Mal ausmachen. Von unserer Seite nie wieder und keinem anderen zu empfehlen. Wir hatten das Drama angesprochen
At this stage of the game for our home loan, this has been a fairly nightmare'ish experience. We have had several questions for our loan officer, however, they feel that our questions must not be terribly important since it has been 9 days since we have had any communication from them. We have submitted paperwork and even walked in to the bank but they were unavailable. We will be going in tomorrow and speaking to the branch manager.
had to have coolant sucked out because of some crap that happened they charged me over $90 and didnt even properly clean it im taking car back in now they said theyd redo service... there to expensive and pushy
Soğuk
Https://1 e'er y y Rd 1990 uh shoitvideos thurs.1 R&D PO Ed n Kay council bluf°c
How can i put this in a nice way? Oh i can't. This place sucks in more ways then you can imagine. The customer service is from hell, prices on cigars are through roof. They have more no name brand cigars then premium cigars. They try to pass off the no name brand as a premium cigar. I don't know who owns this place, but you need better in customer service and get better product. For crying out loud you're in downtown Naperville!
Bought a Zoeller Quick Jon 202 Grinder Tank from Zoeller. 9 months later the pump went out. (inside the 1 year warranty). Zoeller will have nothing to do with replacing it. Had to buy another one for $527.00. The rep. (Ryan), said first it was the check valve then it was the venting, blah, blah. 2 independent plumbers said the installation was perfect. Sent 2 e-mail to the public relations person and got no reply at all. Advise: don't trust their warranty.
This place doesnt exist .. image of the place is below
Slow and poor service
None
Food ia so so quality and taste but extremely expensive. Dont waste your money.
Food good. Service bad. Waited for 15 minutes for the bill to arrive in-spite of calling for it twice.. All the while our original waiter was feeding his face within sight of our table.
It's for bitches!!
Not impressed. The service was practically nonexistent and the food wasn't edible. When the waiter came to give us desserts, she didnt even comment on the fact that my main course was almost untouched. Not coming back.
First off I would like to note I never leave bad reviews, but this one merits it. This was by in far the worst experience at a salon I have ever had. I was in a rush and this place was right next to my house, so I took a chance. I went in to get my bangs trimmed, simple enough. The stylist CUT MY BANGS PAST MY EARS, she gave me a mullet. It was so awful I had to go get extensions to cover up what she had done. Don't go here . . .
So I was just perusing around the Creek, looking for something good to eat, and decided to head on over to the Montana State Department of Transportation Rest Area in nearby Garfield, Montana. When I arrived, I was most disheartened to see that all of the people there were quite deplorable. To all of my compatriots in the Creek, I'd advise you to just stay in the Creek for your eats.
This company is the worst company I have ever visited or try to get any service from. I took my 1981 Ford Bronco in for emissions and safety in the process they proceeded to tell me I need to go at Cadillac converters and a muffler to my vehicle which is a carburetor it is older than an 82 I do not need any of that after they proceeded to argue and argue and argue with me that I need to go out at these things to my vehicle they got frustrated swore at me and told me just to leave so I did and the process they get my emissions papers and registration I come back the next day do grab those papers they have told me babe lost them so this means I have to go to the DMV pay 4 dollars to get the papers to go somewhere else to get my emissions done. So all I have to say is do not use this company ever for anything they are idiots
I took my 4 year old son to this office for advice on a skin issue he was having. After SEVERAL treatments that caused him to have giant welts on his skin we started to question whether or not these doctors know what they are doing. Come to find out after consulting with several specialists and pediatricians, his condition would have gone away on it's own and what they did is NEVER done, especially to children. It is an outdated method that was completely unnecessary. I was disgusted and outraged! To put a little kid through something like this because of money or lack of education is despicable. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND NOT SEEING THIS OFFICE!
We have purchased 2 cars from this dealership in the past year and a half. While we like our cars, the service department and the dealership as a whole is horrible to deal with. It's basically like the walking dead in there. You would think as a luxury car dealer that "claims" to compete with lexus, mercedes, bmw, etc. that you would be able to get a service loaner that's a Volvo. NO, they give us a Ford festiva or a tiny little enterprise rental car every time. Step up and stop being so cheap. $90K in cars purchased and you can't "afford" to have more than 3 service loaners. Shut down your dealership or sell it, so someone else who cares can operate it. Next time I WILL buy somewhere else. Good job (LOL) at representing a great car with half-hearted service!!!!
The pictures is very in appropriate u need to change that picture
I moved to these Apartments back in 2010 and loved them. However as time went by the quality of service from the managment slowly degraded. I had set up contact information for my In Laws and my Father to have access in my absense but the staff quickly lost that info. When I had to deploy and left a timeframe when I would be gone they also forgot or lost that, saying they were trying to contact me through telephone when I had left them an email. Continous changes to aggreements and lackluster support from the staff makes this a irritating place to stay long.
Very poor quality and service is not good . Sagar Ratna is too excellent. I' all give 4 star to Sagar Ratna.
Was excited to get an adorable pair of shoes for a great price. After wearing them ONE HOUR they were COMPLETELY THRASHED JUST FROM WALKING! And they WOULD NOT GIVE ME MY MONEY BACK! Their policy is exchanges only, no exceptions. Bad company policy for faulty shoes if you ask me.
Coffee ok, service was horrible and not friendly at all. I am new to the cape and was not impressed at all. If you love coffee, great food and want a friend making your coffee you have to check out Caloosa Coffee in North Cape off Pine Island and Diplomat.
WAAAAYYYYY OVERPRICED!!!!! Being from New Jersey, I'm used to paying high prices for everything. But even NJ isn't this bad! $3.25 to substitute whole wheat capellini for white capellini. And when I asked for a side of marinara (for bland dish), I received a side of pizza sauce that had no seasoning of any sort. Again, $3.25 (no price listed on menu.) My dish with "seasonal" vegetables turned out to be mushrooms, a little spinach, a few green peppers & a little broccoli. Being the end of summer, I envisioned "seasonal" as something quite different. Maybe the "seasonal" vegetables in NJ are different than Maryland. Wait staff, etc. are friendly but no one seems to really care if you like your food or not. One would think the waitress might ask why I left half a plate of food, didn't want to take the leftovers (especially at these prices) & felt the need to add "marinara" sauce & lots of parmesan cheese to a dish that didn't contain either. How do they get away with this????
Ordered seafood soup and the veggies were seriously undercooked, lemongrass was not good. Felt like I overpaid for food that seemed not carefully prepared.
Shame on you Field of Flowers! Last week we ordered a corsage of small white orchids with rhinestones for Prom, today. Two hours before pick up I was called and told they ran out of the small orchids but could provide a corsage in purple, green, or 4 inch orchids! When I rejected that, they said they could do a white spray of roses. I grudgingly accepted. They then called back and said they only had full size roses! I canceled the order with 1 1/2 hours left to go! I called De La Flor Flowers in Cooper City. They had the correct size orchids and we will have our corsage in time. Thank goodness for De La Flor saving the day! We spent a lot of money with Field of Flowers (they are expensive!), but that has come to a screeching halt. Again, Shame on you for not delivering on your promise.
Im sick of being the nice guy. POOR SERVICE! not fair. Dropped off weed eater & scooter for tune ups 1 month ago, I was told it would be 2 weeks... they were a little behind. No Phone calls or followup from them. Horrible customer service. I like and will also choose the Local businesses first. But not this one anymore.
Great looking spot looking VERY inviting--ordered a Cappucino which is on the menu--NOT available--OK, then coffee with cream--or sorry NO creamer--will milk be OK? What?? Also advertised on the menu are fresh home made chips so we decided on those with our chicken tender basket OH SORRY--NOT AVAILABLE--Had to ask for napkins--Do I want to go back?? Would you want to go back?? Pricey for what you get!
Shite
Do not pay for them to assemble anything. I bought a chair from them and had them assemble it....mistake. They put the base on wrong and instead of it leaning back it leaned forward, Really???? Come on. There is even to stickers on the bottom that say FRONT! Don't waste your money.
Tamim
Used to go there almost once a week when I was a kid. Food passable for diner fare. I don't think it's had a major renovation or redecoration since before I was born - which is to say over 30 years and the quality of the tables and chairs show it. Despite nostalgia of my youth these days the owners are so openly political that I can't support the business with my money. For what it's worth I think enough people in our small town share my view that it went from packed at dinnertime to a ghost town.
I asked why I received no mail yesterday and no delivery until after 5 today and was told "some people don't get mail every day". I said that hasn't happened at my house address since 1988 when I moved in. I asked when I could talk to somebody with more answers and was told to call back on Monday. I asked who I should talk to and was told "to the manager" but he's not there on Monday. No wonder these people lose money every year. Complete morons.
This McDonalds sucks! The people that work there are ghetto and the food comes out sloppy! Thinking of writing a letter to corporate.
The guide books highly recommend this place and say it costs 16.50 TL but when I went, they insisted on 30 TL (tourist rate I guess). This was supposed to include a massage. I've never been to a Turkish bath before so I didn't know what to expect. She did give me a "massage" for about 1 minute during the washing. When I shared my experience with my hosts, they informed me that I was ripped off and the massage is usually about 30 min. Beware or go with a Turkish speaker.
The towing company has always had a bad reputation, though there is a reason for why there are towing companies. These guys are terrible and are the reason why the towing business has a really bad name. No evidence, no proof of reason and are a waste to talk to.
I have purchased a handgun here before and they were not overtly rude - or helpful. One of those places where you almost feel like you are interupting the proprietors from something that actually has more importance than a customer. After purchasing a firearm out of state I phoned around to see how much they would charge to do the tranfer for me. After calling every outfit in town from Pawn Shops to Shooting Ranges I do know that the Texas Gun Shop is the most expensive in town to do a transfer. These folks are not to be avoided - but I would never recommend them either.
All I have to say is the waitress with the ponytail jerry curl! My friends and I walked out due to her rudness and over 45 min to take our order. Two baskets of chips later we walked out. Never to return to this place
It is sad as at one time this was a land mark. The only thing good I can say is the staff was friendly. The chips tasted of old dirty oil. I ordered the green chili burro, it had very little meat and what meat there was, was chewy and fatty. Their enchilada sauce and hot sauce taste only of chili powder, which don't get me wrong, I like, but this was over powering with no depth of flavor. All and all, I would not recommend, although I know a lot of people who like their breakfast.
Awful experience.
Came out and did nothing but still charged me. Unwilling to come back out to properly diagnose without charging me more. They should have done a proper diagnostic the first time.
None
I had an awful experience with Camelback FORD. I did have to business manager say "NO" when I asked,"Don't you believe in customer satisfaction and keeping your customers happy". Bought a BMW and they would not reset the Service check light or pay to have it turned off!! Told me it was my responsibility if I wanted if off when it had been on for 4100 miles. I had just bought the car 3 days before. Minimum legal back brakes as well and would not replace. Was upset that I took it to BMW to have it checked after I bought it!!!!! TERRIBLE SERVICE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Not to mention I live 3.5 hours from the place!!
The stay here was less than stellar...we booked a block of rooms for some out of town guests and unfortunately the front desk staff was primarily less than professional, some of the rooms weren't satisfactorily cleaned upon check in with one having a strong smell of smoke (in a NON SMOKING facility). Some guests, along with myself, stayed for at least three nights and the rooms were never tended to. Upon check in it wasn't explained that they only clean occupied rooms every two days. The WiFi was very unreliable unless connected in the ballroom. This used to be a top rated facility...customer care and overall satisfaction should be the primary goal, not the money. Maybe some internal/external training on customer service would benefit this establishment.
My bad experiences with this bank are multiple so where to begin is the question - 1.) Couldn't get into my online accounts using FF. I am a software engineer and a web designer so i know my way around software. After going back and forth they tell my my security settings are too high and i need to lower them to access my accounts. Lower my securities to access my very precious bank information is not a solution. 2.) I transferred money to my business account (that is now with DCU) and I double checked everything. My online accounts showed the transfers. The next day I'm hit with over 100.00 in over draft fees because the money I though was there disappeared and all the items I paid out were over limit. 3.) I talk to a woman at the main branch to dispute the over drafts. I will replace the money I say but I don't want to pay the overdrafts. She says the same thing happened to her accounts at the bank just recently. Items in the online register are gone and you are left in overdraft mode. 2 days later the bank transfers 750.00 from my personal account to my business account to cover the overage without asking or getting my approval leaving my personal account in disarray and with over draft fees. 4.) I tried to purchase a part for my stove and it got rejected. Thinking I had typed so I tried again. I use my Paypal card attached to my account and the transaction goes through. I suddenly realize that all my transactions on my card are being rejected. Turns out I was purchasing something out of state and this is not allowed so they shut off my card. I mentioned this to DCU when I started moving accounts, they said they will contact me to verify the purchase not just shut off the card. These are only 4 reasons to not trust these people with your money. Sure the tellers are all nice but the infrastructure of the bank is very unstable.
None
This would have been 1 star if not for the food/beverage staff. I have played Huntmore 8 or so times and yesterday (7/14/13) was such an unenjoyable experience I can't see myself going back. We were part of a group of 20 golfers and our first group was slow first and foremost. I dislike slow golf as much as anyone and my group played at a very tidy pace waiting to tee off on every hole but one. The rangers harrassed our first group for the majority of the round. Upon every visit, they then felt the need to come back to my group and tell us that he just told them to pick it up and we need to keep up. I stopped counting how many times this happened at 4, including while I was parked at the clubhouse at the turn while my girlfriend was using the rest room. Once again, I understand that we need to keep up and we did. I understand them coming back and telling us once that if they speed up we need to keep up. But when you tell me half a dozen times or more you are going to get some aggravated golfers. If you want them to play faster, give them some tips on how they can play more efficiently. Just hanging around and saying the same thing over and over again does no one any good. On a positive note, though, the rest of the staff from the guy in the pro shop to the girls on the carts were top notch. Course was in above average shape and the greens were nice and quick per usual. Having said that yesterday will be the last time I play Huntmore.
I stayed at this location on the 24th of October. I have stayed and many HI Express inns as I am a Gold member - I was not impressed here. Not with the dried out eggs, Under cooked bacon and a toaster that would only cook on one side. The 60s styling was not appealing and for this location a bit pricey. My main complaint here is that I made a mistake and left my dirty clothes bag on the bed and when I got home I realized this and called back. The person on duty said she had no report. The next day I called back and was told to report it to their lost and found. I did - a week later no reply. I called again and they said they would look into it and get back to me - a week later they have not. I tried to call their number 5 times today and it picks up and then hangs up. Now I realize I made the mistake of forgetting the bag, but someone there has over $500 worth of my clothes and did not turn it in. That is a reflection on my entire stay at this location. If you cannot trust the employees, then how can one feel safe.
I love the beds and pillows....NOT the blankets. Tiny, gross, dusty room. Tiny bathroom door doesn't lock. Small TV. Limited wifi usage (about 3 minutes). Horrible stay. Loud people. Everything was FILTHY. Never going here again. Do NOT go here if you want a good or an average hotel. Even my small dog did not like this. Terrible. Absolutely HORRIBLE.
This was a great place up to do business with until today's visit. Found out our line of credit was canceled after getting there (had it with them for over 15 years), you would think they could have the decency to at least mail notification. Also to get winter tires swapped on cost $45 (Schwabby tires) to get switch back today for some reason cost $55 with out explanation after I asked. Poor counter attitudes today. They lost their Mojo... Off to find the tire store this Schwab's once was :( Also guess they didn't see the hubcaps by the tires... I'll do it.
Ok
I love the doctor's they are great, but the staff need to know more about the HIPAA Law. Specially if you're an office manager. I sent my husband, my son step-father, with a notarized letter to an appointment with my son. The office manager turned him away because he wasn't the father of my son and didn't even want to see the notarized letter. I came in the next morning and she tells me I broke HIPAA Law. I was like what?!?!? I don't work here so how did I break HIPAA Law and I sent a notarized letter!! Who does that?!?!? Then I call Diana her manager on Oct 2012 to let her know what going on with her staff, have yet to her back from her and we are in March 2013. Oh when you walk in the person in the front always as a face like they don't even want to be there.
None
I lived here with my sister in 2010-2011, and it was HORRIBLE. My sisters room had black mold in the windows, and the closet doors were VERY much off track (to the point that my sister wound up just taking them off completely). The stove was NOT level, everything that was cooked in the oven was always undercooked, when placed on the correct temperature. The floor in the kitchen was coming was peeling up, there were nails sticking up out of the floor that we constantly complaining to staff about. The floors above us were paper thin (to the point that we could hear every single move the people above us made, right down to their bodily functions and whispers). Every problem we had we reported when we moved in, and asked them to fix NUMEROUS times over a course of six months. Eventually we decided the $650 we were paying a month was NOT worth all of the sickness and complaints we had. In my opinion, if your going to pay almost $700 a month for something, it had better be in GREAT condition. NOT worth the money, and the staff are RUDE to boot!!! WOULD NOT RECOMMEND THIS PLACE TO MY WORST ENEMY!
The place is clean and looks nice enough but the staff is rude and act inconvenienced by your arrival, even though the cost of the images are pretty substantial. I walked in and wasn't greeted by Becca (only knew her name because of name tag), and she was hateful from the start. While she is getting papers out, I receive a phone call from the tech named Janet. Apparently she was calling because they were ahead of schedule and I showed up a few minutes past the (early 30 minute) mark. So Becca yells at Janet through my phone demanding she hang up because I'm standing right there, so Janet does just that. After dealing with a 'still rude' Becca, Janet came to get me to take me to wardrobe. After I went in the changing room, I had a question, so I stepped out to find these two going at it about who was right/who was wrong. (Becca was wrong, Janet was doing nothing wrong). Laying in one spot for 2 1/2 hours caused severe back pain (the reason for my need of an MRI), and when asked to sit up, I was given 0 help, and the tech (not Janet) was rude when instructing me how to deal with the CD. Now, Becca's attitude was different on the way out, but at that point my experience had been so bad, I didn't even care. I would recommend you go somewhere else for your imaging needs until these people instruct their employees how to deal with customers, especially when the customers are paying a pretty outrageous amount for the images. Good luck!
Disappointing. We waited almost 45 minutes for sushi and it wasn't even busy. There were only two tables ahead of us. The food was ok. Not a lot of flavor. Definitely not not worth the wait. We won't be back.
Trash in parking lot. Ground covered with oil. Rude people. Dirty store. Shelves half empty. Shop elsewhere.
I wish I could say something positive, but they would not serve me! The hours clearly state that the establishment is open until 8:00 on Fridays, put they put the food away and lock the doors at 7:30 so they can go home by 8:00. Please change your signs to correspond with the hours you are open and serving food, not to the time your employees leave. POOR CUSTOMER SERVICE TO LOCAL RESIDENTS. I saw your were packed today at lunch time, but with service like you showed today... GOOD LUCK
None
Apartment was tiny. No view of the Harbor, but the room smelled of fish. The toilet ran continuously, so we had to turn on/off the feed valve every time we needed to use it. Relatively expensive for the quality, but all rooms in the area were expensive at this time if year (early July).
Terrible management, but the apartments are pretty typical. The gym has been broken for the whole year I've been here and switching to a 2 bedroom apartment has required unnecessary application fees despite already living here.
The food is kind of good, but they are very over-priced. The amount of sushi is getting less and less each time. I order a tray for $50 and it was barely enough for 2 people.
DON'T USE THEIR WEBSITE TO MAKE A BOOKING. I sent an email at least three weeks in advance of Father's Day to make a reservation and when I rang to confirm today, they hadn't seen the email and are fully booked. Very disappointing for us - our day has been spoilt as we planned to cycle along the Grand Union Canal and stop there for lunch - no chance of getting a booking somewhere else at this late stage. I was really looking forward to it as the reviews are so good.
We just gave our notice, and I'm interested to see if things will change with moving out procedures and getting my deposit back. If they are favorable I would edit this review. We've lived in a S&S managed property for almost 3 years. Luckily I was able to meet the actual owner, who was great, but lives out of state. She helped me communicate with S&S to get things done. Things like an exterminator for a huge wasp nest, that took me 6+ months to get anyone to respond. We had mice when we first moved in, and a person came out and laid down traps. good for 2 years, because the mice are back, and thank goodness we're moving out. Management has changed over the years. In 2009-10 it was terrible. we had a pipe burst within the first month of living here and their maintenance man came and did a quick fix and then told me because it's winter to put a space heater on the pipes so they won't freeze. and then I got a $400 electric bill. not cool. and yes, the owner let us reduce our rent to cover that, but shoenberger offered nothing in return. bottom line is this PM company is just like any other PM company in bigger cities (think Sacramento or LA or vegas) where they just want your cash and won't really deal with you. For instance last winter my heater didn't work, and it had been 2 days. I called in to say that we had no heat and the operator on emergency call said MY call was NOT an emergency because it's wasn't a water leak. so, leaking water not ok, freezing is ok. so rude, so not helpful, not even compassionate. if you're looking for a PM company that has a heart, you'll be hard pressed to find one anywhere. good luck to you!
A car that this shop worked on was towed to my shop because it had been improperly repaired by Auto Xperts! Chris is the owner and the car that they had worked on was towed into my shop because they had improperly routed spark plug wires and it caused the car to stall. We diagnosed the problem and called Chris the owner to explain the problem. Chris was very upset that I had called and he demanded that my shop fix the customers' car free of charge as a favor to him!! The work performed on this car was very very bad! Any technician who has any training would not perform work like this to any customer car. We did not cause the problem to this car - the problem was caused by poor workmanship by Auto Xperts. I would not recommend this shop based on the way that they treated both the customer and my shop.
None
This place sucks! Can't even replace a battery!
I will NEVER visit this station again. Their prices were unbelievably high for no reason other than a Brentwood address. I just purchased E85 at a station further towards downtown Nashville, for 2.99 a gallon. Literally 3 days later, I bought a tank of E85 at this station. The cost was 3.49 a gallon. I didn't even realize the price was so much higher until I had made the purchase, but that is beside the point. I checked back online at the price of the other E85 station- it was still 2.99! That is right 50cents per gallon higher at this station. I will never buy anything at this station again and will tell my friends to avoid it as well.
The information on there menu is incorrect!!!! The telephone number doesn't even work.
Worst restaurant I have ever eaten in. Bad service, bad food and a bad atmosphere (it was overrun with lesbians). If you're in Galveston, TX - steer clear of this Joe's Crabshack - the one on Harborside Drive. None of the staff acted like they liked their job. It was like pulling teeth to get any service. The food was delivered to our table cold. One of our meals was a steak that appeared to have been boiled a few days prior and then seared on a grill for a minute to give it a grilled appearance. It was not edible.
I visited this location for the first time on March 15, 2013, at 6am, and was met with the most beautiful, modern decor. However my experience at the Pharmacy was a disgrace. The Pharmacist on duty, Russell, was speaking with a male customer when I approached and continued to carry on a conversation about his treatment towards a homeless woman who visited the store recently for approx. 10-13mins. And when Russell finally said his goodbyes to this customer I walked to the counter to present him with my script;needless to say, I expected the same friendly persona but received nothing. I had to greet him initially with "good morning". Russell typed my info in the computer, asked for my DOB, the usual formality....then Russell stated that Walgreens has a new policy that he wasn't sure if I knew about. Apparently, per Russell, this policy requires all pain Rxs be called into the doctor for authorization AND that the doctor provide a daignosis and reason for the Rx PLUS he informed me this could take 1-2 days and proceeded to ask me if I wanted to still leave it with him. Huh?! Despite my 1 1/2 year history of getting this exact script filled at Walgreens, Russell held firm to this obvious lie and went even further to insult my intelligence by apologizing and that it's a new policy. I knew instantly that he was not being truthful and, for whatever reason, did not want to fill my script. It wasn't fraudulent or suspicious, and neither was I. I took a 25min cab ride to this 24hr store location hoping to fill my script before work, only to be lied to directly to my face because Russell felt like playing God, Judge and Mr. Deceit for reasons that I am still unclear about. These Pharmacists are taking it upon themselves to determine who should and should not get a script filled in their store based on their own ignorance and prejudices and it is punishing loyal Walgreens customers like myself. Well, I went to a different Walgreens and had my script filled that same morning and not one word was mentioned about this "new policy" that required my doc's authorization and explanation for my medication....and when I asked about this "new policy" this Pharmacist had no idea what policy I was referring to - maybe because this policy was invented upon my arrival at Russell's Walgreens. This store may be a beauty on the exterior but the service I received was dishonest and it's people like Russell, with their hypocritical stereotypes, that allows the real junkies to continue doing what they do.
The worst service ever. The server didn't take the orders properly got me pancakes instead of waffles. Then there were ham pieces in the chicken crepe. We don't eat ham so when we pointed out the mistake to her, she just justified it as being a mistake. No apology and no effort to resolve the issue. I have to other IHOPs and their service was good. but this is the worst outlet of IHOP ever!
I completey agree with Janet. This office is very dishonest, misleading and disreputable. I also purchased the Amazon deal for 97% savings and $3000 towards invisalign. I was very clear when I scheduled my appointment asking about the prices. The lady on the phone assured me more than once that I would not be paying for anything except for the Amazon deal that I've already purchased and the retainers at the end. She said everything else was already covered. I would not have scheduled the appointment or wasted two hours of my work day and my entire lunch break to go there for nothing. The girl at the front desk and Dr. Z's assistant were both very friendly and helpful, but the lady who did the financing was extremely short, rude and condescending. She quoted me $6,500 for 12 months of invisalign. Since when is it that much to begin with? Janet is right when she said all they did was inflate the price to match the deal! As soon as I told her that I could not afford to pay the monthly payments that I was not even aware of to begin with, she pretty much said bye and walked out of the office ahead of me, like she had the same conversation many times before. I was promised on the phone that I would not be paying for anything but retainers, is it wrong of me to expect to get what I was promised? In this day and age, with all of the social media outlets and review sites I cannot believe someone would act in such a dishonest and unprofessional manner and risk their reputation. Whoever is responding to these reviews is clearly not a reputation management professional or Dr. Z, as their responses are rude, abrasive and unapologetic. If it is Dr. Z then he must clearly not care about his customers' opinions at all. I feel cheated, mislead and flat out insulted. I will be letting everyone know of my experience to save them the hassle.
Often an extremely busy place by virtue of catering to Amazon employees, you might find it hard to get served. Food often comes out on the cold side. Beer's good, at least, and there's free shuffleboard. Darts in the back corner.
Hate that i got a car from this place, Car have been in the shop over 4 times since i got the car, have not had the car 30 days yet, please do not buy a car from this lot go to any other lot in the Sacramento Area if you must buy a car. I feel like i got a LEMON. THEY DO NOT STAND BEHIND THE CARS THEY SELL, BAD BUSINESS
Called ahead to save time, as usual they are always running behind. They were 20 minutes late and even let a walk in go before me..go figure and go elsewhere
Out of business...
If you are thinking about buying a car from here...dont!
I wouldn't know anything about the food but we were literally told to stand out in the snow when all tables were full but there was plenty of room to wait inside which we were willing to do. Rude staff. Its poky though so I guess you don't have too many options.
very bad place.... lets start with the old painted wallpaper falling off the wall. then the prices are just out of this world 12.00 for a frozen burger... that tasted well like it was in the freezer for months... the fries seem like they were fresh cut then frozen... then they put so much salt on it that you can barely eat it.... the gravy was like a month old and salted... and its cheaper to eat out then eat in... over all i will not go back...
DON'T SUPPORT THIS SHOP! This place is awful! I've given it so many chances. The last straw was when I was looking through a bin of bicycle bells, and the owner, Loretta came to visit. I do't think she saw me as I was bent down- she stormed in, being increasingly rude to the sweet sales girl. I could not believe it. I then moved to a different art of the store- hoping she'd stop and be embarrassed to be screaming in front of a customer- Wrong-o! She continued to be-little the girl to the point where I thought there'd be tears. I later learned that some of my friends have witnessed similar scenarios at Area Kids shops. It's a wonder the store is in business considering how ugly the owner is to her employees. I used to bear the lack of new inventory to find some cute eco-friendly toys, but not anymore. My friends and I will be bringing our business elsewhere.
不會再來
Horrible service. Small restaurant.
After reserving 3 sites to tent here for 2 nights at $60 a night each ($360+ tax total) we expected a good experience. At 11pm sharp on our first night we were impolitely asked to put out our fire and to keep the noise down - understandably, this rule is clearly stated in their registration office. We were talking, and all but 4 people had gone to sleep, including 8 children. However, 2 sites down there was a loud party going on. We pushed over the logs in our fire and sat around chatting. At 11:15 someone I didn't recognize, but who was driving a golf cart walked up to our camp site and poured a bucket of water on the fire without saying a word. I like steam. At 11:30 the same people came back and accused us of trying to start the fire again and warned us the "Big Boss" would be around in the morning and they were putting in a report. We explained they were incorrect, out of line, and that they should shift their attention to the loud racket coming from 2 sites over. They did. In the morning an obviously aggravated 70+ year old man explained to the two wives who were making tea outside of my tent, that they should keep their husbands on a shorter leash and to be packed up and be gone in an hour. We had been kicked out! Check out was handled by the same old man (the owner). My friend who had payed for a site asked if Carson's had a Google Places page and the owner started into a tirade about how we should make sure we make a review and to explain to all our friends that our kind wasn't welcome at Carson's. He blatantly lied to us about losing money because of our "noise", when our friend who was in another section with a trailer informed us they had the sites filled with trailers within a few hours. I guess its only right that I share our experience, so he can get the right clientele, old people with trailers; and tenters with families can learn to avoid that curmudgeonly old fart, and his "fascist regime-like" team of retired Delta-Force security personnel. I expect that the fact is, the owner of this camp site is full of hate; and is put out by tenters in general, due to years of penny-pinching over lost trailer revenue. I've never been so insulted by a business owner and I would strongly recommend finding somewhere else to camp regardless of your "kind", sexual orientation, age, or creed; and particularly if you are a younger family or couple who has come to enjoy local culture and the beach in a natural setting after a long week of work. I almost forgot to mention that the first thing I thought of when we rolled into these sites - was an old townhouse subdivision in Brampton. This place attracts "city folk". We had 3 of 8 or so identical rectangular sites, each adorned with a cement fire pit and an asphalt pad for your car. They were encircled by tired looking cedar hedges and had NO trees - all crafted in a perfect rectangular shape, I expect to ensure the highest profits are generated with the least amount of maintenance. The riding lawn mower converted into a giant vacuum that covered everything in dust was a nice touch though, as they drove through the area vacuuming up dirt from the sites that had not been filled yet, well after the check in time of 2pm. Just stay away.
None
It's really hit or miss when you go in there with customer service. Sometimes I can get the friendliest person and other times I get the person who's so rude I never want to go in there again.
I highly recommend reconsidering before paying this extensive fee for very basic and (in many cases) harmful classes. When I took my female chocolate labrador to Old Towne School For Dogs, she was barely over six months old. It was our first dog and I was only 15. My family and I knew very little about dog training but we definitely learned our lesson- research research research. In our initial meeting with a trainer, she was put on a chocker and later prong collar. This caused major anxiety in my dog and it becomes extremely apparent that she becomes uncomfortable when putting on a leash on her collar. When I turned 18 I began to work at an undisclosed dog training facility in Arlington, VA who only believe in positive-reinforcement training. After learning about this training program and what else I could do with my dog, I was amazed. I have gone from basic obedience to advanced obedience with CGC and from Agility I to Agility VI. With positive reinforcement training, you are teaching your dog to think for itself and learn to give you the right answer. Dogs always want to please, you just need to wait a second. My dog now has throat issues because of the chocker and prong collar and when she did not attend her last class, Old Towne School For Dogs did not call nor contacted us about a final session. I can tell my dog now loves training and I can thank this wondering dog training facility in Arlington for their help. I now have a strong connection to my dog and our training. At Old Towne, I felt as though after the credit card was swiped, they stopped caring.
چند هفته پیش رفتیم تماشاخانه ایرانشهر و به این کافی شاپ هم سر زدیم، فضای داخلی و ایوان بسیار زیبایی داره و برخورد پرسنل هم خوب بود، اما کیفیت خوراکی ها و نوشیدنی ها اصلا خوب نبود! کافی شاپ خانه هنرمندان خیلی بهتره
At first, RipTide crossfit was a great gym. My fiance and I really enjoyed going there, mainly due to the coaches. The coaches were excellent. They pushed us to our limits and made us feel included in every workout, even if it had to be modified for us! Then things started to change... they sent out a bunch of Groupons and the whole attitude of the gym changed. The owners began to value the numbers of customers instead of the value of the customers. We have put in our notice to leave RipTide Crossfit, yet we were still charged for this month. We have written 2 emails and left 3 messages and no one has responded. I would never go back to RipTide Crossfit, nor would I recommend it to anyone in Fort Lauderdale. They are the textbook description of how business should NOT be done.
I love Ruth's Chris Restaurants. I have eaten at them all over the country. However, for the first time I went to the one in Buckhead on my Anniversary last Sunday and it was a very disappointing experience. First, I ordered my steak medium well. It came butterflied. I was never asked if I wantd it butterflied. I did not want it that way. Every Ruth's Chris I have been to I get the nice tall steak - medium well and it comes out perfect. They took it back and brought me back a new steak about half the height you see in their pictures. Even this one was not medium well. I had to ask them to take it back and cook it some more. Then we got the bill and I was billed for two steaks, the one that came first that they took back and the replacement. I will go backi to Ruth's Chris, but not the one in Buckhead on Peachtree.
Store is crowded, so you can barely make your way through an aisle to get anything. The employees are unsociable and unfriendly. I could have received more help and customer service from the brick wall!
This bar is all that should be flushed down the toilet. Racism is unacceptable and shouldn't be tolerated. I hope this puts you out of business and makes way for a far classier establishment.
Nice this Thai food is .but the bar at night is a joke. White trash girl's. Ghetto.
Rooms were great, service was absolutely terrible from the front desk. I was charged for someone else's room and it was almost impossible to get the charges straightened out. The professionalism was very low.
The waitresses were very sweet but food came at an insanely slow pace. On top of that the food was always severely undercooked
Beware of providing services to them. It is suggested to collect payment for services in advance and not to extend 30 day billing.
El servicio es malo, el personal en su mayoría malcriados y desinteresados. Pésimo
Closed. Been closed for quite a while.
This is the kind of dentist office that would rather lose patients than reschedule an appointment. Literally. I was a first-time patient who tried to reschedule my appointment because of a work conflict. They told me that if I cancelled they wouldn't give me another appointment. So I cancelled my appointment and walked across the street to another practice where I am now very happy. That logic might work if there weren't MORE THAN FIVE other dental practices in that 1/2 mile radius on Angell Street. You're just losing business. Not impressed.
Hah! I called these guys to change out my garbage disposal. They wanted to charge me $70 to come out and give a price quote. They would waive the fee if I agreed to have them do the work. I asked what the ballpark price would be to change a garbage disposal, they wouldn't even give me a ballpark range. Are you kidding me? You want me to pay $70 to hear the price? There's a lot of plumbers in this town, no need to suffer through these shady practices. Avoid them.
Not worth the price... I have had much tastier Chinese food before. Even the quantity was less.
I stopped going here a while ago because of the surly service and the fact that the carpet is so filthy that your shoes stick to it. I'd hate to see what the kitchen looks like.
None
None
Being a second time client the biggest problem I experienced is the delivery of my purchase. When it comes to delivering outside the CBD I have to wait longer than 72hrs to get my purchase. The first purchase was a ADSL router that held up my business for days before it was eventually delivered after calling the courier over and over. The second purchase was the delivery of a battery that took ages to get to me. The order was placed on the 23rd of December, processed on the 28th and the package was finally delivered on the 7th of January 2013. My suggestion: Change courier companies or if you cannot do door to door for us in the township then have a place in the CBD where we can go to collect our goods cause everyday we spend waiting is a day wasted (especially for goods that our businesses are dependent upon).
What a pomp and ridiculous place the sites to see were all created just for the visitors. If you want to see sights, go downtown.. The entire place is secluded and isolated and yet you have to pay to park. Take me to the Fairmont, the Anatole, the crescent. You pay there but you can walk somewhere and its so much classier than the Gaylord. It looks nice but underneath its veneer is cheap particle board.
Sadly, I will not be renewing my lease. Management is terrible. Bad communication between "corporate" and the main office has milked us out late fees we had no control of. Talking to other neighbors, we are not the only ones. If you like renting from people who run their apartments from some office in Texas and enjoy the outrageous fees/bad communication... this place is for you.
I was pleasantly surprised to see so many good reviews from an auto shop place, 28/30 Zagat wow.... Highly disappointed was I. Everytime I called to ask some questions they made me feel like I needed to hurry up with my questions. I ignored it thought well maybe it was nothing. I come in to get a simple brake check, no work at all just a check. It took 2 hours and I had an appointment so I should be ahead of walk ins, and 1 or 2 people got oil changes and left before they finished with me; ridiculous! During my long wait everytime the customer came in the guy at the counter got so flustered and always saying "Why do you people always have to come in without appointment and expect to actually get your car done right away!" No respect for the customer at all! Finally after ,y brake check was finally done, they say its going to cost $1200. Holy Crap! what?! $140 for front brakes $90 labor, $40 for each rotor turn, $25 for brake caliper each $53 labor, $43 for brake hardware each $32 labor, $88 for back brake shoes $74 labor, $41 for a wheel cylinder each, whatever that is $52 labor, $40 drum hardware for shoes $32 labor, $40 drum turns each, $10 brake cleaning, $30 brake flush $68 labor, TOTAL IS - $1210 about ARE YOU KIDDING ME! Guess what I bough brakes with all the hardware for $38 some nice Bendix ones that came with all the parts and hardware i needed, amazing I just saved over $1100 dollars so far, go here if you like throwing money down the toilet, but the pricing is BEYOND ridiculous, don't even get me started on the 5 nails I mysteriously have all of a sudden in two of my tires....
We dined at the Jackson MI Denny's a few nights ago and it was HORRID. For starters, the place looked like a total junk hole. Musty odor, a faint hint of cigarette smoke lingered in the stale air of old grease. The tables were sticky, so I took out an alcohol wipe out to clean off the table...THE WIPE TURNED GREEN FOR GODS SAKE!!! Enough to sicken me right there and then, but let us move on. I ordered a limited dish inspired by the film "The Hobbit: An Unexpected Journey" that is two pieces of bread with a fried egg in the middle, bacon hash browns and a sausage link. The dish came, no bacon hash browns, no huge deal right? Nope. I told the waitress that they were supposed to have bacon and she began to lecture me about what the menu says. So I get fed up and sent it back. Next thing I know the manager comes out to lecture me on my meal, that AND I QUOTE "So you didn't like our Hobbit Holes (innuendo!) The waitress put it in as 50-50 (bacon and sausage) so yes it was wrong". Hey ding bat, it had nothing to do with that...the problem was that the hash browns had no bacon!!! My friend asked for a box to take his burger (which I must say looked quite good for such crap service) home...AND THE MANAGER TOLD HIM TO SHUT UP!!! By that time I was done and fed up with these braindead people...then another dude came by and asked "So I hear you didn't like the Hobbit Holes?"...he had no association with any of this that was going on (I assume he may have been a cook) so why is he butting in? Nosy wankers...We left Denny's extremely angered and sickened by the horrid service. This place should be closed!!! That is how bad it was! There were people in there complaining about their food being wrong, the coffee tasting really bad, the lack of cleanliness and just the horrible service. I STRONGLY ADVISE YOU TO STAY AWAY FROM THIS DENNY'S. IT IS BY FAR THE WORST I HAVE EVER BEEN TO. YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED!!!
I want to like this place, because I believe in what they're about--or trying to be about--organic whole foods and all, and Reading *needs* a place like this, but they just don't execute it very well. Much of what I've eaten there has not been appetizing, and the service always seems SUPER SLOW. I think this place has run out of second chances.
J'ai l'impression d'avoir fais un voyage en Enfer. Donnez aux vigiles et aux employés des fouets et des oreilles de diables.
Red bull . So bad, speed energy drink rules!
This hotel took my pillow case off my own pillow and then took 3 hours to return it. Then, after staying over 7 days here and renting two rooms, they had the nerve to charge my an extra $27 to my visa card, which would have made for a $300 a day room charge. Stay ANYWHERE else but here!
The carpet cleaners were only in our large home about 45 minutes. It looked like they had only gone over the carpet one time even in the heavy traffic areas. After they left the carpets smelled good but within a few hours there was a musty smell and the carpet looked, felt and smelled no better than it had than before they came. :(
I read somewhere that season 4 of The Walking Dead is going to take place in this mall.
NOT impressed. The chiropractor himself gave the indication they would be able to work things out re payement plans instead of the insurance but then the admin suggested we find another chiropractor!!! I did get a phone call from the owner (well done) when I called to complain but "we're sorry for the confusion" does nothing to help cover expenses that are pointless since we have to find another chiropractor anyway......steer clear as they don't stick to their word.
I have to agree with the overall consensus on here that Gunnies is often over-priced, and is always over-staffed with a bunch of counter-leaning arrogant morons who seem more concerned with shooting the bull with each other and the odd regular customer (who could stand to be a regular at Gunnies? I don't want to meet that person!) than with helping other customers or new shooters. Gunnies was also a HUGE price gouger during the last scare. Asking $1500 for a $700 M&P Sport. It'll be a cold day in hell before they get more of my business.
I've been to this clinic before many years ago when I had an older dachshund-terrier mix. I was always treated with masked condemnation and veiled contempt. I always felt like they were judging me and every word spoken by the staff was accusing me of something, though I am never sure of exactly what I've done to these people to earn their scorn. I often wondered if it was that they just didn't think there was any money in helping my mutt and so maybe they thought I was just wasting their time. Sadly, my dog died a few years ago, and I've had no pets in the interim until recently. Two days ago I took in a stray cat that looked like it had been through a really rough period of time. I took it to the clinic for an exam and shots and was treated no differently than I had ever been. They take your money but they don't really care about the animal or you, or what is in the best interest of either. I will give a much better review to Dr. Anderson, he seemed out of place in this environment. He seemed knowledgeable and friendly but more importantly it wasn't what he said or didn't say just that I never felt like he was judging me or that I had to read between the lines of his words. I don't remember every experience I've had with other doctors at the clinic in the past but I do believe that generally the doctors tend to treat you like a human being which is more than I can say for the rest of the staff. It is getting very difficult to find a single veterinary clinic that simply provides essential care for your animal's well-being at a fair price, and does so without making you feel like a pariah.
None
WiFi is pretty lousy, but they charge you 15NT for using their plug for laptop. No service. You have to serve yourself to fill water. But decor and food are decent.
What ever you do DO NOT RENT HERE go elsewhere.. Roaches and Bedbugs... (funny thing I have a professional cleaning service that deep cleans my apartment on a weekly basis, and my carpet people come and wash my carpet on an every 3 month basis, roaches and bedbugs are not because of lack of cleanliness on my part but a lack of concern from the management at this property) Inconsintent rules and treatment,because they play favorites with their tenants.. rude staff from the top down!! Starting from their Region Field Manager to their ground maintance people. I could sit here and give examples, but no matter how I state what goes on in this property starting with their lack of systems and lack of personell training and lack of customer service from the top down, it wont even begin to shed light to how dirty and unprofessional this property and staff is. My quality of life has deminished because of their lack of professionalism and lack of systems and rules and their treatment is borerline discriminatory! Yea ....they have an indoor pool.... that is down for at least a couple of days a week and their jacuzzi samething, GO ELSE WHERE!
The staff was unhelpful when I described what I was looking for. They didn't know the item existed and just told me to look for it on my own.
I had a similarly bad experience. I got an estimate for a spring tune up on my lawn mower. I was told that if they ran into any additional expenses above the $35.00 quoted for a tune up, that they would call me for authorization. They took twice as long to service the mower than stated and when I went to pick up the machine the cost was $82.00!! When asked for what the additional expense was for they said it was for replacing the fuel filter and new spark plug. When asked why I was not contacted to be told about the additional expense the office crew became verbally abusive and said that since I did not pre-pay for an estimate they were not obligated to call me. I am not sure what they actually did, but they are difficult to work with and in my estimate completely unprofessional in their dealings.
Came to stay here after we had a tree fall on our house. Made reservations on the phone and indicated we would be staying for multiple days. My pregnant wife with three children in tow arrived before I could get out of school. Multiple hours before I could arrive she was turned away by the desk lady and denied entry into our room because I had the debit card. I had already payed for the room. With no where to go and no money on her they made her sit and wait for me to arrive. This is terrible service and I will never go here again. The young girl behind the counter had no concept of 'customer service' and in no way went out of her way to accomodate us and our situation. Facilities were ok. Service, not so much. Would not recommend staying here.
over priced food, untrained and rude staff.. I was very much disappointed with the food and taste.
Nunca respoden el telefono...
Worst company I've ever had the pleasure of dealing with. Cox communications called a collection agency on me for not "making a payment". I chose to start with their modem/router which I was unhappy with and returned a week later. Now charging me $186 for an item in their possession.
We had a Christmas party and had called ahead for our group of 8. To be fair, there were a lot of families taking advantage of the "Kids eat Free" night. The host told us the wait for 2 tables to be pushed together would likely be 15 minutes. 30 minutes later we were still standing with two very hungry toddlers and some tired party goers. Several tables were cleared in a way that could have accommodated us, but the host chose to seat others in those positions. After waiting an hour and having a conversation with Dustin, the manager, we finally got a seated. The entire time we waited, we weren't offered drinks of any kind or food. Many restaurants I've been to have offered both, when there is a wait. We were seated, but no waiter was to be found to cover our group. We flagged down someone who was supposed to be with another group to get the children something to drink. No one could find our waiter, and eventually the waiter, Ben, who was not originally ours served our table. He did a fantastic job and made sure that everyone had what they needed. When we talked to the manager after being seated (while we were waiting for our missing waiter) my husband told the manager he felt that we had been treated unfairly and suggested that we might be entitled to dessert. The manager agreed. The food made it out and was pretty much average, run of the mill Chili's fare. When it came time for dessert the manager told us for the table of 8 that we were only going to have 2 free desserts. (we only ordered 5 total, as several of us were splitting the desserts). He said that it was what he had told us originally, which was not. He was confrontational in his demeanor and after all we had been through no one ever apologized for the inconveniences. After some arguing, and some terrible behavior on the manager's behalf we did eventually get our desserts, though we are afraid they might have spit in them. Overall it was a disappointing evening and essentially ruined our group's Christmas outing.
None
I'm a computer technician myself, but not certified to do apple warranty repair, thus why I turned to Ribbit. I don't like to leave negative reviews, but the service I received was ridiculous. I had to tell them what to do over the phone to pin-point the issue, and even then they refused that my suggestion was the issue. They eventually "gave up" and said all they could do was ship it to Apple. I made a short trip to Haddock Computers and they quickly diagnosed the issue (what I had suggested to Ribbit in the first place) and my computer was finished the next business day. Haddock rocks, call them up any time you need Apple warranty repair. Beware of Ribbit's Apple techs. P.S. if a Ribbit employee is reading this, a word of advice. Don't treat your customers like idiots. Having the personality of a wet pile of garbage doesn't do you a bit of good. Have a great day!
None
The place is empty. No kiosk at sight.
I was disappointed with the presentation of my problems and explanations of what the repairs mean. Although it wasn't malicious, I think the customer service could have been more sensitive to a man who is OK with not knowing a single thing about cars. As expected, they found an additional $1500 worth of repairs. While I can't say they were wrong, the overall feel and vibe has left me seeking out a second opinion. ON a positive note, they recharged my AC and rotated tires for the amount I expected and in less time that was quoted.
提供自助加油，但刷卡機常當掉，信用卡太舊有時會讀不到
I was excitedly told about this pub as the place folk musicians would congregate to play and the pub parrot would greet you astride the landlords shoulder. Sadly the place has been smartened up, the parrot confined to a cage, food has replaced the live music and what can only be desribed as soul destroying pop music plays loudly from both the bar and kitchen. The food was ok. The bitter was rubbish. Staff friendly. Another pub lost to the gastroland disease. Sad.
its crazy my son got food poisoning if i was u dont got there later this cook is nasty you to be but did not know whats going happen but im so about my son so sick he cant even move i say dont ever eat there in your life time
Selena, Laura and Brittnae to all of you my greatest sympathy for the conditions and the lies you have to tell under the tutlage of Tom Menard and Kelly. Whoever Jeff is it must be hard to take anything he says as truth unless he is a more of a jerk than it appears. I and several other clients have gotten fed up. Kelly is not what she seems to be she talks about her employees when they are not around, wonder what she says about the clients and she does that also. Report it to Tom and he says she should do that but she is still there so you can't take him serious at all. Even more when you confront Kelly she hides her head as if she can't talk. I have now had to tell her I rather talk to the other employees and as for service this year. Because Mother Nature stopped them for giving the best site maintenance,I've decide to ask how can I be compensated for having to shovel my own unit door front after the plowing crew has piled the snow up on the units. 4 times and Tom says there's nothing they can do. My door has been off track since 8/2/2013 I have personally told Tom this several times, what a joke it's still off track. I gave Laura a key today with implicit instruction that my trust level in Kelly is none. There are some videos I am posting soon to show even on days like March 2nd, 2014 temperature 40+ degrees and once again I had to shovel/ and or remove my own snow. My experience lately is shoddy management. Unprofessional behavior by the site manager and what a joke from the senior management and district manager. I WOULD SAY TAKE A LOOK AT THE OTHER FACILITY IN LANSING AS LONG AS KELLY IS MANAGER AND TOM AND /OR JEFF ARE SENIOR MANAGER. OH yeah and cooperate will forward you to Jeff's personal line which he must never answer if you call to speak to someone besides this management team.
I order Chinese food often and never have a problem with me understanding them or them understanding me. However, the woman who took my order at Taste of China Hut on Decker Blvd could barely speak a full word of English, more like sounds. I said no broccoli twice, she thought I wanted double. When picking up the food, I was charged extra for the broccoli I didn't want. I then pointed out her mistake, which was met with huffs and puffs that she had to redo the order. Strike 1. I asked for extra sauce on my General's chicken. Due to the sauce being so thin and having way too much of it, it turned into a soup consisting of generals sauce, rice, a small bit of soggy chicken and a ton of cheap vegetables. Strike 2. The sauce itself tasted more like oil than anything else. I couldn't taste sweet or spicy as General's chicken is supposed to be. Strike 3. My recommendation is to skip this place. There are 4-5 other Chinese places within throwing distance that you can choose from that are less expensive, have food that tastes good and you get more of it. FYI - The lunch special was $6.25+tax for just chicken and rice. No drink or egg roll. Edit - I have to wonder about the previous reviewers of this restaurant. Half of them can't string a sentence together and the other ones don't say anything at all. I suspect the previous reviews for this restaurant are posted by the owners or people working there.
I have given up on this place. A complete show, stay away
Absolutnie nie polecam tego miejsca jako lokal w którym można dobrze zjeść. Opiszę po kolei jak wyglądała moja wizyta w tym miejscu, do którego nigdy więcej nie wrócę. Najpierw kelner podał wszystkim zupę tylko zapomniał o mnie. Nie miał nawet na tyle cywilnej odwagi żeby przyznać się do błędu i zwyczajnie przeprosić (każdemu się może zdarzyć). Podana zupa czosnkowa była letnia. Z kolei barszcz, który zamówiłem był zrobiony z koncentratu i nie miał nic wspólnego z burakami. Kaczka którą zamówiłem, to był raczej zestaw przypraw w których smaku kaczki nie dało się odnaleźć. Mizeria, to był po prostu starty ogórek i śmietana. Ani grama pieprzu, soli, cytryny, cukru... po prostu nic. Sok pomarańczowy za który zapłaciłem 14 złotych, miał być z wyciśniętych pomarańczy. Moim zdaniem był rozcieńczony sokiem lub napojem z kartonu, o ile w ogóle było w nim odrobinę prawdziwego soku z wyciśniętych pomarańczy. Na koniec gdy wychodziłem zapytałem obsługi czy barszcz był robiony z buraków czy koncentratu, oczywiście usłyszałem odpowiedź, że z buraków. No więc już złośliwie dorzuciłem "aha.. tak jak ten sok z wyciśniętych pomarańczy, nie był rozcieńczony?", no i odpowiedź kelnerki była poniżej jakiejkolwiek krytyki, bo usłyszałem w złośliwym tonie "a jak Pan myśli?". No więc po pierwsze Pani Kelnerko, nie odpowiada się pytaniem na pytanie, ale jak widzę nie uczyli w szkole. A po drugie, jestem przekonany, że podany sok był zwyczajnym oszustwem. Nigdy więcej nie przyjdę do Restauracji Pod Wesołą Kobyłką. Wasza obsługa to jakaś kpina, a jedzenie, to nieporozumienie.
WORST apartment management company ever! The manager (Kerria Janson) at Vierra Briarcliff promised us 4 months in a row to fix an issue we had (they had lost our deposit when they took over) We even showed her the copies of the payments! They never fixed it and then 5 months later serve us with an eviction notice and the amount is now almost double!! What the HELL is wrong with this company????? We are out of here as soon as our lease is up if this stupid company doesn't evict us sooner!
attempted to contact, phone out of service, no longer in business
Was good when it started but the overall quality has xome down
My computer's power supply fried my mobo so I went there to buy new ones. First time they sold me a bad PSU, it happens. Brought it back, they exchanged it, np. So I open up the mobo and sure enough, it's not the right one. They put the wrong mobo in the box. So now I'm return trip number two. So I put it all together, and sure enough, AGAIN nothing works. The mobo is broken. My god, do they sell anything not broken? I asked for a return and at least they gave me that. I bought my items of newegg, installed them, they work flawlessly. To add insult to injury when I mentioned the part being broke they said they would test them there. I was like "oh neat!" But then they said they would charge $40. Hold the phone. They want to charge me money to test their parts because THEIR stuff is broken. That's messed up. Better off with newegg.
It used to be a gud place for Rajisthani food, but the quality and service has been severely degraded these days. We visited here just a day ago, and food was absolutely tasteless. Worst off all, my friend got an insect (fly) from the khichdi he was served. When we complained to staff and called the mgr, first they just seemed ignorent..and offered to serve the thali again...!! Totally spoiled our mood that very fine day...
Left on hold for over 10 minutes!
None
First time I have stayed in a hotel with no air conditioning - at least during "heater season" in which the thermostat (which seemed like a nice touch at first) was really only a heater. The room never got below 70, when I called to inquire they said, "turn off the thermostat, that is the best you can do. Sorry your room is too hot." We were here with a group for an in-hotel function. Over the 3 days we were here, we were served burnt popcorn (come now, they really couldn't just dump it and make another batch, how cheap); cookies made with a bad recipe that came out looking like cupcakes and tasted horrible; and during a lunch one day, the bread for sandwiches was frozen solid. When the first batch ran out, the tray was left empty (despite many people still in line), when the server finally brought out another loaf, he said, "I was hoping not to have to open another bag," as if the cost of the bread came out of his paycheck. By the way, it was frozen also. One of my favorite little things about staying in a hotel is cranking the A/C and getting under many covers, as I write this, I'm laying in bed with all the covers off, the room very humid and stale and no A/C as even an option. Oh and if you were wondering, this is a "Holidome" with no access to exterior windows. UPDATE: Just got off the phone with the desk again. There is nothing we can do, "some of our rooms are too hot, some too cold." Nice. Nice hotel, just resigned to the fact that the climate in their rooms is crap. Maybe they should work on that. In the meantime, stay in a modern hotel that actually has A/C.
4.6.2013, times atteneded, 9:30, 10:30, ages of party, 33-27. lane 35, conservative & non-conservative patrons Pros: Cleanliness, Staff was friendly, non-smoking, availability of lanes Cons: Here we go 1.) While the staff was friendly, and there were plenty of customer service reps working behing the counter (cashiers, shoe staff, managers, etc), they took forever to say "May I help you". They all stood around, walked around like they had a million things to do, and no one wanted to help. The "big boss" (In a blue shirt), NEVER looked at anyone and told them to get a move on. I've worked in customer service for may years. You don't do this. It's one thing to employ teenagers. It's another to employ them, and NOT tell them to do their job - wait on customers. 2.) Price: $5.00 a game? Plus $4.00 shoe rental. You must be kidding me. 1 hour of bowling, and shoe rental for 4 people for people was $49.99. I'm not my father talking about bread as a nickel, but $50 for 5 people for 1 hour??? 3.) Be careful if you play by game or by hour. I got sold on 2 games for 1 hour. What they DON'T tell you is you only get a 5 minute grace period to get a ball and a drink (water, soda, alcohol, etc). Unless you IMMEDIATELY start bowling, and you're on top of it, you won't get 2 games in with their timer. Don't even think about a bathroom break. 4.) My party of 4 got through the 1st game and 7 frames of the 2nd game before the "timer" counted down to zero. We went out as a Saturday night outing (one pitcher of beer, two girly drinks for our wives, and 4 weak shots for whoever got a strike). Before the counter struck zero (about 8 minutes left) I went to the counter asking if we could extend our game to the end of the 10th frame. I was politely told no, that people were waiting. LESS THAN 5 MINUTES AFTER OUR "TIMER" HIT ZEZO, A REPRESENTATIVE STOPPED BY TO TELL US THEY NEEDED TO GIVE OUR LANE TO ANOTHER PARTY, AND WE NEEDED TO LEAVE. A minute after that, a manager (who wore a black, long sleeve shirt), stalked my lane (as we were putting on our shoes, putting our balls away, and finishing our drinks (the original pitcher of beer & water we ordered), and as soon as we left, attacked our lane with a ferocity of a velociraptor attacking the cow in Jurassic Park (It had 6 glasses, and 4 shot glasses). 5.) I will NEVER give my money to that bowling alley again. Maybe it's because I come from a small county in Ohio where people respect your patronage. This bowling alley ONLY wants your money, and it's managed by men/women who don't care about their jobs. I'm 33 and felt like my 91 year old grandfather complaining how things aren't like they used to be - when people used to care about you, and your money was well spent. It was a sad moment. I will NOT go back there.
Too spicy! Bad service.
Future Customers beware. Ameripro guarantees customer satisfaction, but I have personally experienced their "guarantee" and it was a nightmare. They quoted the repair of my LG Washing Machine for $250 and asked for a $200 deposit. When that part didn't fix it, they said they needed to order a second part at $200. When the second repair didn't fix it, they needed another $250 for a third part. After 4 weeks with no clothes washer, we asked for a refund so we could purchase a new unit. They agreed, and offered a refund if they could remove the parts they installed. Instead, they removed the entire washing machine from our home, kept it. After multiple attempts to correct the situation, Ameripro decided to keep my washing amchine and not refund our deposit!!! I spent many, many hours on the phone with Stan, Rudy and Michael G and always got the promise of a call back, or another number to call - that no one ever returned. After 2 months of frustration, I filed a formal complaint with the Better Business Bureau, and hoping someone (Stan, Rudy or Michael) at Ameripro will finally contact me.
I booked 3 rooms for a vacation week-end with family. Only 2 were ready at check-in time (3PM), so we waited in the one room that was ready. About 1-1/2 hours later, we re-contacted the front desk, and the other rooms were made available. The rooms are very small - really designed for a single person (apparently for a single night given the small number of towels). No pool, and no breakfast to speak of. Hotwire gives it a 3.5 star ranking, but it doesn't stack up to most 3 star places I've stayed amenity-wise. There is free high-speed internet so, if you're traveling on business for a day or two, its probably adequate. However, I wouldn't recommend it for a pleasure trip.
This is just my impression of this particular employee and does not reflect how i feel about the company..... I called looking for a part (tires) for my trailer that i purchased from uhaul. the guy that picked up the phone just said."bring your trailer to make sure i am giving you the right part" i told him that i had the brand and exact tire size. I also told him that i had called another location where i had bought them before but that they where sold out. he then told me "oh!! if they are sold out in that location i can't sell them to you" .. The guy didn't even asked me for the tire size or either bother to check... i am just surprised how people can be so careless about how they conduct business.
They are impossible to reach on the phone. Cannot understand why they can't answer - even with voicemail. Why give them the business, when other facilities seem to care about their customers.
Decent food sometimes. Stay close to a toilet other times.
Cool stuff - Pet show, pinapeds, turtles - don't miss the HUGE ones just outside the Shipwreck rapids. Shamu - Very disappointed - Trainers no longer enter tank with whales. The whole show is mostly splashing visitors. Dolphins - no jumping over things or through hoops. VERY heavily human acrobatics - very light on actual dolphin tricks. Cirque de la mar- SHUT DOWN - "Summer is over for that show" according to guest services (It's MID-AUGUST for crying-out-loud!) Everywhere: Baseball game style drink sellers "Peanuts!, get your peanuts!" Carnival ring tosses. Ug... Polar Explorer ride - VERY OLD technology. - unchanged in 15 years - Not even Hi-Def video. Weak. ShipWreck Rapids. 45 min wait, short, unsurprizing ride. Atlantis ride: 2 drops, some water, a long wait to exit... DONE. Aquarium: Fresh Water- Air Conditioning mostly broken.. very hot and stuffy. Parking - Expensive - Recommend parking outside, biking in. Several tables near bike racks near entrance for lunch. Put cold lunch in a cheap foam ice chest, leave on bikes... Bike racks not heavily used, not advertised on web site, not mentioned in phone messages, and very lightly commented on forums. We highly recommend the SD Zoo instead. Absolutely none of the issues above... A very class act up there... And you can bring your own lunch in: No problem and FREE parking.... Go EARLY though and see the Big Cat alley FIRST (they are asleep well before noon)
All I have to say was that the children's chicken tenders weren't completely cooked!!!
This service center is one of the most worst HTC service center i ever been to. No doubt they are capable of giving solution to you issue but the resolution to that issue invites more issues after all and u have to end up @ this service center again and again.
I have been trying to find this hotel's phone/email. Can some one help
None
My first visit was very nice. The rest of my visits where not good at all! I started going in March 2012, things where done wrong it was all obvious to everyone, they tried to correct them and now it's December and my teeth are still not right and they want to charge me more to make them correct! Please do some research before you go here, give me a call and I'll be glad to tell you about my experience! Sincerely Sandra
TERRIBLE. Made reservations for a Corvette, for my birthday. When we arrived, the attendant told us they did not have the Corvette in and instead had a Camaro for us to use. We explained that this was my birthday, and that we specifically wanted the Corvette. The manager came out and spoke to us, and simply could not tell us why it was not there. She offered us the Camaro. She never offered us a discount. Clearly Hertz does not care about customer service. If they did she would have offered us a car for free or significantly discounted. TERRIBLE Customer Service!
Mediocre as expected I can't say I expected much more than I got. I know when you order any battered chicken dish you get the worst cuts of meat caked with excessive batter. I ordered General Tso chicken and shrimp (Dragon & Phoenix). Most of the "chicken" was tough and chewy and the shrimp was just as bad. They sliced it open as is often done but these otherwise large shrimp were strangely VERY Flat as though they didn't just split them, but also cut out some of the meat. Customer service was lacking too. Walked in, behind another customer, after they left I stood there for a few minutes unacknowledged.
Amazingly bad taste, oh, i think someone should forbid them frommaking pizzas.
Seating is worst in the city...not comfortable at all.
THIS MAN NEEDS A SERIOUS MENTAL HEALTH EVALUATION, HE IS NOT SUITABLE TO NOT ONLY HANDLE FIREARMS, LET ALONE SELL THEM.
Expensive. It was one hour of work for the plumber and his assistant to clear the drain, charge was $165. They explained that they charge extra to go on the roof. Other plumbers are just as good but more reasonable.
I do think I have eaten better food out of a vending machine. People rude. And the on going complaint about the rest room privilege's, the Food Zone should be shut down. For illegal practices. In my opinion, I hope it goes under and fast! The entire town should be ashamed to have such a place in this town and also a such a corrupt officer of the law.
None
I went to West Hills in March of 2012. All went well. For the most part. I have physically tried to re-enter West Hills, twice since then, and was sent home! I even spent a 3 hour assessment, the last time, and when the assessor call the doctor I was denied. I have all the insurance criteria. I was asking for help. I am sick of their TV commercials. Here in Reno, NV. All propoganda. Now I ask? Where do I get help? NOT with STEVE SHELL CEO
I Reserve A Room a Head of Time an When I Got To My Room It Smelt Like Pure Weed I found A Used Condom BETWEEN The Head Board and The Pillows and The Bed STINK.... I Don't Recommend This Hotel To No One....
The owner Dinardo is extremely rude! We wanted to do our rehearsal dinner here for our wedding. We had set up an appointment to come in and see the place and to have dinner. Dinardo was not present when we arrived. We were shown to the function room by the hostess. The hostess had forced us through the restaurant to see the function room and pointed us in the direction for us to find the other option for us. She was also extremely rude. We had asked if Dinardo was availale to chat and we were relayed that he was too busy. I have worked in the restaurant industry for 8 years and a small business owner myself and know how things work. I know that when someone is coming to check out your restaurant to throw a formal party with 40 people you don't treat them the way myself, my fiance and my Mother were. No good...
Buggered off with our cooktop, didn't contact us for a week, wouldn't give us a quote and had to be constantly hassled to do the work :(
BUYER BEWARE!!!!! STAY AWAY FROM THIS DEALERSHIP!!!!!!!! I went into the dealership looking at the 2004 Mazda Rx-8 that was listed at $9995. So of course i thought what a deal? So i continued to pursue the car and i get to the dealership and the price in the window was $11995. Now that didnt scare me because most dealerships online pricing is the final "Sale Price" which i was okay with. So as im looking at the car i noticed a few problems and asked if the rusting rear archs could be fixed which i was told it would be fixed at THERE expense. So after test driving and feeling the car out i felt as though $9995 was a fair price and my sales consultant agreed at 9995$ is a great deal. As i continued i asked for a "out the door" price. A few moments went by and my sales consultant came back to me with a price of $13,200. Shocked as anyone would assume i was wondering whats with the spike in price? They came back and told me that they had to replace the engine (KEEP IN MIND THAT WHEN I TEST DROVE THIS CAR THE CHECK ENGINE LIGHT WAS ON!!!!! IN A BRAND NEW MOTOR!!!!)and that costed them alot and the rust removing would COST ME MORE money so the price was 11995$. so i left the dealership in complete disgust because $13200 was no starting point on a $9995 car. As i got home i was eager to do some research on this car and come to find out MAZDA PUT OUT A RECALL ON ALL MOTORS From 2004-2008. ALSO MAZDA DID A RECALL ON THE REAR FENDER RUST. ALL OF THESE COSTS WERE AT MAZDA'S EXPENSE BECAUSE IT WAS A RECALL. THERE IN NO WARRENTY NECCESARY FOR A RECALL!!!!!!!!!! So i called back the next day to see if something changed, maybe they'd like to reconsider and be fair and sell a car. So i called the and acted as if i never looked at the car and i was told that my sale price out the door would be $11,100 from a salesmen with 4 years experience. And i asked him if he could double check that price with his manager and he said trust me ive been working here for 4 years, that is the best we can do. NOT EVEN 30 MINUTES LATER I GET A CALL BACK SAYING THAT THE PRICE I HAD GOT THE PREVIOUS DAY WAS THE PRICE I HAD TO PAY. Then i asked well what was that price? And he said that he didnt know. It really just goes to show that there sales floor is full of liars and people who will try to rob you blind. All in all, Dont fall for there scam tactics. This place is bad news.
This is my first negative review ever as I dont think anyone should be judged based on a single experience. It's also important to note that this review isn't about the chararcter of the people at Bemer Motor Cars (as they all seemed nice enough). However it is intended to warn people of the lack of professionalism and the potential damage that a "repair" from Bemer can cause. I brought my Range Rover to them as they were open on a weekend and the amber engine light had come on. The owner was quite nice and helpful. There is a long list of issues after this, incomplete repair, almost zero communicaiton, delays upon pcikup (which I had to do repeatedly) and finally a repair that created a worse engine problem than I started with. I literally had to take this vehickle bucking, lurching and leaking to the Range Rover dealer. The Land Rover dealer called me in to review the the mistakes that had been made so they explain why I was goiong ot have to pay a 2nd time for the exact same "repair" Bemer had completed just days earlier. I brought this to the attention of Bemer Motorcars believing they would do the right thing but I have not heard anything as of yet.
I am shocked to see people who are supposedly trained to deal with tense situations react like this. The officers know he had a dog, because they watched him put it in the car. They should have been prepared. Why does it take three officers to put handcuffs on someone who has submitted to being handcuffed?
I stayed at the Astor motel Brisbane, March 2013. My stay there was like suffering in jail. I use a walking stick and require minimal help but do require a walk-in shower. When checking in I did ask for a walk in a bathroom. I was also told I would be getting a self-contained unit. The bathroom was very roomy, but the tiles on the floor were like glass. They were so slippery that there was no chance of standing without falling. I did have to ask for an extra 4 bath floor mats to place on the floor so as not to slip. As well the bathroom only had a vanity basin and not a vanity unit or any sort of shelf so as to be able to place our toiletries. There was no kitchen at or any means of cooking. All there was is a small microwave and fridge which could not even make ice. The unit was never the vacuum cleaned for the entire eight days of my stay. As well the linen was never changed for the eight days. We had to ask for extra bath mats and also ask for tea and coffee and when tissues were required. The TV is still set on 4x3 mode and not as today's digital TV at 16x9. So most of the time we had parts of the picture and text off the screen. The view from my balcony looked over what seemed to be a rubbish tip. The air conditioner made terrible gurgling noises and leaked water. While I was staying there the Laundromat was under renovation so we were unable to do our laundry. We washed our underwear in the vanity basin and had to purchase cloths so as to have clean clothes. You think they would have some sort of temporary laundry. My work has me staying in many many motels but, the Astor, will have to be the worst experience I've ever had staying at a motel. For the price I paid at night, it is way too expensive and will never stay there or ever recommend to friends or family.
Suriname is a major source of bauxite. This mineral has a very high aluminum content. To cut off the Allies' supply of this metal, the Germans sailed the Goslar to a narrowing of the Suriname river, and scuttled it in the middle of the shipping lane. The best laid schemes o' mice 'n men gang aft agley. And so it was with the Goslar. The lower reaches of the Suriname is fast flowing tidal water. The reversing flows of that river rapidly carved shipping channels through the mud around the Goslar.
None
None
Its a cool park except for all the fags That go there and have sex in the bushes.
It's closed. I drove by today and it looked fairly permanent...
Well, I am in a tussle with the Service Department, which I will report on when concluded, but so far: these people must be under the corporate gun to NOT repair legitimate warranty items. Short story: my strut hood is cracked and making a tremendous in-cabin noise on rides. I took my 6 month old, 5000 mile car in, not knowing the problem and already mightily annoyed at the inconvenience. The service manager said that the car is damaged not defective, therefore, the repair is my responsibility. Well, we are 60 year old folks, and drive an Avalon, so you do the math adding this up. I say it is defective. Here is bottom line: -why would you alienate good, long-standing customers over a new car, knowing my access to all the social media, just to save a few hundred bucks? Is this good business? More on this later
So salty! Everything is so salty no matter the location, SLW or here. Maybe try the salads.
Feel I got hustled. AC unit would not come on. One Hour Service person came out and changed out a $20.00 transformer, Charged $250.00 + $69.00 Service call charge, $318.00 Total. He was at my home for about 15 min. This kind of pricing is robbery . I will not use One Hour ever again! Will problably file complaint with BBB.
There is like 1 guy at the whole entire store that is helpful the rest of the people especially the old tech guy that was overweight with black greasy hair and had an accent was an absolute joke
It's decent, but nothing too special. Definitely take advantage of the buy 2+ items at $5.99 each. You can get specialty medium pizzas for that price (usually around $15). I have had several satisfactory experiences and one terrible experience. Their deliveries frequently take approximately one hour. My one bad experience: I placed an order for delivery and the estimated time was 40 minutes, no problem. After an hour had passed I called and asked, the manager informed me the driver had left and would be there soon. After another 45 minutes passed (so we are at 1.75 hours since I ordered) I called back and said he still wasn't there. The manager said he would call the driver and then call me back, which he did and said the driver would be there soon. Within 5 minutes I received a call from the driver saying that he was outside my building. I let him in, he smelled like marijuana horribly. He handed over the food and gave me a free 2-Liter of soda for my trouble. The food was hard and cold at this point, but the manager gave me a call back before I had a chance to call him. He asked how it was, I complained of the smell of weed and that our food was cold. The manager offered me 50% off my next delivery, which he honored. I've continued to buy from them since without another bad experience. Update: Had another bad 3+ hour waiting experience with them when ordering delivery. Took 2 hours to get our food and when we got it, we had received the incorrect sandwiches. I then played phone tag with the driver and manager of the restaurant and both of them accused me of lying. I continued to complain until the manager would send me my correct sandwich. Finally, he obliged, and when I opened the box it was just bread chicken and cheese thrown into the box, completely dissembled.
None
The people who work at this gym are pretty rude. There is a very small amount of free weights and few treadmills. I have seen trainers calling people fat who walk by on the street. But if you need a place for a treadmill/quick workout, this place works.
Don't waste your time..not alot of options on the island but dont waste ur time with this place
None
This place is a rip-off and feeds off of naive college students without access to places further from campus. Don't give them your business.
I hired Peter to clean up a green pool and replace a timer on my pool pump. Peter did a decent job in cleaning up the pool that had been sitting for about three years and brought it up to the point where it was swimmable again. The process took about three weeks, a little longer than you might find with a comparable pool company, and I often felt like I had to call him repeatedly in order to get him to show up to do the work. There were also a number of times when he would promise to come and work on the pool on a certain date, and not show up. The pool was cleaned, but I learned the hard way that you get what you pay for. The replacement of my pool pump timer was another issue. He supposedly replaced the gears on my pool pump timer with "used parts" to save me money. Needless to say, the "used parts" didn't work at all. When I brought this to his attention, he promised that he would purchase me new timer mechanics, and refund me the cost of the "used parts". Weeks go buy, and no fix/refund. So I give him a call, and he tells me that he has the parts and that he will fix the timer by the end of the week. Two weeks go by without a fix. I call him, and he ignored my call. So I called him from a second phone, and he answered immediately. He then suggested that I go somewhere else to get my pool timer fixed. When I asked about a refund, he informed me that he would send it to me. When I asked when I could expect the refund, he hung up on me. I'll adjust this review, when/if I receive my refund. If not, I will have to agree with the other reviewers...use caution. Spend the extra money for someone who will follow through with their promises.
OMG they charged me $85.00 for regular acrylic nail and pedi with airbrush flags that were terrible and looked at me crazy for the $5.00 tip as if they deserved more they deserved ZERO !!! I would never return to their facility !!!
I performed work for Eco at four BlockBuster locations in and around the SF Bay area over 120 days ago. They have still not paid our invoices nor have they honored our REA's. If approached by them turn and run they will pay themselves and ignore the people who do their work.
Reasonably inexpensive compared to other places in the area. That being said, there communication is horrible. Not only to the customer, but between themselves. Very difficult to make an appointment. They were supposed to come quarterly, though I guess 3 months is too long to remember such things. Once, did not show up to an appointment, then left a message for me saying that I wasn't there. Frustrated, I am now willing to pay more for better service.
It is one of only two places in Siliguri where you can play squash, and is significantly less expensive of the two. They charge ₹1,000 per head per month (with no annual subscriptions). They also have ample parking space, which is very convenient. However, the facilities and staff are terrible. They have one steel glass for everyone to drink water from. There's a missing curtain in the gallery above the squash court and you're blinded every time you look at it while playing. It's been that way for weeks now. The worst thing is the staff. Cheap, irritable and supremely uncaring about their guests and members. If, for any reason, you have to borrow gear from them, they behave like beggars about it. They're rude and will send you back without even giving you thirty minutes to play because their winter timing for Sunday was changed and you didn't remember that. The less you have to speak to them the better. But you get to play squash in Siliguri, and for that alone, it's worth the price and the harassment.
Called to ask whether they sold bags of ice and got a short response then hung up on. RUDE.
Deberian de eliminar lo que no se ha vendido en mucho tiempo.... Y deberian de cerrar ese taller que le da mal aspecto al local
None
I would seriously consider how much you love your horse before hiring this vet hospital to do anything. Keep shopping; there other vet hospitals out there.
Got a raw chicken sandwich here once, never went back.
This is usps office will keep holding your calls. Sucks!
I don't eat at this Subway anymore after my mom, dad, friend, and I all got sick twice after eating the sandwiches from here. Girl working here messed up the order 3 times on one sandwich and messed up another one. They really need to start training their employees better here and maybe not leave the lettuce, tomatoes, etc sitting out on a counter all day.
None
the owner is ok if he is there the rest of the wokers will treat you badly if you go in to browse and not buy
After I went there (needing crowns) and the work on my teeth started I was told that the doctor working on my teeth was leaving/retiring thou will be in occasionally to work.... 30-60 days after the work was finished and over $4000 spent, there was a problem with one of the crowns retaining food ... went back, now Dr Bowles is at the helm and the other doctor gone I was told it will be another $1200 to redo that crown .... the worst thing was that Dr Bowles charged me $70 to examine what his gone partner did, and to give me the $1200 estimate to redo his partners work ... the way it was handled is one of the poorest customer service/satisfaction I ever encountered. In a nut shell "Money Hungry, it is all about money"
I love Applebee's, and there was a time where I liked this particular Applebee's. Unfortunately that time has passed. It would appear that management has changed in the last year or so, as the service has fallen considerably. Where I was used to prompt and continuous service, I can now expect my waiter(waitress) to completely vanish once my food has been served. A fact that is magnified by cold food being served my last couple of visits. On my last visit, my waitress completely disappeared (I have no idea where to) and I had to wait 45 minutes for a check AFTER I had finished eating. Other customers might have left without paying, but I did my best to give the place a chance. I will not be returning any time soon.
None
There was one customer eating when I went here. The two employees talked to each other the entire time they were taking my order and making my food. The "enchilada" was just meat in a tortilla that they drizzled sauce over and handed to me. The price would be okay if the food was close to decent . Don't waste your money.
Its gokul street 1,but not showing in Google map
I have typically had good experiences with Enterprise, but this was by far the least professional branch I've been to. We arrived 30 minutes after our reserved time and they had rented out our car! The only other available vehicle was in a different class, which they insisted on charging us more to rent though we were still within our grace period. Though the agent who ended up helping us was friendly, the other was downright rude and kept us waiting 10 minutes without so much as an "one moment, folks." When we did finally get the car, it smelled of cigarettes and had obviously not been cleaned since its last rental. They charged us $7/day for an additional driver (I didn't know ANYONE still did that) and never let us know. We got a total for our estimated bill, but didn't see an itemized receipt until after we'd returned the car, at which point I recognized the charge. Needless to say, we will not be returning to THAT branch and possible will not use Enterprise again in the future.
I was on the board of our home owners association. We have a small board of volunteer members, and a small assocation that is run fairly smoothly. Some of the administrative items can seem confusing when we lack specific skills or knowledge. We thought it would be helpful to have an outside management company help us. We hired Association Services. These guys wereTERRRIBLE!!! We asked how much we would spend each month. They said $400-$600 on the highest. Our first bill from them was $1600 and the next month was $1700 and the next was $1100. We were all sick.We spoke with them about the bill and why it was so high and what we could do differently to lower the bill. They said the initial "Set up cost". They never said a word about set up costs when we signed up with them. They were quickly depleting our reserves that we work hard to save up, and they did not do anything for us! We could not leave soon enough. They are deceptive in their pracitice. What was worse than the expensive fees they charged, is they were inaccurate in quoting payoffs. We had a home in our association that owed $965 in back dues. Association Services quote $0, but collected a transfer fee of $150. We lost those dues. They provided us no help. They are only about FEES, FEES, FEES. Their business ethics are poor, and I would NEVER reccomend them to anyone. Please do not get dupped by them like we were! Find someone else or you better off muddling through it yourself than using this company.
I fractured my foot (as determined by urgent care facility). When insurance told me that I needed a referral from my primary care before I could see an orthopedic I called and asked for a referral. I was told that they would not write a referral without seeing me first. I asked to speak to him and they refused to let me speak to him on the phone. When I asked to speak to the office manager she told me that it was no big deal that my foot was fractured. I am disgusted with the service that this facility provides and will be contacting my insurance company to change my primary care as soon as possible.
1) Food very poor quality both in terms of Hygiene and taste. 2) Not much options for games. 3) Service - pathetic. - grieved corporate customer
Took nearly 45 minutes from the time we (party of 5) ordered till we were served. They were not that busy, maybe half the tables occupied. Our server was a courteous man, and the meal was OK, but wont be back anytime soon. They don't validate.
Nick And Disney Are WAY Better. Cartoon Network Just Went DOWN hill. Ay, So Did Nick
We sat in a booth where the wall was only partially painted (classy). Waitress brought me pecan pancakes instead of oatmeal pancakes as I ordered and then tried to tell me they were oatmeal. They were undercooked as well. My wife ordered potato pancakes that were thick heavy, soggy and over seasoned. We were overcharged on the bill at which time they said that we saw the price on an outdated menu that they had on the counter. Lots better places to eat in Elmhurst.
AVOID This place like the plague... if you move in here the plague is just what you might get!
hola paraguaya..hay que ver que de gustos los colores...como paraguayo...me decepciona..aunque la libre eleccion esta presente y se respeta..pero bueno.mucha suerte..mis cordiales y respetuosos saludos.
This is the worst BBQ joint in Jacksonville! If there were only Sonny's and Cotton's in town, I would eat at Sonny's! The ribs are fatty and the "sauce" is like water! And it's bad when the decor is worse than Jenkins.
The lowest quality I can pick on Google is "Poor-Fair" however, I would rated it "Extremely Poor" if that option was presented to me. Their drywaller is extremely unprofessional and does not provide good quality work. I recently had them install dry-wall on the garage ceiling and it was uneven, poorly cut with large gaps in between drywalls and gaps between drywall and side walls, overlapping drywalls on a flat surface, and screws attached to nothing. Also they have poor house keeping, I found over 20 loss screws on my garage floor just ready to puncture my tires, no cleaning was done. The worst part is when I called to complain, they blamed me for their poor quality and that the garage was bad. Some of the worst customer service I have ever experienced with any company.
this is my personal experience thet Fortis is one of the best hospital at the starting years 2003-04 but now it is a worst and it became a commercial business institute who's aim is to get money, there is no value of Human life the management only worries about MONEY Only.
None
Let me say you have officially lost a renter for life at this location. Terrible service, non satisfying environment by your staff. I remind you of our last stay at Duck Inn Lodge as worse ever. You all offered a free night stay certificate which I tried to use today to book again. As figured you all plan to raise price on cabin which means its not a free night afterall. You say it must be at regular price... Hows that when you never rent any cabin at so called regular price. Longs as I can remember this site has always listed at 15% off so why would raise price because I'm using a certificate due to previous poor stay. That's real customer service. I think not! Look up my history between these 2 offices in Gatlinburg and you will see you have lost a great guest and the family members that always come with us. It's all about repeat business. There is plenty of places to stay besides just you not sure why I always choose USA?
Slow service. Charges extra for things that are not normally charged for. Mediocre food. I was served honey mustard with a taco sampler.
Czekałem na towar miesiąć. Wymieniłem wiele maila, próbowałem bezskutecznie się dodzwonić...
Service is crap From time to time and they allways get my order wrong and stand around talking to each other
This restaurant, despite having a notice on their website that they deliver within a 2.5 mile radius, refused to deliver to us even though we are 1.8 miles away. I am suspicious that they are discriminating against my neighborhood and have reported them to the Better Business Bureau.
I was a transfer student from another local school and because of that I had the lowest priority for registration. There were two times for the class I needed to finish my series and because of my priority, the class was already filled with 4 people on the wait list for both listings before I even had the chance to sign up. The staff only redirects you to another department and never seem that happy to help. Websites confusing and parking is always ridiculous in the morning. The campus is nice as well as a majority of the student body, however I would definitely need a while to think of another positive thing to say about the school.
Really? Parking sucks!!!
I called in an order got home to find it completely wrong. Called them about it and I was going to have to pick up the correct order instead of them delivering!
None
Vintage Inns look nice but today they kind of took the mick. The Service was ok and Staff friendly but putting the Kids meal upto £6.95 and finding it impossible to have lunch for three for much under £35 is far too much for a basic pub lunch no matter how many adjectives they use for the descriptions of their standard pub fayre. We were served up stale bread with the soup which one member of staff explained (albiet I think she believed it) that is Ciabatta and it was like that.....Nope Ciabatta stale is still stale. Expensive for a very basic offering!
I've found my experience at Mr. Mike's to be the worst restaurant experience I've ever had. When I got there for a 6:30pm reservation, it wasn't busy but it still took 10 minutes for someone to finally come and seat us. The woman who seated us was pretty rude and unapologetic of the wait. Our waitress didn't take long to hand us menus and take our drink order. Our drinks were brought pretty quickly (best part of the experience). I had ordered a Long-Island iced tea which was very watered down. Probably the worst Long-Island iced tea I've had. When she brought our drinks, our waitress didn't ask us if we were ready to order, instead she turned to the table beside us, and asked the couple who got there 15 minutes after us if they were ready to order. Once she brought the couple their food, she finally took our order. We ordered tiger shrimp stuffed mushrooms, which is claimed to be a favourite on the menu but is actually disgusting. We also ordered two New York striploin steaks medium rare. We were brought the wrong food twice and when our food finally came, she waitress forgot our appetizer. It was finally brought to us (after we had to ask again) once we were almost done our meal. My steak was basically still breathing and for the price you pay, you're not getting much. Our entree was about $25 but should've been lower priced. It came with a few string beans and carrots and two onion rings and a steak. The waitress was unapologetic about the lateness of our appetizer. I was pretty upset that a couple who got there 15 minutes after us had their order taken and was served before us. I wouldn't recommend this place at all, save your money. It's not worth it.
I first started going to Midas because I had bought a coupon book. My brothers warned me not to, but I actually thought they did a great job. However after my recent exeperience I will not go back. I took my car there for Saftey and Emissions after another place I didn't trust failed me for brakes and window tinting. Midas also failed me for my window tinting. I had my windows checked by 2 different places that said I was within range (43% is the limit with a 3% variance, I was 40%). I tried to call Midas and ask them to retest it, told them what it said on UTAH.GOV. John on the phone was completely rude to me, said he remembered my car and they failed me and there was nothing he could do. I ended up going to the DPS to have them test it, they gave me an okay. I go back to Midas, after 15 minutes of push back... they realize they were inputting the tint numbers into my windshield (illegal to tint). So after wasting a week and half of my time, and being down right rude, all they had to say was "That's our bad." AND- Pretty sure they didn't even look at my brakes since they passed them saying I "obviously got them done." Nope, I didn't touch my brakes. Terrible customer service, and a waste of time/money.
Where to begin...SO MUCH was wrong! I forgot to post my review after we ate there because I was just steaming from the awful food and service. The best part of my evening was the Toad Hollow glass of wine that I got. Instead of going back to keep enjoying the wine I went to Friar Tuck's and bought my own bottles. We were seated immediately as we walked in, which was nice. The hostess was pleasant. We had the Groupon and that was the FIRST thing that was asked of us from the waiter. He immediately told us some things were not available on the menu. We were left alone for at least another 15 minutes. We finally were able to order our drinks and appetizer. We ordered the combo appetizer and after about 15 minutes our flock of seagulls loving waiter came out to tell us that the coxhina and empanadas were no longer available when the tables next to us were able to get theirs. Anyway we ordered two other appetizers in lieu of the combo. We got the shrimp and beef tips - cannot remember the names and the website is no longer available (go figure!). The shrimp were over cooked and the garlic toasts they came out on were burnt. The beef tips were tough and drowning in a sauce. It looked like a disgusting beef stew. On to our dinners: I ordered the combo brasil and my friend ordered the seafood paella. When I think of brazilian food I think of bold and spicy flavors. This food lacked flavor and I was extremely disappointed. Two words: bland and mushy. My combo brasil consisted of frour small kebabs. One had a chicken tenderloin, the other three beef chunks (of all different sizes), the third had two pieces of shrimp and the fourth was a mushy pieces of fish. The chicken kebab was something I could make at home, but, at least it was edible. The beef tips were raw and purple! It was so disgusting. The shrimp kebab was overcooked. The fish kebab was mushy and there were bones through it. The rice was the best thing on the plate. I told my waiter that the fish had bones and the beef was raw and he gave us a free dessert, which was a surprise. The seafood paella made my friend want to kill himself. He was that disappointed. As the night went on our service got worse. We were not rude to the waiters either. I know not everything is their fault. I thought that when you have a Groupon the idea is to get customers in your restaurant and to keep them coming back. This restaurant is backwards; we were not the only disappointed table. They should just shut down. Horrible. I would never return. DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY!
es una verguenza y una corrupcion todo el sistema tiketek , no puede ser que somos cinco personas tratando de comunicarnos al 53550867 y tambien tratando online desde las 10:00hs hasta ahora que son las 20:00hs y no nos pudimos comunicar, mientras que en mercado libre a las 10:05 ya tenian entradas y podias eleguir las que quieras. la verdad es la primera ves que iba a usar sus servios y no pude . atte. vayance a la re puta madre que los pario.
Out of bussness for a reason
I paid over the odds for next day delivery from Amazon and then waited in next day…All damn day. I don’t know about you but I find that really, really annoying and makes my blood boil. What a waste of a whole day. It really gets my goat when you call HDML at Mitcham at 1800 hours after you’ve been in, since you got up that morning waiting for the delivery, that you paid extra for and they tell you a delivery was attempted at 1400, but you were out? I said to the woman, why would I pay the extra fee to have next day delivery and then go out? It doesn’t make sense. Also, as a previous reviewer has stated here, once they’ve got your number in their system, they won’t pick up. I can confirm her suspicions are true. All you can do is call and call and call and nothing happens. But the moment you call from another number, they pick up and speak to you. Another worrying aspect of this rinky-dink HDML outfit is that when being jerked around by a deceitful driver, I used to be able to resort to Jessop’s or Jacobs click & collect service. But now that Amazon (and others, to be fair) have put most of the decent retailers out of business, we’re completely at the mercy of totally useless, rinky-dink outfits like HDML who don't give a hoot for their or any anybody else's customers. If this is an indication of how trends are changing regarding our purchasing preferences, and now that the decent bricks and mortar retailers are failing all around us, we’ve now found ourselves completely at the mercy of the delivery companies who treat us with complete and utter indifference and don’t give a damn if we’ve paid extra for one day delivery or not. Amazon’s locker system was my first choice, only to be told my parcel was too big and that I would need an alternative delivery system. They’re not wrong with that suggestion, are they?
Organizacia je uplna katastrofa. S parkovanim problem, s bufetom problem, Odvoz odpadkov zo stankov problem, cela Incheba je jeden velky problem. A preco tam zamestnavaju tu bacharku na vstupe aut do arealu? To je uplna krava.
I would not recommend this complex to anybody, even if I had a sincere hatred towards that individual. I had the absolute worst experience living here. First, and foremost, the facilities weren't up to par. Please don't let their website fool you. There is only one floor of the entire building (16 floors) that has actually been remodeled. I was lucky enough to have been placed in an updated complex, some of my other friends were not. However, the management may have been the worst part of my experience. Connie, the front desk "administrator" may have been the most cantankerous, foul, and disingenuous individual I have ever encountered in my professional career. The beginning of my experience began with me arriving to the complex at 2:30 AM from a days worth of travelling, only to find that my garage door opener was not left for me in the lock box. After parking on the street and bringing my luggage into the complex, I found that the key that Connie left me was to somebody else's room as I walked in on them as they were asleep! When I asked for a garage/rent concession for the stress I encountered, she began to become impetuous, yelling and snapping her hands at me while in the front office. Throughout the remainder of the summer, similar instances occurred. In particular, I was able to find a young woman to take over the remaining month of my lease (and extend a new lease through the year) so that I was able to move back home without incurring the cost of an apartment that I would not be occupying. The woman had her application signed, deposit paid, and move in date set (all of which I can confirm). Although I had already paid the remaining rent due on the lease, Connie told me that I would be reimbursed the prorated difference from the date that the new girl was moving into the apartment. Weeks went by and I never heard from Connie. When I called, guess what she told me? The girl never moved in, and Connie never bothered to let me know! I could have had another friend of mine move into the complex during this time to ride out the remainder of my lease. In fact, Connie was unwilling to pass along the girl's deposit to me in order to help me cover the cost I had already incurred in paying for the rent. Summary: Park Place MADE money off of me trying to find them a new resident to take over my lease. Multiple occasions I asked Connie if I could speak to her superiors to discuss the number of issues I was having. She simply responded "I am the superior" and was unwilling to release to me the owners contact information for the complex. Again, the management at any complex can make or break your experience in a facility. This is one complex I would never recommend to anybody. I'd look at living in the East Village or in West Des Moines. This is one place you WILL REGRET. Obviously, I took enough time out of my day to write this review, please take it into consideration before signing a lease with Park Place.
None
My boyfriend went there looking for help to fix our fridge, the guy sold him a part for $50, did not work. Then I called them and they came to "fix my fridge", they charged me a total of 190 more dollars. The refrigerator worked for one week and broke again. I called them again since they said it was guaranteed, so I thought they would not charge me again for the "trip". I ended up paying $222.00 for them to fix another part. Today I am totally upset because a month after they first fixed it, it is broken again. I think there is something shady there. Don't call this people ever, they will keep messing your fridge or whatever appliance and take your money.
None
Unprofessional and false advertisement are a few things that come to mind when I think of my time at Double P Ranch. I would like to take a few moments to discuss my experience in an abbreviated fashion. First, let me discuss the pros and believe it or not there are quite a few despite my intro into this review: Pros: - Facilities are great, by far in the top 5 hunting lodges I have ever been at. - Great amenities included (pool table, foosball, Satellite, bedding, etc). - friendly and welcoming - competitive pricing - Snow goose guide Chad was friendly and informative and worked hard to ensure we got birds - Chef Chris did an amazing job on the meals that were cooked - immediately greeted and offered lunch before we could take our shoes off. - offers many types of hunts such as pheasant, coyote, snow goose, white tail and fishing Where it all goes wrong... Cons: - The proprietor of the lodge appeared to be drunk most of the time my hunting party was there. - was offered to come out Ice fishing free of charge on the day we arrived, but all Double P Ranch Staff and "fishing guide expert" were fishing in heated enclosures while my brother, father and I were left out in sub zero weather for many hours fishing. We were offered an ability to to warm up but were never offered to fish inside the ice house. - when the Proprietor, Cyrus, was asked about the poor conditions during fishing stated that my Family and I were drunk on the ice and just not into "it" so we had a "bad time". Not true. We arrived, unpacked and went directly out on the ice. We were not drunk after a 6 hour car ride... - Staff is unfamiliar with terrain, my family and I spent over 2 hours digging and towing guides and owners vehicles out of a service road to the lake we were fishing on. - Double P Ranch and Cyrus boasted about a 3 meal chef experience. day 1 and day 2 breakfast was not offered and we ate gas station burritos before we went to the blinds. - Amazing lunches, per their website, were to be provided. I quote an example lunch from the website: "Blackened chicken Panini... with pepper jack, spinach, onions and creole mayo" it was 2 lunches of cold cuts on wonder bread or wheat bread with mayo... not what I paid for, nor was it ever mentioned on the website there would be cold cuts and wonder bread served. - Asked snow goose guide about the breakfast and lunch situation. I was told those lunches were only offered to duck and pheasant hunters. This was NEVER communicated! - My hunting party expressed an interest into coyote hunting and the guide never showed up until Sunday before we decided we had enough and packed up - Cyrus offered a evening Fish for us on Saturday since we did not do well snow goose hunting. he nor the "fishing guide expert" were willing to show us were to go because they were on their way to the strip club. In my honest opinion, I had a good time despite the situation, because when surround by friends and family in a relaxing environment anyone can have fun. But that was not what I was expecting or paying for. It burns even more since this was my last trip before I move across the country away from my family and I paid for this trip as a gift to them. Cyrus offered me and my father a free trip out fishing and another guest of mine a free pheasant hunt. This is not a good business model. If you are interested in spending 240 dollars a day to go hunt and be treated like the owners old college buddies, you will not be disappointed. If you are looking for a professional guide service and top notch experience I hope that you look elsewhere for your next hunting trip.
We purchased a living room set from Ashley’s Furniture less than 4 months ago and it has already completely fallen apart. The wooden frame and infrastructure have buckled in and are completely broken, which I guess should be expected when they are held together with nothing more than staples. The cushions have gaping holes and tears in the back of them and are completely flattened after three months. When lying on the pull out sofa bed, there is no stability and you are flung into the hole between the couch and the frame. Not to mention the sofa bed is about 2 inches thick and incredibly flimsy. I wasn’t expecting much, but I certainly was not expecting this. The Customer Service that we have experienced has been atrocious. We were told we would be contacted by a sub-contractor to come and assess the damage. After almost two weeks went by and we were not contacted, we called Customer Service again and were told that the contractor would be calling us that day. Once again, NOTHING. It was not until I told customer service that I had contacted the Better Business Bureau that the contractor was finally in contact with us. We were left a harsh voicemail message that they would be at our apartment between 9 and 12 the next day, an inconvenient time for two people who work during the day. Once calling back, we were told he would be at our apartment around 4pm. After leaving work early, to be home by 4, the contractor called us to let us know that he would be at our house by 7PM and would call a half hour before arrival. He did not arrive until 7:20PM and we were never called prior. Upon inspection he told us that our frame was completely broken due to a Manufacturer’s Defect and that he would not recommend to Ashley’s that we receive a replacement. He said that someone would come and fix the frame and we would receive new covers for our cushions. Mind you, the cushions themselves have gaping holes in them. He also said that he has seen this defect several times before. He was also not able to answer any of our questions and he said that the $100 protection policy we were hounded about when purchasing the living room set was useless and would not have protected us anymore than the Manufacturer's Limited Warranty. He also said it would take at least 3 weeks for any repairs to be made. We have been tossed around between the Customer Service Department and the actual store that we purchased the furniture from. What has happened to consumer protection in America? Both Bob’s and Raymour and Flanigan have return policies that benefit the consumer and have solved issues by the next day. No one has a solution and we are fed up. I want a complete refund for the set and I will never purchase from Ashley’s Furniture HomeStore again and I have already discouraged friends from purchasing there as well.
Their PR asked me as a client to spread a word about this company. Here it is: AVOID THAT FREAKY PLACE! Just avoid it, if you are someone who actually reads the lease. Their maintainance services are so poor that it takes 2-4 weeks for them to react to most of the basic requests. After that they try to fix everything using the screw driver and the tape only. If you warn them that something (a lock) is going to break in few weeks, they will wait until it will really happen and then they will consider an intervention. The office charged me few times without any aparent reason. After I complained, the fees were taken off. It seems to me that they hope for payments without questions. The office sometimes remains unlocked and unsupervised during the hours on weekends, so anyone can enter the space with the mail and with the personal folders of all the clients. They also leave the documents with the sensitive personal informations on their desks for hours. All that office is one huge chaos, where nobody know, what the others are doing. I'm glad to be gone.
The mall management needs to seriously revamp it and take it to the next level of attraction.
Terrible timeliness as other postings point out. Surprisingly disrespectful/condescending customer service, experienced also directly from the "service manager". Go somewhere else. The employees are really unpleasant and you'll be on the hook for hours. While I sat there 30minutes past agreed time, three customers threw a fit and left. Not sure if they read these postings...
None
Almost every time I walk into this store the staff aren't very professional. Very vague hospitality and it feels like whenever I approach the workers it is almost as if I'm being bothersome toward them. You can go in, look around, but by all means; don't interrupt them when they are about to go on their cigarette break.
I have been to Buffalo Wild Wings in Port Chester twice and have been disappointed both times. Wings are below average, not crisp and the Buffalo sauce is too thick. The wings always look like they have spent too much time under the heat lamp before they make their way out to the table. We tried the nachos today and they had hardly any toppings on the chips. When we asked Frank our waiter he apologized, took them off the bill and told us that was normal. All is all for wings, nachos and fried food you can go better and just about any pub in Westchester. If you are going to the movies next door, take a walk down Main Street in Port Chester and go to Q. You will be happy.
Used to eat here all the time... 24hr breakfasts... But the overall quality has seriously declined. Heading to Elgin Street Diner from now on.
Tạm. Khung cảnh thì được,nhưng cung cách phục vụ k tốt. Mất điểm !
I have been living at Brittania Heights for almost two and a half years now. Honestly, I love my apartment and have found the new office staff (about two years) very friendly and helpful. The maintenance and cleaning people are knowledgeable and friendly. The buildings are old and it is not a luxury community, so expect the normal, (but occasional) bad neighbor. All in all I would give everything high marks here and recommend that anyone on a budget consider renting an apartment here. I would say that IF MY APARTMENT WASN’T INFESTED WITH BEDBUGS! It took me almost three months to realize that was the problem and since then life has become a nightmare. Shawna (the property manager) is very nice, but takes an “I could care less how bad your life is” attitude, and simply suggests that I move. She will make the supreme sacrifice and break my lease for me! If you know anything about bedbugs, this is not a solution..they come with you. I bought all new furniture when I moved in here and it is all ruined from being sprayed over and over with chemicals. I have been kicked out of my apartment for hours and hours while the chemicals (supposedly) lose their toxicity. I have been living out of plastic boxes for the last eight months, because I can’t keep my clothes where bugs might get into. (Apartment management suggestion). My family will not come to visit, my friends look at me strangely when I visit them..and ALWAYS ask about my “bug problem”. I have lost sleep, live in isolation, had my life completely disrupted, and my furniture ruined..and the management graciously offers to break my lease! Wow! How nice of them, right? Now they are renting apartments near mine that they KNOW to have been infested. I say “have” because they will say they have controlled them with poisons. Unfortunately, these bugs are very tenacious, and run and hide, only to come back at a later date. They actually go into the walls, into cracks that are impossible to spray, behind electrical outlet covers…read about it on the internet! So…..while I will stick by my comments about the quality of the management and the apartment complex in general…consider carefully the caviler attitude they take about providing a quality living environment. 38-12-505. uninhabitable residential premises
None
We visited T&K for repair of our used car we purchased a while back. They accommodated us on short notice. Staff was courteous. Manager is pompous and overrates his work. Obviously customers pay for the service, but you gotta do the work "complete". We found that cost is 20-25% above NTB/Discount-Tire/Firestone etc. Our car break were squeaking before we dropped our car for service. When we drove back home after repair, it was STILL same. Manager their will push you into buying more stuff out of their place rather than fixing problems at hand. Battery replacement cost insanely high and the battery brand was never heard off. Looks like some cheap option. I will never visit this place, nor recommend it !!!
Čekanje ubija :(
Jól indult, de (szó szerint) rémálom lett belőle. Annyira vékonyak voltak a falak, hogy túlzás nélkül mondhatom: hallottuk, ahogy a szomszéd pukizgat. Nem vicc. Az ágy, pontosabban a matrac tragikus volt. Hátamba és a bordáimba álló rugókkal aludni nem könnyű, miközben hallani a szomszéd minden rezdülését. Hazajöttünk és kipihentük a pihenést. :( A kaja sem volt meggyőző. Egyrészt az épületekbe mindenhova beszivárgott a zsírszag, ezt az épületek alatt és között futó "katakombák" szállítják mindenhova, hiszen itt a föld alatt van a konyha. A szagon kívül más is kijött a konyhából. Sajnos. Első nap az egyik étel fokhagymás sült, a másik mustáros sült, harmadik pedig gyümölcsös tejberizs. Ugyanazon estén a vacsora egyik étele: mustáros és fokhagymás vegyessült. Khm. Na jó ezt még benyeltük. Másik étel: marhapörkölt. Harmadik étel pacalt pörkölt + vegetáriánusoknak gyümölcsös tejberizs. Igen, a megmaradt ebédet újra kell hasznosítani. Másnap délben persze megint pörkölt, na meg gulyás. Vicc. Ha nem arról volt szó, hogy kirakták elénk a maradékot, akkor viszont a szakács amatőr, mert így összerakni két napos menüt vicc.
I don't recommend this salon...It took me 3 separate trial runs for my wedding updue. The first time I went, Liza was unable to braid my hair and I left with no idea how my hair would look on my wedding day. The second time I went, she pawned me off on one of her new hairstylists (even though my apt. was with Liza and I drove over an hour to see her). The hour I was there, the stylist was unable to put my hair up. The last time I went (a week before my wedding) we finally figured it out, and I did love the final result. She quoted me a certain price prior to my booking and on the day of my wedding said she would not honor it because after all I did have 3 trial updues. She refused to give me a receipt, which I called over 4 times for in the course of 6 months, she claimed her computer crashed. In my opinion, the whole situation was unprofessional.
Not a big fan of these 'converted' super sports.. But it's the closest to work.... The one at the market place on jamboree or the one in Laguna nigel are much better
Slow service, food not great and requires a mortgage! What else needs to be said. No one should call in here...... ever.!
I had purchased many things there one of them being packaged Chourico sausage. It was absolutly terrible. I called asking if I could return the package and the Chef answered the phone after speaking with a young lady. He said "whats wrong with it?" I said "I simply did not like the taste". He said "well its packaged, sorry nothing we can do!" I said "really?? You do not stand behind your products?" I spent over $30 this weekend there, I wanted to simply return a $5 and change product that I found sub-par. They do not stand behind there products, I asked him this over and over again and he said "If its made here, we would be able to do something about it but its packaged so sorry". I repeated back that Venda does not stand behind all of their products several times and he said not if it packaged. He was very arrogant. He is so disconnected from the customer service aspect of the food business its not even funny. I would not reccommend this place whatsoever.
This low life should sue God for making him a grade A scum bag! Don't worry everyone, he is just trying to help solve the school safety problem by suing for $100 million. Thanks for going to bat for the safety of our children by exploiting a horrifying tragedy you self-righteous predator.
Staff rude, food was horrible if they were located in an area that had competition they would be out of business!
I found the billing system and reading the bill very confusing and. 1. just to start reading the bill on E-bill is not easy to find. They made it so complicated that you have to know the size of the paper in order to be able to find your bill. 2. "Account status Year to Date" section is completely confusing. It is not clear how much deposite I have with Veridian. How much is my balance for charges and so. There are some "-" that I do not understand what is all about. 3. The graph on the time of use reflects the American calendar rather than the Canadian Calender. For Example on July 1st, it is a Canadian holiday. You would see the On Peak usage rather than Off-peak that it should be. please correct them. Regards, Najib
Got 1,000 miles out of an Audi A8 before the main fuel pump went out. Car shut down. Would not start. Dropped it off and waited a week for a call back. I had to pay another $700 at the Audi dealer to fix it. They definitely are not mechanics. Customer service is suspect. The local Audi dealer laughed quoting, "see stuff like this all the time from them, always trying to put out a fire..." If you are inclined to purchase from them, drive straight to another dealership or import mechanic. Hook the car up to diagnosis machine and get a read out. AutoZone may even do it. My car had a cheap battery put in it, that could not handle the power requirements of the car. Again, they are not mechanics. 80% of the cars are polished terds.
No paper towel dispensers by the sink which means that if a slob leaves water all over the sink - you get to see it. Talked to the manager and they don't want to spend the money in that. Maybe we could take up a collection for you.....
A funny thing happened to me... Fred was unable to find time to TALK to me, unless it was billable. NO FREE TALKING. He had done quite a bit of expensive [implants] work for me...all paid for immediately. Dental work is spendy...shocking eh...after a pause of a few years I wanted to talk with him about the remaining work and costs. His arrogant, and luving it, manager educated me on best business practices and assured me that talking to Fred was best done in a chair with the meter running. Fred fooled me, I thought I was working with a nice guy. Who knows, maybe I'm a problem client and didn't know it. The bottom line is that the manager assured me that she told Fred I wished to speak with him, and he never found the time to speak with me. Instead I was treated to a double dose of the office manager and her charm. I've been self employed all my life..I'm 55...I've owned much larger and more expensive operations than Fred's office...I was able to talk to clients free of charge. Why 2 stars and not 1? Like I said, maybe its me...but I don't think so. Mike Webb
I called Uncle Bob's to get pricing for a storage unit and spoke with Patricia. She was very abrupt and not very helpful. After 3 frustrating attempts at asking her a question and hearing her rude attitude, I ended the call. I will not be renting from them at this point. I should have read the other review here!!!
Didn't receive prompt service... Funny how I go in by myself and have to search for a salesperson as they're all talking amongst each other, yet a week later I came in with my fiance and couldn't walk 10 feet without stopped and asked how we could be helped. Anyways, found a couple bedrooms sets I was interested in and finally settled on one as it had a deal going on. I knew the furniture wasn't great quality by any means( savon isn't known for quality but realistic prices), so we head down to start the payment. Well being alone they wouldn't consider my fiancee income so I didn't make enough to be approved for their no interest plan. (6 piece bedroom set and 1 ottoman came to $1,100) so they had me talk to another person who had me fill out an application to be assessed by some outside company. Said I was approved for that, anyone would be. The plan was ridiculous. The interest was so outrageous over the course of 2 years( the minimum allowed) I would end up paying over $3,000. Should've known then and there. But we desperately needed furniture. Then I was told there was a problem, my furniture would take 2 weeks until I would receive it... Here I am 18 days later and I receive a letter from the financing company saying I was denied and I am unable to receive my furniture... AFTER I have already paid $350 down. Hoping I can get my $350 back without problem, but I guess we will find out tomorrow. One thing I am sure of is the fact that I will never return to this store for anything. You may as well just save the extra $300+ to get a better quality furniture at another store and save yourself the trouble.
Great selection, great location, and truly a shame the service is so lousy. I decided to go in and check out the wares. A salesman walked by and asked if I needed help...funny thing is that I responded by complimenting what the store had (it really is a nice layout), and the response was 'do you want to buy something or not?'. Heh...nope :-) I'm betting if you get on someone's good side initially, you're fine here; if you don't fit the mold (still working on what that may be), you're treated like dirt. I like to have a decent relationship with a brick/mortar establishment, and this place is just too inconsistent (esp. based on the other reviews) to risk blowing my cash.
2,000 invitations mailed late and delivered the day of the event. Was lied to about the mailing date. No apology. No response to request for 50% refund. I ordered printing and mailing of 2,000 postcard invitations to a Denver business meeting from the UPS online printing website. This store was somehow selected to do the work. At first I was told that the cards would be mailed on Thursday, the 17th, one week prior to the event, plenty of time to get there 2 to 3 days ahead. I included my name and address on the list so I would know when the cards were delivered. When I didn't get a card on Monday, the 21st, I emailed Justin and asked when the cards were mailed. He responded, "They went out on Friday. Have a great day!" Well, I didn't get my card until Thursday, the 24th, the day of the event, which started at 11:00. Then we started getting calls from customers complaining that they didn't get the invitation until the day of the event, too late to attend. I emailed Justin again asking for confirmation of the mailing date. I got back the confirmation which showed they were mailed on Monday, the 21st, three days later than I was originally told and two days later than they said they were. The Postal Service did their job and got the First Class cards there in three days, but because they were mailed three days late customers didn't get them in time. Attendance at the event suffered, as you can imagine. I asked the store for a 50% refund of my bill, thinking that was more than fair, and got no response. I understand printing delays, but I was never notified of the delay, lied to about the mailing date, and ignored when I complained.
My friend and I went to Pho Van Van after work. It was a Thursday at about 4 PM. We mentioned to the waiter that we were going to have a few beers then eat later. He brought us our beers, then seemed to forget about us. The first couple of times, it was easy to get his attention, then he just disappeared. We were able to get the attention of different waitstaff at different times through the night, but they were very inattentive. I had the curry chicken fried rice, which was excellent. If the waitstaff had been professional, this would have been a great place. Beers were 4.25 for domestic and 5.25 for imports. The curry chicken fried rice was 8.25.
literally called the place like 20 times and no one answered and if they did they would hang up this truly is the worst post office ever
I wouldn't do business there at all if I were you. All the managers will do is back you into a corner and will hound you. I noticed when i got my new chrysler that the sticker price went up significantly from 27k to around 32k. Five grand is a lot of money and not something you can just throw away. I traded in my Eclipse towards this and its been over a month and im still getting notices from the bank saying i havent paid for the eclipse. They will make you continue paying for your old vehicle and your new one. You will not get to the payment you want and you will be treated like dirt while you are there. Stay clear of this place at all costs!
Terrible Pizza!!! No I dont own a pizzeria.
Allways out of order,aTm bandh chhe.
I brought in my 2009 Sienna mini van which i purchased new for a tapping in the engine to be serviced. Van has always been serviced and used synthetic oil. The van was still under the manufacturer's warranty. I was told it was normal and sent home. Later that day a valve let loose and damages internal components to the engine. They repaired it in a couple of weeks and was given the van back. Now has a louder tapping in the engine and had no power. Returned the vehicle that day and was told it was ok and sent home. (my wife was picking up the vehicle each time not myself) Vehicle dropped a valve again and left my family on the side of the road. Somehow they fixed it again in a couple of days and was sent home. Engine was loud and did not run right we returned and was told to go home. Engine blew about 2 weeks later. This is the real kicker. I did everything according to the warranty rules. Opened a case with toyota manufacturing and was told they have no power just the actual dealer. The dealer's solution was to put a USED engine from the junkyard in it. Remember i bought the van new and was still under the original warranty. We were forced into putting the used engine in no other options were on the table. They gave us an extended warranty for the used engine. SO BEWARE of ROUTE 44 TOYOTA! Spoke with another toyota dealer and they were frank and told us we were getting screwed. They actually helped us a lot in trying to get a new engine for the van. I WILL NEVER EVER go there again. Don't go. Almost forgot. when my wife was in the service department the sales men were stalking my wife to buy a new van to avoid having this lemon of a van. My wife was in there so much and pressured her she broke down and cried for him to leave her alone. The manager was told and he was not allowed to speak to her again. So if you want high pressure go to them.
Ate there at lunch today, the food tasted good and the waitress, Liz, was great. Problem was that 4 hours later, I was sicker than a dog. I hope the kitchen there is clean and this was just a one-off sort of thing,
Nice service, but the food was terrible. Maybe it was just my order, but the pork sliders were 100% fat and you only get two for $15. Not worth it at all. Happy hour beer is a good deal. Food was still full price.
The women's locker room is barely ever cleaned and stinks so bad every time I am in there. I don't think the sinks ever get cleaned and they are all stopped up. One electric outlet comes all the way out of the wall when you try to pull your dryer chord out. Primarily I can't stand smell and filth of locker room. No complaints about gym otherwise.
Hands down the WORST buffet we have ever experienced!!! Cold, greasy, stale and reheated. All meat dishes so tough we couldn't chew them! Beef and Brocolli had rancid beef in it and I was suffering from severe gastrointestinal distress within 10 minutes of leaving the restaurant. When we expressed our lack of satisfaction in the meal, our server looked around, said "My manager not here" and that was the end of it. We will be telling everyone we know to avoid this cesspool like the plague!!!!!
I agree with the previous reviews in all aspect, the mean little man behind the counter was rude to his costumers as I was waiting to get service, when It was my turn he asked me how was the weather up there, I mean I'm 6.7 feet tall BUT that does NOT warrant such jokes, especially from a dwarf, last year (2011) I had a flat and well I needed the bike fixed right away. that was does only because I insisted and payed more than normal - the owners are abusing their mechanics- and they are really good except they're overworked and under-payed- and this year when I thought to bring the bike for a tune up, I was told to leave my bicycle for 5 days. So avoid this store and if you must go then arm yourself with resolve because you will be verbally abused.
If you like stale, precooked cakes delivered slowly by surly staff, by all means, this is your place.We ordered a birthday cake ten days in advance. It was NOT ready when we went to pick it up, so we got to watch them prepare it ... pre-made cake, canned frosting and amateurish assembly .. truly a triple threat for a bakery.They assured us it was, despite all appearances, fresh. It was not. It was dry, mealy and almost inedible. It was an embarassment to serve to my son.If there were a rating below "poor", I would choose it.
If I could give this place a less than poor review, I would. My friend suggested this place today and I agreed not knowing anything about it. I had my daughter and granddaughter with me. There is absolutely nothing on the menu for children - which is fine. She is very young toddler and can share any of our plates. The food choices are limited at best and certainly not anything that would be appetizing to a toddler. The portions are extremely small - which is fine; Americans overeat anyway. However, I expect the pricing to be in line with the portion size. My "caramelized" pear salad had 1/4 of a pear sliced up and they were canned pairs with sugar on them. There was about 1/3 cup of greens, 1 piece of a pine nut and about 1 tablespoon of blue cheese. The butternut squash soup was the most tasteless and bland soup I've ever tried - absolutely no flavor. I'm a very good cook, so I expect a restaurant to be at least ALMOST as good as what I can make at home! We ate outside because the inside of the old house was absolutely sub zero temperatures. We got our food after about a 30 minute wait (for 2 sandwiches and a salad). Then we had to go in ourselves twice to get silverware and a side dish to share our food with our toddler. Two different servers were asked for items and neither followed through. The place was NOT busy. When I paid the bill, they charged me $2.25 for the toddler's drink and it was a regular sized glass, but filled only 1/4 of the way. They charged .75 for a slice of motz cheese on my daughter's sandwich, but didn't take any money off for the hummus that she asked to them to leave off. Really? Just substitute one for the other in the name of good customer service. Don't get me started on the customer service. When I got my bill for $58 for 2 sandwiches and a salad/soup combo, I mentioned to the cashier (also my server) that it was very high priced for lunch for 3 people. She said that I was paying for quality. I looked closer at the ticket and realized she had given me someone else's ticket, which I pointed out to her. She then argued with me that she was right and it took some skills to convince her that between the 3 of us (and an unfed toddler), we really only had 3 meals, not the 5 she was trying to get me to pay for. This place has terrible customer service, the food is definitely NOT high quality, it is WAY over priced and the atmosphere IS great if you want to feel like you are at your grandma's house. Subway does a better job than this place! What a complete rip off. If the owner had a conscience, he/she would look at the reviews on this website and either make some adjustments or close the place altogether and stop ripping off the unsuspecting public. I think I'll stick with the restaurants in Sugar House where I live where you'll find fair prices, good food and lots of selection for all kinds of dietary needs. This Food for Thought place could take a lesson from The Blue Plate Diner, Shanghai, or even someplace as simple as The Tea Grotto. OK, enough said. I hate this place and will never go back and hope you don't either!
Какой то негодяй всегда ставит машину на тротуаре...мешает прохожим!!!!!
This place sucks. Nothing ever works. Only place in the area with the card reader, and it never works. Went today. First stall wouldn't take my card info. Tried two cards. Moved to another stall, started the sprayer on wheel cleaner, nothing but air came out. The drive through hasn't worked in forever. Wish someone would fix it up. Could be a nice place.
Seating wasn't a problem in the restaurant, because nobody was dining there on a Sunday night. The prices of their specials will bring you in, but the dinner entrées that you will want are double the price. I agree with others that it took awhile to get drinks, let alone a refill. I will admit that my dinner was good, but my fiancé's meal was bland. All in all, an okay first impression.
Don't bother. The food is boring, bland, overpriced and tasteless.
None
Didn't fix it! I am giving them two stars because their staff is extremely friendly and polite, albeit lacking a bit in communication. We ended up having to call them about four times to find out any news on our car, and then in the end, it wasn't really fixed. It seemed really busy every time we went in or called, and we think that maybe they weren't able to give the amount of attention needed to find the problem. Overall, we probably won't go back there for maintenance.
Prime Autos has now moved to Marooka. They have the worst customer service, my car was with them for over a month and not once did they contact us, we had to chase them everytime and always got the 'I dont know anything' response from the salesmen. Finally they said we could pick the car up. Got there and it wouldnt go into gear. The gear linkage had fallen off. I told them to keep it and fix it but this time you can bring it to me and was told that it depends on staff availability. Worst customer service I have ever seen and going by the car I bought off them I would not trust them with any purchase.
this " doctor " <HA> took my son away from me in 1997 and gave him to my ex-husband. Because a boy should be with his father, and out of a 400+ page report, one line was used against me, and believed. My ex would be violent verbally and physically throughout the whole marriage, yet because he paid the bill, she gave him custody. My son now has serious mental problems, can't work due to fibremyalgia, is depressed and suicidal, is on meds for these and others ranging from acid reflux to to schizophrenia, He is mean, foul mouthed, disrepectful to women and not a good sport. He also never got to play in team sports, and suffered with a step-mother and step-siblings. So his father spoiled him rotten to keep the peace. ** this was not in the best interest of the child and that people, I can prove - what happended to my son and his mental well being is EXACTLY as I said would happen. ** She refused to see my point of view in the divorce and have the fat balls to actually tell my mother that I am a bad mother because she is a bad mother. yea.. ok... thats why I have many other children who flock to me - of all ages, always did and will have that ability! She coached him thru all the testing, yet left me to do my own - after telling me that she helped him. She helps those who pay her bill, so yes, if you have money and want to have custody, call Dr Fatso, err.. Mueller.. She'll even feed your kids tons of candy at the un-favored parent just to watch the action... I wrote a letter to the governing body of her field, they said they couldn't help. I went to other psycologists, they were not so supportive of her decision or her clearly bias report. I highly recommend you do not hire this person, and after reading about it, share my story with others.. We can't allow these horrible practitioners to remain out there sending children to live with the wrong parent, just because they have lots of money.
The store is always a mess and the lines are always long. SUPER ghetto.
The service and food was underwhelming. I had to re-request things that I asked for. I do not plan on eating here again. If you like any quality to your Mexican food you should try another place.
Price is competitive but the customer service is very poor. Management should educate its staff to smile and treat customer with dignity...
Went this weekend to meet up with some friends. Location was packed to the point that people were waiting in line for slots. No big winners either, so their win ratio is very low. Bar was packed, restaurants were over booked. Go if you don't mind waiting and being bumped into every few minutes.
Alcuni piatti sono buoni. Evitate le cozze perchè piene di sabbia. La maggior parte delle volte non fanno lo scontrino.
1 star is too many for this place. I went there last night for a burger and a beer and had the worst restaurant experience of my life. I arrived around 5:40 and was greeted at the door by an obviously less than happy hostess. All she had to do was fake a smile for a few seconds then to one offered to show me to a table despite there being several waitresses standing around in a mostly empty restaurant. I walked over to the bar assuming that I could get some quicker service there. I sat and ordered my beer and asked for a menu. The bartender opened a tab for me, got my beer and told me about the Happy Hour specials. I had made my decision within 5 minutes and waited for the bartender to return to ask what I wanted to eat. She never came back. After finishing my beer I was asked if I wanted another and before the word No was even completely out of my mouth she walked off. For the next hour I sat there without a beer or food in front of me. Another bartender eventually did ask me if I wanted something to drink I said no I was trying to close my tab. After another 10 minute wait she got back to me with my check. She gave me my check and asked if I only got 1 beer. I replied that I had been waiting for almost an hour and half for someone to take my food order and she asked me if I still wanted to order. No I wasn't willing to wait for food, and I left. If they didn't have my Credit Card info I would have left long before.
None
Had a bad experience waited 30 min to get my food and after that my whole order was wrong and they didn't even apologize
The address was wrongly marked. The building at the location had a house number if 506and was an internet cafe.
About two weeks ago I cashed in my free 30 minute massage - compliments of Golds gym - and I have to say, it wasn't worth the time. Being free I anticipated a service to be subpar, which it was, but I didn't expect the atmosphere to be as poor as it was. So poor in fact I posted a picture to instagram before the massage even started, with the label " looks like the set from American Horror Story." Aside from this, my masseuse was not happy about being there. It was 25 minutes from the time I walked in the room before undressing, to the time I left, fully clothed. There was also a small problem with the amount of lotion supply she had available to her. She stopped multiple times to unscrew the lotion bottle to scrap for more or hit the bottle against her hand. This might not be her fault if they were short a bottle or two but it was distracting. I can not comment on any other service. The young women working at the counter was very friendly and the rest of the salon was very tidy and well managed. I would go back to try a different service but I wouldn't pay for a massage with the room being how it was.
Zeer vriendelijk bediening maar het feit een roze gekookte steak te krijgen ipv een gebakken steak was een duidelijk afknapper ..
I was waiting for my wash to complete and tired of hearing the BET on the moth tube and went out for water. I returned just a few minutes following to see a skank blonde tattooed woman removing my clothes with the attendant . When I got home I was missing quite a few shirts and socks. The place was a dump. There is little room to sit and if you walk out for a moment you may find less items than you went in with . I'd find another place or purchase a washer dryer
I called before I went to confirm they had the specific tire and size I wanted, I drove over 30 minutes to get to them. When I got there, magically they didn't have that size, so they had to put on a different size for me. In addition, they scratched my rim doing it. Heres the kicker, when I get home, THEY FORGOT TO PUT MY PULLEY BACK ON. Thats right, I called them and it was "Sorry man". So yep, two hours total drive for this. When I finally did come back, the guy who actually works on the tires (I was speaking with the sales associate) was very apologetic and gave me a 20 dollar gift card. He also was nice enough to show me how to put the pulley back on if I ever have an issue. He's the only reason I'd even consider coming back.
Taksi durağının numarası yazmıyor
Fui muito bem atendido na locação, porém tive uma dor de cabeça enorme na devolução do carro, um pequeno acidente me causou um transtorno do tamanho de uma catástrofe. Não informam as prerrogativas do contrato, voce pensa que está pagando o seguro, porém ele não existe. Porisso não recomendo.
The service was pretty quick. They went through a pretty exhaustive list of things that I should have done while there. This is an older car so I was not surprised but I was in a hurry and declined the many suggestions. Shortly after this service I noticed that I was leaving oil spots on my newly resurfaced driveway. On climbing under the car I found several of the bolts on the oil pan were loose and one was completely missing. Perhaps a coincidence, but it seems that with all of the other 'observations' they made, they should have seen the missing bolt. A habit of just running a finger around the pan or a quick visual would leave the impression of looking out for not only their interests but also _genuinely_ for mine. A quick mention or note on the paper work "We checked the bolts on your oil pan and found that they were tight." Or 'they were a bit loose so we snugged them up" etc. Regardless, I don't think I will be going back there.
Beware: the business is in a mobile home, a dirty mobile home. We left within 5 minutes, because the floors were filthy, they were not going to be able to provide all the services promised (hot tub, something about the Health Department), and there was no charm whatsoever. I can't believe they are still open.
Before our first visit, we let Cam know our out-of-pocket limit, trade-in (excellent condition), and what we had in mind for a used vehicle purchase. We made it a point to be very clear about what we were looking to purchase, but kept getting the response, "oh you'll never find anything like that (in your price range)." Cam was not an easy person to talk to over the phone because constantly interrupting, trying to talk over you. Thankfully, on the day of our appointment, Cam was running late for our appointment- no big deal- we were happy to work with Tyler. Tyler was very kind, very patient and actually took time to listen to us... and then around the corner came good old Cam in a vehicle for us to test-drive that was $10,000 over our price range! Please, Cam, you have to learn to listen.As it turned out, no vehicles on their lot were in our price range, and we of course cannot hold that against Hendrick's. A dealership can't possibly carry enough vehicles to please every customer. A great option they provide (for $1/mile) is to have vehicles shipped in from their other dealerships around the country. Tyler and Rod did their best to help us find such a vehicle. We really appreciated their patience. While searching on their computer system for other vehicles around the country within our price range, they also calculated a value for our vehicle as a trade-in. Hendrick's offered only $5500 for it, whereas Kelley Blue Book put our vehicle trade-in value at $7900.We put our vehicle on craigslist at the Kelley Blue Book private sale value of $9,000, and sold it last week for $8,500. We then bought a 2005 Toyota Sienna LE with 77,000 miles (excellent condition) for $10,900 - and NO, we absolutely did NOT buy it at Hendrick's Toyota in Merriam. Before you consider coming to Hendrick's with a trade-in, I encourage you to consider selling your vehicle on your own so you can get a fair deal (craigslist). That is what we did, and I know we saved AT LEAST $5,000. I can think of a lot of ways to spend $5,000 on my wife and children. Sorry, Ms. Cam, none of that $5,000 went toward your commission. I still don't understand why you never even attempted to put us in a vehicle that was within our budget. You have to learn to listen, young lady.
Don't use these inspectors. I am selling a house and they did the inspection. When they listed the problems with the house, they said the hall shower diverter was not functioning. I called the plumber out to fix the problem but the diverter was fine. So I paid $75 for a plumber for no reason. The kicker to the story is that the MASTER shower diverter is actually bad and they wrote the wrong room on the inspection. When I called to get them to pay the $75 I wasted on the original plumber visit, I was told by the owner "No". Why not? They made a fundamental error and they should make up for it.
Good venue and idea but bad execution. Beer is bla, service is bad and food is not good. Ordered a medium rare bison burger with caramelized onions and mushrooms. Got a well well done, raw onions, with no flavor burger. My daughter's kids cheese burger was burnt to a crisp. I don't recommend this place to anyone.
This hotel has gone downhill. I have been coming here for 34 years. Hot water is turned off in the in room spa's from 11pm to 7am daily. The massage I had was OK, but my husbands was the worst he has ever had. Massuse was rude and refused to work on his lower back. My massage was mediocre at best. Save yourself a waste of time and money by getting a massage somewhere other than this resort. Also, I had a broken foot. They would not give me a room on ground level even though I checked in early on a Thursday! They did give me great service in the electric cart taking me to and from my massage. Too bad the massage was so poor. Happy Birthday to me, not a good way to spend $400 for a massage and room!
this HEB sucks idk why they dont list the phone #'s to the store, but they will the pharmacy.. makes no sense.
Well, I'm devoted to keeping business flowing to our local firms. But, Marks' tryed to hose me after buying a gun, ammunition,and a holster here. The holster was a rip off. Afterwards at home, I surfed the holster manufacturer's site and found, much to my amazement, that I had pad TWICE the recommended mfg's retail price. TWICE! (And compared to web prices it was THREE TIMES higher.) So help me out. How would you describe and react to this news? Were they just charging what the market would bear? Had they added value well beyond the MSRP by, say, having lots of alternative holsters displayed? I think -- none of the above. I think they were taking advantage of an ignorant buyer or one that they sensed didn't care about prices. I may continue to shop there, but I will be checking internet prices while I'm in the store. They lost the chance to conduct reasonable commerce there.
over priced cold pizza
Does not take McDonald's own Instant Win coupons. :(
THe customer SERVICE is the major part of the Service industry and this Restaurant, and BAR has no Idea of CUSTOMER SERVICE!! instead its so bad that they must be sued for this, A Birthday party with friends and family and we were not met with a Waiting staff till 30 mins (this is when there were only 4-5 tables occupied) then the order came in late (very late). The table next to us were loud mouths, and were noisy and it was getting on the nerve so we politely told the head waitress about it, She rather than managing it properly, asks us to move some where calmer! and that even when we were the ones to raise the issue. Such was the appalling service that the head waitress when asked about a family table says , Sit anywhere you like. Utterly impolite and rude behaviour on her part, which is understandable as she is the staff not the business owner. But the business owner were also not good enough to contain the situation and win customers instead he was trying to suggest us that the kitchen closes at 9:30 pm and kindly give u r orders, which was equally funny as was the head waitress. SADLY in this industry, U need to win customers, below par food, below par service and below par behaviour is the HALLMARK of this place, if you want to have a good quite and peaceful time with friends and family this is not the place !! PS: Blue ginger is nearby and is a amiable service I wish if there were a half star rating i can give this place
Two issues. Don't count on them actually processing the form to automate your payments for a loan. I sent three separate forms to them, and I'm still having to manually pay them all the time. The second issue is their phone support. They have no where near the amount of people to answer calls in a timely manner. Be prepared to hear "we apologize for the delay" and "due to our heavy call volume" messages over 50 times each while waiting to talk to somebody. You may want to get a newspaper, watch a movie at your computer, or learn Japanese in the time it takes for someone to answer the phone.
The guy who runs the place doesn't like to help his customers with cancellations if needed. He sent us back through Priceline. If you're going to use Priceline to accept reservations, you should, as a business owner, know how to deal with cancellations. This guy's behavior was completely unacceptable. When he realized I was not going to back down from my request, he hung up on me. I then had to call Priceline, whose representatives were EXTREMELY helpful, and they called the guy and basically forced him to accept the cancellation. SAVE YOURSELF SOME TIME and book a room elsewhere.
I Bought a 2001 Volvo S60 from D&C back in July 2011, The buying experience was quick and easy, no issues whatsoever, My car I was buying I found on the internet and drove 350 miles to pick it up, the person I was in contact with wasn't even there when I bought it, so it made it kind of weird. I got there at the time I said I would be, and went to look at the car, it was very dirty and dusty didn't at all look like the car in the ad because it was so dirty, the inside was clean. I was in a hurry to get home for my daughters birthday so I didn't have them clean it for me. I bought the car and left and headed home. I was about 100 miles down the road and tried to roll down the window and it didn't work, then the air bag light came on.. I thought oh well its to late to do anything about it. I got home the car sat over night, we move it and ther was a puddle of oil under it, oh well I thought again its my fault. During the time of the Emails back and forth I informed them about how the 2001 s60's have a lot of issues, he told me they had all been fixed by now and it was a good car I took his word for it. We Took it in for an oil change and the filter housning was full of gunk, the tech had to air chisle it out!! At one point the steering wheel bolt came loose and the wheel almost came off. We Loved this car, we Just had to trade it in because the transmission started acting up, we put less then 6000k miles on it since the purchase. The dealership I just traded it at only gave us $1500 for it and I just paid $5500 a year ago. Now Im not saying all there cars are junk, but just make sure you check it out before you buy, that was a mistake on my part and I lost a lot of money because of this.. Would I buy from them again? Probably not...
None
I've gone here 3 times. Each time my food was made incorrectly and I needed to send it back. My food was also cold not only the first time it came out but also the second. I ordered the chicken alfredo (can't remember what it's called exactly), but it comes with veggies on it. I ordered it without veggies, and they couldn't get it right, Our waiter one time even said to me "Oh I saw your food was made wrong in the kitchen, but I didn't have time to send it back." What kind of waiter says that? Another time we waited 45 minutes just to order our food. The restaurant was not busy at all. DON'T WASTE YOUR TIME!
I am a huge Indian food fan - I went with a vegan friend to check this place out. A week after Valentines day the Valentines day decor was still up. Our waiter - who was probably a manager or owner as we saw him in back often barking at his kitchen staff - took time to go over the extremely extensive menu with us. My friend is sensitive to spicy food so he made a recommendation based on her requirements. The meal she received was too spicy for her so we asked if she could receive a replacement. Our waiter said no problem but he first wanted to taste the dish.....I said sure. He placed the dish on the neighboring table, took a forkful, looked at us and said "it's not spicy." He and I discussed, for much longer that we should have (the discussion should have never taken place) how people have different tolerances. He went back to the kitchen and quickly returned with a 'less spicy' version of the dish - which, we found, was simply more of the same dish. You may ask "why are you going to an Indian restaurant when you can't handle spice" but I think you have to agree his methodology in handling the situation was absurd. The naan was great, my butter chicken tasted tomato-y - like it was poured out of a can. I hope this place closes down again.
This gym is flash but the staff is not well and also the facility like stimulus room and sauna room they saying, but it's been a months now and still not fixed and the weekly payment is high..
Horrible experience. The ride to the airport was driven recklessly and the van must not have had any shock absorbers. I thought I'd hurt my back but it turned out to be just a momentary pain. That turned out to be the best part of the experience. We had exactly an hour's wait to get picked up on our return trip 10/14/2012, despite calling 4 times. We were told something different each time and were given a completely different excuse by the driver. The person answering the phone was rude and hung up on me when I expressed exasperation at the delay and conflicting excuses. When we were checking out of the lot, we were offered 2 free days and that was nice, but it did not make up for the one hour delay and I will never UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCE use Rocket again.
these places are VERY old. They do not keep up on maintenance and during the summer you get ants. Also, for some reason we had little black nats in the kitchen. it was gross! and of course the main office did nothing to help. They are sooo lazy, they move as if they were dead. Also, you have to pay for a laundry card $5.00 and they tell you that they will give you your money back when you move out, but they don't tell you that you have to call the # on the back of the card and try to get your money back from the company they contact the machines through. Neighbors are loud and the complex NEVER has doggie bags for people to pick up their dogs poop. Best thing we did was move out.
The security out there isnt up to par. They are over loaded with other staff's jobs also. That place needs a complete overhaul of their system of doing things. They should go back to growing their own food and raising it too. It would be alot cheaper.
So I went here for cupcakes, some gluten free, some regular. They looked like I made them myself. They tasted horrible. Actually had very little flavor at all. Guests thought icing tasted like crisco. I was so unimpressed I nearly cried at my son's birthday party when one of the moms asked how I had time to make the cupcakes. Very unimpressed for my $69 dollars worth of cupcakes (2 dozen). Walmart does a better job decorating and I could have had the glutten free made by someone closer to home at least. Will not ever go back.
Employees try to help, but corporate has them so scared of being fired, they can't do much. I'm an ex employee of Sprint, and it was same then. Sorry sir, can't help.... My hands are tied. Get a clue Sprint and empower your employees.
If you like microwaved eggs and over toasted dry bagels then this is the place for you.
This small restaurant is situated inside a kind of cave. The atmosphere is nice and the food is good but expensive. The menu is with dishes with not standard names that the waiter will explain you (once again this confirmed to be the sign of expensive restaurant). Some details are a bit dissonant in a restaurant from Tuscany: the fiorentina steak is from Argentina and the tagliata (sliced cuts of beef) from Ireland. The thick spaghetti with lard and parmesan turned out to be the poor copy of the spaghetti alla gricia served in Rome. They left the mouth a bit too greasy (sign of a not top quality lard). The telling sign were the cantucci with few almonds and raisins... The positive points came from those in the party that drunk wine: my companions were satisfied with it and staff correctly served wines in different glasses (and know well their business). -------- Menu Entree: Mixed plate of ham, cheese, bread with liver spread First Course Thick spaghetti with lard and parmesan Main Course: Pork stew with salad Dessert Cantucci (biscuits) -----------------------------------------
Not good at all. All i could taste was butter. The B&G were ok, but the bacon tasted like the fryer. I love breakfast food, and was looking forward to it. Unfortunately, I left feeling hungry and short eleven dollars. Little over priced
I was looking for authentic american/vietnamese pho. Maybe because I'm from So Cal and we have some good pho... but this place wasn't that great!
Het eten was goed, maar de bediening slecht. Vier keer drinken besteld en maar 1x werkelijk iets gekregen. Uiteindelijk stond er ook teveel drank op de rekening. Oplossing van het personeel: We hoefden alleen voor het eten te betalen. De rest werd in mindering genomen.
This school was dishonest. The owner through tantrums on campus. Jim, the owner was very crazy and difficult to work with. I would not recommend dealing with Arizona Medical Training Institute.
I went to Armando's for the 1st time after hearing very good reviews from co-workers, when I walked in there no staff in sight, I wasn't sure if I should seat myself or wait to be seated. I walked in and leaned over to see a cashier on the phone - she explained I could seat myself. The natural fruit juices were delicious, my Cuban sandwich was good, but the traditional arroz con pollo dish that my fiance had almost had a after tast of mole which is actually a Mexican dish and has nothing to do with arroz con pollo. Pretty odd! We were waited on by 2 different people and as we're waiting for our waiter to come by to get our check the bus boy is already picking up dishes from our table. We will not be returning to Armando's, the food was just okay to me, and service was definitely a deal breaker.
None
None
I am a handyman and I am always trying to get in and get out of a store without too much time wasted. I do a lot of work in the Holly Springs and Fuquay area and cringe every time that I have to go into the local Home Depot to pick up supplies. The people are generally nice, but don't have near enough knowledge to answer simple questions and I have yet to find someone that can show me the location of an item without walking me all over the store. I really wish there was some place else that I could go instead of this HD.
The TULARE dept I'd compromised I'm a (public servant deutschebeamte) Diplomatic status applies
my experience here was severely less than well. the staff wasn't friendly and they didn't know how to find some hardware specifications on my computer I was trying to pawn. the shop manager took over the investigation and for at least an hour he sat there quiet and didn't say a word about the status of his finds. so after that hour we decide to leave because we weren't getting anywhere. So I tell the shop manager that we are going to leave and that they are taking too long. He replies " Well we are sorry we couldn't help you, but you didn't tell us the specifications of this computer and we can't pawn something you don't know about." Customer service is something they obviously don't know about. if you expect way less than customer service, go to Pawn X-Change on pacific avenue.
None
If you are an actual food lover, don't go here. It is uninspired, dated, dark, and way overpriced. Those the claim to be picky about their food must not eat at fine dining establishments much. This place is not much better than a roadside diner with linen tablecloths. The decor is awful, the table settings are cheap (the sour cream came in a paper diner cup), and whole place reeks of late 70s/early 80s vintage remnants. It's just awful.
I've tried breakfast here a number of times every few months since the place opened. The service has been at best weak.. The food has been at best ok at worst awful.
None
I was in NOLA for my birthday with 6 close friends. We came to Franks to try out Muffalettas and other various fare that New Orleans is famous for. Right off the bat, Gio our waiter informed us that we could only use 2 credit cards to pay our bill. Okay fine. Our food was okay. The Bloody Marys and Hurricanes nice and strong. That's all I can honestly say that was nice about the place. When it came time to pay our bill, five of us paid with cash and two of us paid with credit cards. A week after our trip, my friend looks at her card statement and lo and behold, she's been charged with the entirety of our bill. Which means our charming waiter probably pocketed the cash and charged my friend with the bill. NOT COOL. When my friend called the restaurant to get her money back, she got the run around from the accountant and Gio. Now she has her bank fighting the $200+ charge to her card. AVOID a restaurant like this!
None
One of my favorite places to grab a bite and a coffee throughout the country is normally Panera Bread... Yet every single time I go to this one, I regret it. I have never seen such an unkempt eating establishment. From the stacks of filthy food waste bins and overburdened piles of dishware; to the sandy coffee spot; or the crumb littered tables... They never seem to clean.
None
Some of the rudest people I have ever encountered at a public restaurant.
Food is not good
Horrible! I will never go back! Staff was rude and lacked personality. The service is substandard and so very slow. There is absolutely no organization or direction whatsoever. Their BOGO special is false advertisement. Staff doesn't follow posted hours. They were supposed to be open until 7 pm, I arrived at 6:05 pm and the door was locked. A staff member was at the front counter but would not open the door, saying they closed at 6. No cheaper than other Optometry offices. Don't waste your time!
DO NOT BUY FROM THESE SCAMMERS. I was ready to buy a Ford Transit van and the manager Mike says that if there's rebates, then the customer will get them and implied how honest he is. Usually, when you hear that, the truth is quite the opposite. Sure enough an item for the interior which qualified for a full rebate, they only wanted to cover half the cost. They agreed on that , then later came out stating that I had to purchase $1200 of options before the vehicle qualifies for any rebate. Well, the fool, "Jesus" brings me the statement from Ford, which was correct except in small print on the bottom, it stated the Ford Transit did not apply, which I had to point out to him. The item did in fact qualify, but they were lying through their teeth. I was signing docs, when the next lie unfolded--the $1000 rebate he promised me, just went away, since I refused to pay Ford's absurd 6.99% rates. I could go on and on, but I wouldnt buy a bicycle from these bull****ers! Typical used car salesman tactics!
Does not exist.
Mala Atencion, aburridooooo
This store has a horrid reputation among it's workers. I graduated from college with my technical degree and applied here. It took months to simply reach a manager, even if I went there on foot several times. They would always be too busy to see me for some reason or another. They moved my interview no less than three times the first time I had applied. Then did not even let me know they hired a current employee already, when I went in. The second time I applied I had the interview moved only once, though this time I made it in. After waiting over an hour after being there perfectly on time, they asked me very few PC tech related questions, and more personal questions than anybody should have to ask. I felt like they were joking with me. One of the two managers simply kept turning red and looking away. It was horribly rude. I was told they would call me whiten two weeks to tell me if I had earned the position with Geek Squad. I ended up calling them, as I received no call. Finally after many attempts I had reached a third manager, whom told me that the spot was filled by a current employee yet again. Online the job opened a third time right after I was told this(not shocking, that the ones they hire do not last long), and despite my feelings toward the people there I kept on for I really need a job. They sent me an email saying that I was simply "denied because my qualifications were not up to standard for Geek Squad". How could this be true? As I had just done this and they were plenty fine then? Fact of the matter is, they hire their friends, and fill decent spots with people that they want regardless of skills. Probably based more on looks, than ability. People in that store hardly smiled at the Geek Squad desk and were rude to the customer that came in. When that angry at a job, I see now, why that particular store has such awful reviews when it is filled with people that do not give a damn about the customer, or whom is hires in general. I recommend you go to another electronics store for your business. I know I am burning my theoretical chance at earning money there, but I believe in better business ethics that was our teacher's main goal in college. Do not waste time with such a backward group of people that lack the professionalism and customer empathy, but rather go to Frys electronics. Or at least a different best buy. Feel free to ask me anything else. I have been scorned plenty by this store.
While there is an authentic flare about La Tienda, in general, the food is lacking a lot of the great flavor that you would expect from such a restaurant. I did appreciate the queso blanco, instead of the typical cheese-like product usually offered, but even this wasn't enough to make it worth it. I don't recommend this place to anyone. Just because it looks authentic and has Goya Products, doesn't mean its good. On a side note, having lived more than 20 years in Texas and having lived and traveled throughout Mexico, I can say that this is the only place that I ever got food poisoning, after eating here I vomited several times.
I usually don't write reviews unless they are "excellent". I like to encourage those doing a good job and I prefer to simply ignore and stop using the services of those that I was disappointed with. But I'm so upset with my recent experience at J Richard Lilly & Associates that I decided to share it. I see a nurse practitioner (nice person) for over a year now. The services reminds me of those from rural areas in Brazil where I grew up, simple and ok. I find it convenient, because the office is 2 blocks away from where I live. It's been a while that I have been put on a prescription to treat hypothyroid - something that I requested to be checked for. The dosage is still the lowest. At some point earlier this year, I was finally asked for a blood work to re-assess my thyroid hormone levels and possibly increase or maintain the prescription dosage - I have reasons to believe it needs to be increased. A couple of months later I came back to follow up on my lab results. After paying my co-pay and waiting for one hour I was informed by my nurse practitioner that the Lab didn't get my blood work tested for the thyroid and that I would need to draw blood once again. Used to the rudimentary service, I didn't bother at all - not as much as it bothered my wife, who has been asking me to change my PCP since my first consultation. After all, the nurse practitioner told me I wouldn't have to come back for the results, she would give it to me over the phone and refill my prescriptions with my pharmacy. That would do for me. So, after all my complacency, what would upset me so much, right? Well, I run out of my prescription a month after the blood work was done, so I decided to call my nurse practitioner to obtain my lab results and the new prescription refill. I was informed by someone in the office that I would have to come in for an appointment. I explained what happened and that I wouldn't come in, since the nurse promised to give me my results over the phone. Their staff told me they would make a note saying that I wouldn't come in and that's it – no further help. I called again yesterday (my second day without my prescription) and had to leave a message after being held on call for 10 minutes. Today is my 3rd day without my prescription. I will try to call them once again, although I just changed my PCP with my insurance co. I will see my new Dr. in 2 days, which means I will be a whole week without my prescription. In conclusion, I am not sure if they are only incompetent or if they do it on purpose to get you coming in as many times as possible for the money. In any case, it can't be good for you if you have serious health concerns. Other than that, I find the staff to be very kind and friendly - including my nurse.
Lennar advertises they have the 'everything's included home'. Man, is that FAR from true!!!!! No builder can possibly have everything that every single home owner wants. Their justification: 'we don't have a design center'. They say that helps them keep their costs competitive. Well, being a new, and sorry! Lennar home owner, I can tell you that things as simple as us wanting and willing to supply the paint - without a discount or credit - to have something other than the sterile white 'isn't allowed'!!!! All changes to make your home YOUR HOME, has to be done after market. This 'everything included home' is a sad and unfortunate JOKE!
Go only if ur 7 year old has been bugging you to take'm there... Thank God i don't have a 7 year old... The overwhelming decor might distract you from the horrible food and mediocre service... The long wait (1 hour to be seated) might have influenced my opinion.
Wanted to simply replace pads and rotors on one axle on a 3 year old car with 70K miles. The price quoted over the phone was competitive. However, when I got there they quoted a price that was 500% higher to do complete brake over-haul on all 4 wheels. They insisted it had to to be done. I took it to an independent shop who looked closely at all the brakes and only replaced what needed to be replaced for the fraction of what Car-X demanded. This shop, including the managers lacks integrity and I feel they purposefully and intentionally attempted to create a larger job-order for themselves. I'd warn folks to be skeptical of the advice and service suggestions made by this shop; they lack integrity and professionalism and there are far batter options in Madison.
service was good. food took almost a half hour before we got it. the food was cold, not cooked and gross. when we expressed our opinion to our server she took care of everything. the manager didn't even come over to apologize or do anything to get us for future business. I will never go back there or recommend it.
Very Sad At Service. Just imagine on your wedding day making your marriage valid in their church, a photographer just happens to be taking photos of your church. The Father asks his old friend if he could kindly take photos of the couple renewing their vows. The bride and groom were so excited, it must be a blessing. The couple kindly exchange information to the photographer, and the couple is willing to pay for the digital images. Now just image the sadness as their one year anniversary comes and goes and still no images, not even one. After many attempts to contact the photographer, and then just asking for just one image of the day to remember and still offering to pay…..all they are left with are broken promises and excuses and no image(s). Is this a kind of photographer you want taking your photos? I know I will not be asking him to take the most important images of my life, my friends, family or co-workers. Very sad bride and groom.
My nails were pretty torn up through cleaning from my move. I wanted my acrylic nails soaked off and a new set put back on. Unfortunately water had gotten under my nails while I was cleaning and caused a fungus to start. I had no clue until the nail tech Kent showed it to me on two different nails. I asked him if it would grow out and he said to make sure and come back in two weeks and he'll check it. After further research, nail fungus does not go away without treatment and everything I've seen says you MUST take the nails off for the healing process to even begin. He did not put on fresh tips like I requested but used my existing natural nails. Add to that the fact he continued to work on my nails with his normal equipment and made no attempt to sanitize it knowing I had a fungus on two nails. $50 I was charged for this and I left him an $7 tip because the nails did look beautiful. This looks like a clean shop when you walk in but they do not sanitize their equipment and will take your money rather than protect the health of your nails. I don't care if this was the last salon in this city, I wouldn't go back.
Its indian place but in this maps its shows as pakistan leh
Service slow I had to switch my crepes which were cold, food ok. Coffe took 10 minutes to get to the table. Last time I went to another IHOP service was this bad in Orlando.
None
Very bad experience. I've taken my car there a few times, the owner talks poorly about any other body/tire/service shop in town, and likes to tell horror stories about them. I wonder why he has so many personal horror stories about other shops if he's had his own shop so long...but anyway. I went for a routine oil change, and the next day my oil like was flashing, beeping like crazy. I took it right back and every drop of oil had drained out. He told me he used the last drop to pull the car into the shop. Nice. So they put more oil in and I asked about getting a refund of what I'd paid the day before considering the seriousness of the error that they admitted was their fault (a little 'strap' was caught in the cap seal). I understand humans make errors, but that one was potentially very hazardous to my engine and at the very least inconvenient for me to have to return. I asked for my money back, which was only $60 because I used a rebate check, and he got nasty with me. He said "Nooo! We just put $30 worth of free oil in your car." Yes, true, but that could've cost me thousands, and I really was supposed to be other places at the time rather than back in their shop. There was no reasoning with the man, he even said to me, "I know you're trading it soon, so I don't care." I've NEVER been talked down to like that in any business and would never return. He always wants to sell original parts that cost 2-3 times more than other options, and I can understand that, but my ORIGINAL parts are what needed all the service and replacement so why would I feel that is money well spent to put more original parts in the car after only 3 years? He makes you feel bad for not spending as much as THEY want you to spend. He's right, I'm trading the car and a large part of the reason why is I never want to deal with that man again, and we don't have a VW shop here in town yet. There's one on the way though, so if you need service, I would recommend ANYONE else!
I am disappointed with all Social Secuity Administrations locations due to the fact that everywhere online has their hours from 9am-3 or 3:30pm M-F. Today I went to two different locations to find out that they both closed at 12pm on Wednesdays. Seeing as the business is only open for 6 hours during the work week it is challenging to find time to go if you work a 9-5 job. It is even more frustrating that the hours are not correct online and you cannot connect easily to a person over the phone. Overall, I would say very poor.
Friendly staff. Poor car wash. I was relieved of $50.00 in my glove box. Don't leave anything of value in your car. should have known better.
These guys are horrible, purchased a Vapir One then tried to exchange less than a week later, was constantly lied to by staff, owner refuses to contact me or offer exchange on this unused product with receipt. Stay away and avoid at all costs!
If the title doesn't say it all, then hopefully I can clarify here. This place is like a bar/club. The serve food that is okay, but by no means great. It is about 30% more expensive than it ought to be. It's bar food (only not as tasty) served on nice platingwares. I might go here for a cocktail on the roof or something, but I'd never go here again w/ the intent on dining.
$1.50 for a no-refillable can of coke. $5 for an oreo shake. that had barley any oreos. the shakes are not shakes they are more like Dairy Queen Blizzards so dont expect to drink one. Overpriced.
I did not know that this was part of the hostel the hostel where I was in Barcelona. When I found out I liked much more ... since it has the same qualities as the Yellow Feetup in Barcelona .... also I loved the terrace! =)
I normally love them but this last time I went to Ping's I had a few flies in my spring rolls, meaning more than one spring roll. Extremely disgusted. Not happy at all with them and I can promise that I or anybody that I know will ever being going to Ping's again.
FACT: QUICKER TO DRIVE THE 8 MILES THAN TELEPHONE. NO REPLY FROM LIGHTING DEPARTMENT. SATURDAY 11 MAY 2013 . AFTER WAITING 11 MINUTES WITH NO ADVISE - JOANNE IN THE SHOWROOM EVENTUALLY TOOK THE INITIATIVE WHILST WALKING BY TO TAKE MY CALL. SHE WAS MOST APOLOGETIC AND VERY HELPFUL. HOWEVER. TELEPHONE SERVICE DREADFUL ..........GOOD JOB I WASN'T THE MYSTERY SHOPPER!! WELL OFF TO RING THE MANAGER NOW - WONDER HOW LONG THIS WILL TAKE!
I have to stress that the merchandisers were very nice to me. They tried to price-match my product according to policy. However, the manager, Ken, is completely incompetent and straight-out told me that he wouldn't price match my product because it was too big of a discount. His idiocy has convinced me that I should never step foot in a Best Buy ever again. For them to hire someone so unprofessional speaks volumes about their company.
Tehlikeli ve guvenlik 0
Very bad road which is 2 kms from the main road till Della Adventure, and too much of dirt on the railing when you queue up for purchase of the tickets, Too expensive as compared to the adventures, Overall it is bullshit place only waste of timing and money also your vehicle is prone to get damaged.
My son attends this school. They lack a proper playground, areas for PE and it's curriculum seems primitive. Communication with the staff is difficult, with the exception of 2 of the office ladies.
Beware of this place, told me one price on the phone and asked for double when i got there
The restaurant was nasty. Food was over cooked dry n the chips where stale I would Ever eat there again I even got the meal free because of the host took my food because I said sumthing about they didn't even try to work with me n I was trying to work with them so that being said worst Mexican food I ever tasted
We were so disappointed by our "stay". (We ended up moving our two small children to another hotel at 11pm!!!) As we were checking in, we over heard another guest asking when the air conditioning would be fixed. I asked if the air was broken on our floor and she said "yes, but they are working on it." (It's over 100 degrees outside, mind you) We were approaching bedtime for our little ones so I asked if we could be moved to a floor that had air conditioning that still worked. She huffed and puffed a little bit and finally told us that we would only be able to get a room with one bed instead of two. I reluctantly agreed since it was getting so late... so long as it had air... When we arrived in our room, there were indeed two beds which indicates that she was trying to just make us change our mind about changing floors... however... the room was 81 degrees with the air running. I called down and asked if they were going to be able to fix it because if not, we needed to leave immediately so that our children could sleep. They said they were working on it and they'd find us a fan in the mean time. Finally, two hours later, I'd had enough. The room was still 81 degrees, we had NO fan, and my children were sweaty and unable to sleep. We were miserable. We called down and asked if we could get refund and they assured us that we would. We finally checked in to the Marriot Courtyard at 11 pm for only $20 more... It was cool, clean and amazingly comfortable. We only wish we'd done it sooner. As of now, we've yet to be refunded for the MISERABLE time we had there... I cannot say it loud enough... DO NOT STAY AT THIS MOTEL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Carne de la parrillada, muy seca y poca. papas recalentadas, atencion mala. No recomendable.
Jose D Castro, don't even dream about it, buddy! Will never ever you see this flag at Antarctic!
TERRIBLE, NOISY, AND THEFT!!! - My wife and I spent the first weekend in December, 2011 there for a family function in the area and initially thought the place was nice. They were filming at the pool and told us to be quite. There was a funky smell in the hallways and the room had a unique odor. Breakfast was in a shabby room and was not up to par as nicer Residence or Hampton Inns. Place also looked dated. To add insult to injury, when we got home, my wife found that $1,200 of her jewelery and clothing was missing from her luggage. We called the hotel to complain and said they would check to see who took care of our room. We called back and they told us that the maid who cleaned our room had suddenly left for Cuba (for family issues). We asked them to reimburse us for the stolen items (we have receipts), they referred us to their insurance carrier (Certus Claims) who referred us back to the hotel. I complained to the hotel and they wouldn't speak to me anymore. Both refuse to pay for anything even though they basically admitted that their maid fled with stuff. I am going to have to sue them in small claims court. I thought the hotel maids are supposed to be bonded.
Udesna laxni obsluha, nepekny interier (jesteze jsme sedeli venku).
Wretchedly Poor - Showed up with my mother who is bipolar along with other undiagnosed problems and in desperate need of help. We arrived at just about 2pm. There were 3 people in the waiting room. Over the next 3 hours they were all seen. My mother was finally seen at 11:30pm. Apparently a bunch of employees were sick and did not come in to work according to the desk. They also blamed computer problems. So instead of letting us know the last case worker that was in had left and another would not be in until 11pm they just let us sit there and gave us attitude when we would ask for an update saying they were having computer problems and employees calling in sick. They knew full well that their was no case worker there to see my mother and they made us wait for nearly 10 hours. I know the mental health field is terribly underfunded but I am just saying that when you have people in mental distress maybe you should be straight with them and not lie or mislead them. I had to keep my mother there for all that time because after the first 6 hours of waiting do you think there is any chance I could have ever gotten her to go back? Her assessment was also done in under 20 minutes after we were told it usually takes about an hour. If you have money pay for a psychologist or doctor before you go to this place. If you have no money and mental health issues I am sincerely sorry if you have to go here.
I bought multiple items for Bible School. This store is not close to my home so I admit I have had the return in my car since July, but in perfect condition, in the bag, with the receipt. The store was friendly enough when we purchased the items and assured us we could return unused and unopened items. Well.............not so fast. The man circled the place on the receipt that said must be returned in 14 days. I admit I did NOT see that, but he would not even consider store credit. Needless to say, I won't be buying more S.S. or VBS or anything else in this store. Sorry to say, this is why Mennonites have a bad reputation for being close-fisted. It's also why K-Marts and Wal-Marts flourish. Be reasonable with your customers.
Do not take your car to this place. You will end up paying for repairs you don't need, if they actually make the repair. The manager is in the business of ripping people off, not being honest. $7200 for repairs that aren't needed is beyond disgraceful. They lie, bully their mechanics into doing the jobs for fear of losing theirs, get yelled at and fired if they do not cooperate with the mangers scheme. If they put an oil sticker on your car, that doesn't mean the oil actually got changed. And if you notice in the other reviews, two of the reviews are the same under different names. They have wives and girlfriends write fake reviews. Also notice the other reviews are poor-fair. Hmm. BBB will be contacted.
They NEVER answer the phone. What do we pay them for?
They took three hours to change my oil and do a vehicle inspection yesterday. They tried to sell me on at least four repairs that were over $100 a piece (some that I had just done recently and definitely didn't need), and then tried twice to get me to open a Firestone credit card to pay for their outrageously expensive services. These guys are salespeople through and through and didn't seem to really care about me as a customer.
Worst theather
They have the worst pizza ever .many people have told them that it's really bad and they don't do anything about it .It just shows how much they care about what their customers think.
This place has live entertainment, that's a plus, its basically a fight to get a drink, and one time i was told i was drunk, hadn't had a beer yet cuz they were busy. The bartender, who's name starts with a G, was a jerk to me, called me sloppy drunk and then had me removed from the bar. I was mad because he kept my 50 dollar bill. Worst $50 beer ever (plus cover) i refuse to go back. Also just urinate anywhere, smells like everyone else does. Your bathroom is just disgusting! On a good note the waitresses i had b4 were just great!
Hands down the worst home improvement store I've ever been in. The staff is horrible, very rude, untimely, and not knowledgeable. I have been forced to go in here several times over the past year, and have NEVER had a good experience. I am continually surprised by the extremely rude, and unhelpful employees, even the management is poor.
Waited a Hour and Half for my pizza.
DO NOT USE THIS SERVICE!!!!!!! PAY MORE MONEY SOMEWHERE ELSE!!!!!!! If there were a lower scoring I would use it, poor-fair doesn't descirbe the "service" this company provides. When you call they will tell you get a "full bar" in the limo...it's mostly soda. They will also tell you that you get VIP access to about 12 clubs in Denver, unfortunitly thier drivers don't have the list of clubs or know where they are located. I booked thier service for a bachelor party and I was sorely disapointed. I was told SEVERAL times that I was getting a black Chrysler and got a white one. The driver was lost ALL NIGHT, using nav on his phone to find addresses, the raido in the car didn't work and the driver didn't know how to fix it. We even called for a pick up twice and got a voice mail. We told the driver where to pick us up and were told TEN MINUTES, then watched the car drive right past us. When I called to complain I was blown off and told that I should have "read the contract"......REALLY????? Does the contract say you will get crappy service??? It should.
The office wasnt occupied twice during the 3 months i had an RV stored there, once when we went to get into the storage yard, to get to our, trailer there was a sign on the office door, said out to lunch, BE BACK AT !:15, we waited there, for 45 mins., called thier off property phone number posted on thier front window, no answer, voice mail only, no way to get ahold of ANYONE, this happened to us twic e!! Then when we spoke with a man who worked there and said he was the MANAGER, he was combatitive with us, didnt want to hear any of our concerns, or never apologized for our inconviences, he was rude , told us we had to move our trailer anyway, because he was cleaning up the yard, and that he was cutting down the tree our trailer was sitting under, then when we told him we had enough we were moving out on the first he changed his tune, said we didnt have to move our trailer today, he would call us in a few days and let us know when to move it,[],he never did call us,[], we had paid our rent up till 7-1-13, but we went and took our trailer out of there on the 26th of june, The office help there has had 3 different employees come and go since we signed on with them, they gave us a gate code to get into the yard whenever we needed to, the code doesnt work, you have to wait for someone in the office to come out and unlock the gate,[],[],if theres anyone there at all,[],[],definitly would not reccomend this place, very UNPROFESSIONAL, AND RUDE!!!!!!!, Never mind the fact that my husband is an disabled vet., but we were customers, and paid them to be treated like crap!!!!
Way out of line with the pricing!! Pasta dishes should not cost $14 at a pizza joint!! The food was ok at best and the service was horrible! I went there with my girlfriend because she had gotten pizza there before and thought it was very good. That may be so but stay away from anything else. The sauce I had on my tortellini tasted like it was from a can. She had baked rigatoni and again it looked as though they poured some prego over some noodles, added some cheese and baked it. For the prices I think the quality should have been a lot better.
I thought I was a loyal customer of Momo since I kept coming back and bringing my friends over. But my mind is changed from last experience at Momo. I had dinner with three friends and stayed to talk a bit after dinner. Just before we were leaving (a friend went to restroom), the manager came over and asked us to leave (politely) and told us he has another reservation. It wasn't a big deal. If the manager didn't come, we would have left in 1 minute any way. It was true that it made me feel a bit uncomfortable when I saw there were another 5 free tables (same size) and no other customers waiting. I talked to the manager that I felt a bit uncomfortable. The manager said that they give each table around 1h30mins. I looked at my watch and we stayed for 1h39mins. We had to leave basically it's not because of another reservation but 9 mins over his "rule". The experience made me to think a loyal customer doesn't mean much to Momo and it is more important that their rigid "rule" can be carried out. I wouldn't recommend this restaurant to my friends. If you would go, don't forget to set up an alarm before you sit down.
I order very often from here as I live close by I have spent several hundred dollars here in a very short time. I always tip well and always get delivery. The orders always consist of in part, a Spicy Tuna Roll and generally I ask for additional ingredients, specifically avocado and cream cheese which I am willing to pay additional for. However each time this order comes what I get is a slice of tuna with avocado and cream cheese. When I called to ask about this I was told the spicy part is only a sauce with a slice of tuna. However when I order just spicy tuna I get the traditional minced tuna. Since the food was good I continued to order from here. Yesterday I tried to place an order which included the lunch special which they state in writing is from 10:30-4:00. When I called was prior to 4:00 yet I was told it was too close to 4:00 to order. I asked for a manager and was told that Carie would be in tomorrow to call then. Today I called Carie. I tried to explain in very simple terms what my issue was with the Spicy Tuna. She told me that she couldn't understand me, the spicy tuna was always finely chopped and told me not to order from there anymore to call someone else. I was shocked. I was never able to inquire about the lunch specials before she hung up on me. I called back and told her that I had spent hundreds there in about 2 months (verified through my online order history), and that I would no longer order from there. This business barely speaks English but I was patient and understanding. If you get unsatisfactory customer service don't bother to call.
I specifically mentioned the ad on TV for the Steak & Lobster @$14.99 & the waiter said he would do that price even though the charge $18.99 then he proceeded to charge me full price. I had to leave & couldn't argue it as we were in a hurry & he took forever to come back, I also had a issue with the soup & he said he would send me home a dessert & then never mentioned it again. I was really disappointed for a $105.00 dinner for four. I can see why restaurants are closing here in Salinas, there is no quality of product or service. Very sad
So I'll try to recap my experience as objectively as possible: Last December my wife and I needed to board our recently adopted Staffordshire Bull Terrier. She was a rescue dog that was totally submissive and never had... and never HAS... shown any aggressive behavior with us or any of our friends' pets. We emailed the W.R. and were told by their staff that they do not allow this particular breed to play in their 'play rooms.' Here is the email exchange prior to the date of boarding. Woof Room: "Unfortunately we can't have full bred Staffordshire Bull Terriers in open play daycare. If your dog is mixed with another breed we will be more than happy to do an evaluation. Also, your dog can still stay in the hotel but she would receive personal walks throughout the day instead of daycare. Please let us know if this works for you and we can go ahead and get her scheduled." My response: "We have an evaluation scheduled, where we can talk more, but we don't know if she is mixed or not as she was adopted. If you feel more comfortable keeping her away from other dogs, we trust your instincts. She may prefer one-on-one time to play daycare." We boarded her, shook hands and left the state to visit family for the holidays. I received a phone call the next day informing me that our dog attacked and killed another dog (a papillon) while in the 'play area.' We were responsible for paying the vet bills, cremation, and the full cost of replacing the family dog. The Woof Room spoke on the other owners' behalf and insisted that were responsible for 100% of any resulting costs. They utterly washed their hands of any responsibility... unless you count the money they paid to the other family... and seemed hostile anytime I questioned their liability. After a few scary, tense, and sad weeks we were left with nearly $2000 in expenses and a city labeled DANGEROUS DOG. We are currently enrolled in private sessions to help with our dog's behavior (hoping to knock down the label to our dog). Here is my subjective opinion: 1. It was unfair for the W.R. to loosely represent the other owners in dealing with us... and extremely uncomfortable when dealing with the hostile co-owner 2. We were told that our dog was put in a time out the night before for acting aggressive towards this poor little dog... and she was put back into the same room with her the next morning... a sign on poor communication/diligence with the employees. Totally irresponsible!!!! 3. During the entire incident I did not feel like I was treated as a customer... but rather as a malicious criminal. _________________________ I STRONGLY urge you to consider boarding your pet somewhere else. I cannot even imagine what the other family must have gone through... and hopefully the Woof Room's inexperienced staff never allows this tragedy to happen again!
Both chicken and beef meats were old and dry, tahini was watery. Bleh.
I wish I could relate the quality of the products but the experience of the store was so unpleasant I could not stay there longer than 1 minute. Market research says that loud music and shouting are not a good environment to encourage shopping. Cariloha emphasized these to a great degree. Be ready for sensory overload while shopping here.
Horrible!!!!!!
The hotel was ok but the room was really cold and heating the room was not functioning. Make sure your room has proper heating before checking in.
I was a little underwhelmed by my experience. I'll give you that the food at Victor's is ok. I had the suckling pig, and it was juicy, tender, and nicely flavored. But, the fact is that given the price to quality and quantity ratio, I really have had better. One thing i was really looking forward to was their lobster empanadas. Unfortunately they're done in such a way that these taste more like something you'd take out of a microwave than something you'd get at a restaurant. Also, their arroz con pollo is just yellow rice with a chicken breast sliced up on top, rather than all cooked together. So theres that to consider for any purists out there. So all in all, I'd say skip this place and if you're in the mood for Cuban/Latin American, go elsewhere.
Nunca hay parking!!
My experience with your office is horrible, as a matter of fact horrible is not the word but your unexusable bad customer servive make me wonna vomit. your staff especially the lady that answers your phone when she feels like is so rude.
I went to Sunday brunch and found it to be a child care center. Children came in noisy and were running around. We moved to another part of the restaurant and it was still disturbing. The manager came over and kinda of apologized but said - that's just how it is for brunch now, you know? Actually, I didn't know because I go to brunch often and that has never happened before. It won't happen again for me or anyone I know at the Cecil. That's just how it is now, you know?
I've used this cinema many times but a few years ago my boss introduced me to the Wellesley in Wellington, it's a lovely little cinema and you can sit upstairs in the circle too as it used to be a theatre, fair enough it doesn't show many films at a time and not always exactly the film that you want to see but the prices are way better than the Odeon, the staff are friendly and the refreshments aren't too ridiculously priced either, there is also Scotts cinema in Bridgwater which I would say the same for - apart from the old theatre thing so there is no upper circle!! I now only go to the Odeon on a bogof from the local paper, for a kids club movie or to see a live stream of a ballet etc.
Nasty! Nasty people and the food was late to come out and guess what...cold when it did. Some guy claiming to be the manager was racist and abrasive. You would think that customer service would be a priority. It's more like we represent more work they have to deal with by us being there.. Won't be back. If you require a nice atmosphere......stay clear of this place.
None
The server should have mentioned the price of the seafood special. For $28 you got 2 pieces of tough lobster, no shrimp, and no taste to speak of. Oh, and no bread with an entrée that expensive ? The burger might have been better with fresh meat, but the fries were decent but no pickle. Overall, really bad. When this happened at Iron Hill I got a gift card in the amount of the bill, but when I emailed, no response. No way I'd ever refer anyone to this place.
This was my favorite Local post office until I tried submitting my passport. This location usually has friendlier people, you always have the staff who stand there and don't help or see the line and close their register because it's union break time but all in all the staff that works here doesn't seem to hate people. (I know thats a wonderful yard stick to evaluate my service but it's the reality of the postale system). The problem with this location is that it is now the location for the Passport processing and the staff they have performing that function seem to over dramatize the process and be very uniformed. They rejected perfectly good photos that we're accepted by the Ocala post office and then again by the Passport agency. If there is only one place in town that performs this function they really should be able to do the job properly.
WARNING!!! DO NOT MOVE IN!!!! I have lived here for 5 monthS and have had a horrible experience with the apartment having black widow spiders. I have killed probably 6-8! The flooring in the bathrooms are peeling up and there is black underkneath....EW! Who would let people move in with that kind of condition....not good, honest people! The blinds were ancient when I moved and now they are broken in 1 room and the main lady said that I would have to pay because they install new ones for every tenant...WRONG...they are old and were never originally replaced. When I had moved in the 3rd floor, the deck was all rotted wood with nails sticking out and if you leaned on the railing you could pull it out!! I have a two year old and they said they would replace it and it took 2 months!!!!!! The AC went out when it was extremely hot and because it wasn't 93 IN MY APARTMENT, they wouldn't come and fix it but I have a two year old and he could have been harmed being that hot! They are CHEAP because they let people move in who cannot pay rent on time or EVER! I have seen some seriously weirD people there and do not feel safe. Originally when I had moved in they gave me the wrong set of keys and it was a weekend so I could not get in and no one would help me!!!! Yes they have big floor plans but they are 100 years old with NO work done to them. The windows are ancient and feels like they are open at night when it is cold. DO NOT MOVE INTO THESE APARTMENTS OR EVEN LOOK AT 1. NOT WORTH WHAT YOU PAY FOR!!!! WARNING!!!
I go here with a group almost every week and wish I didn't, but the group choose the venue. As a group we must drop anywhere from $300-$500 a week in this place! We have seen good waitress come and go because of the management. The space we meet in has these overhead lights that don't work, we have asked the manager to fix so we can see what we are doing while we meet. You'd think after spending thousands of dollars in this place he could afford to replace the light bulbs, but he didn't. Some people have resorted to bringing in flash lights, literally, I wish I was being dramatic, so we can see while we eat and meet. The other thing is that they don't like to turn on the A/C, we often leave early in the summers because we are so warm its uncomfortable. The food is hit or miss, sometimes really good, sometimes really poor. The only thing you can count on is that it will be different each time you get it. You can tell that somewhere in the mix is a good chef, but somewhere it breaks down. The specials are usually pretty good. Then entrees are way over priced. The decor is dumpy, the bathrooms gross and this is coming from someone that doesn't really care how it looks as long as it is good food.
Bad customer service. 9-10 times I've been in to the store not one staff member has welcomed me to the store or has asked me if I need any help while I have been looking at clubs. Chances are if I had been helped I probably would have spent way more money than I have at your store.
None
acha nahi hai galati se bhi mat aa jana...nahi to pachtaoge
Hotel is very out of date. Have seen worse hotels, but this one doesn't even match up with other Holiday Inns that we've stayed at.
Seems that it's to hard for everybody to come to work on Saturday. Everybody was nice but short staff. I had to wait in the bay with my car turned off while they worked in the car next to me.
Celery Stalk (rumored to be renamed The Brighton) is the worst apartment complex I've ever lived in for maintenance and there a few other things to consider that will help you to avoid the hassle of living here. Mid America, a REIT, owns the property and hired a new management company. Cannon is gone. They made some great promises to fix things, but have not delivered on those promises. They removed the signs that gave office hours and closed off one of the doors to the office. We've not been able to use the online portal to pay rent recently. Today is day six (this time) of no hot water. The maintenance staff sets a whole new standard for not being able to fix something. The flooring on the second floor above both apartments I've lived in here is falling apart and I can hear every step anyone takes, I've been in the upstairs apartments and you can feel the flooring give when you walk on it. It took nearly two weeks for them to respond to a simple maintenance request to unclog a drain line on the HVAC unit above the shower. Normally a 5 minute job. The did not leave paperwork saying they were in the apartment. The manager promise to come and check things our personally and no record of that ever happening was left. I've had a long series of work orders for plumbing problems in my bathroom. I was told that since it was a new management company, they don't have all the old records...I do. If you are apartment hunting pass this place up! I'm getting out as soon as I can. It's a shame too, because the location is good. When I first moved in in 2007 it was owned by another company...things were better. Also Mid America forces you to pay for Time Warner cable even if you don't want cable or prefer another provider. It's added to your rent. Many of the newer tenants are not screened very well and the aroma of marijuana is a common thing. There have been at least three car break ins on the La Cosa side that I know of. On Arapaho, there is too much police presence for that (Starbucks and 7 Eleven across the street). We can't even get a door bell for the door like all the other apartments around us have and the door bell next door is disconnected. The raise the rent if you renew your lease every year, otherwise they charge you considerably more for a less than one year lease. When you change apartments they list a number of administrative fees that allows them to pay back on a fraction of your deposit while asking for a new one, even when the apartment is left in better shape than you found it. If this is a typical example of a Mid America property...avoid them like the plague!
Ok so this place is probably the absolute worst gym i've ever been too. Now if you want a gym that has machines and a basketball court and a pool you might find this place bearable, and i hope it's only because its REALLY REALLY Close to where you live. Now, i've been a member at planet fitness across the street and i wanted to try this gym out. Ive visted the one in new hyde park (i think it's called lake success) which was fine and awesome. I came into this centereach location with 2 freinds and 2 guest passes. I told the young lady in the front and she called over someone named Shawn. Now i know it's his job to make sales and with what sales capabilities he had he tried to push membership on us. Yeah i sure don't have a problem listening to him and entertaining his ideas for 10-15 mins or 20. This guy Shawn and the assistant general manager John (small stumpy looking fella) spent 45 mins telling us why we should join. I told them i just wanted to try the gym out and they kept insisting for me to choose a plan. This got uncomfortable QUICK. All 4 of us were waiting for over 45 minutes listening to me saying not right now a 100 different ways. Honestly, is that how you make a sale? Make the customer uncomfortable for 45 minutes? Really unprofessional. At the end they finally got the message (rather they gave up). John the assistant manager said "just give them their passes we don't have time to deal with this bs". Yeah. That made us feel totally awesome! Now bear in mind they called my phone at 8 am the next day after i printed out my passes. And when i called them back they said they were busy and to call back in 1 hour, ha. I also asked the lady if my cousin needed a parent to sign him in or would i do (im 21) she said it was fine. So anyways, after John insulted us and left Shawn proceeded to activate our passes, putting two people to a pass (one for the guest pass owner and one for his guest) as it said on the website. Now he wouldn't put my cousin on my pass because he was under age. I could see they were so elated that now they might be able to deny us access because we needed to get my cousins parents in. Now to their dismay my cousins dad showed up in 5 mins and we proceeded to the front desk (the same lady who told us we didnt need a parent to sign my cousin in) told us that it was only 1 person per pass. She signed 3 of us in, with only two passes because she didnt realize that shawn had activated two per pass. She argued with me for 5 minutes and said fine we could go in. Oh and by the way, my cousins Dad came in and he was not asked one single question or asked to sign any waivers. Now think of it, if my little cousin whos 15 got hurt while working out who's liability is he? The staff is careless. What really puts me off is that if you're choosing a gym and you will be coming back here many times a week you would want the staff to be helpful and polite, rather condescending right? Stupid questions i guess. Now we did finally get access (without a waiver being signed for my underage cousin). We used the facilities and had a decent time. The locker room is absolutely disgusting. You have to bring your own lockers unlike nicer LA fitness' where they have a keycode where you can enter in your own number. They also don't have anyone supervising the locker rooms like the other LA fitness'. The smell was aweful and every locker had clothes/trash and was not locked. The place was a dump. The gym was really empty and for good reason, who wants to come to this dump anyways. If you want to pay 40-50 dollars a month for terrible service, mediocre facilities you should love this gym. Go for the cheaper planet fitness. It get's the job done. And once again, i beg anyone trying to come into this gym with a guest pass to stay far far away. They will harass you, and raid you with offers for long amounts of time. Is it worth it? Nope.
I am appalled that it took 1 hour and 45 min to get an oil change, inspection and tire rotation. It was actually more like 2 hours because I was early. I have never had a 45 min oil change in my life dealer or commercial. I never usually file or post complaints but when I called the manager to talk to him about what happened I was told that I was out earlier then I should have expected and they gave me a free car wash. I have never heard of a 45 min oil change and certainly not 2 hours for routine maintenance and the wonderful car wash that I should have appreciated so much consisted of a hose wetting my car. I will never be back!!!!!
I would have rated this mechanic 4 or 5 stars after my first service with them. They were affordable, friendly, and honest. I took my car in for a bearing and hub assembly replacement (for which they gave me the best quote out of 5 mechanics in the area). They also gave me what I know to be an honest estimate of front/rear brake pad wear so I even had them replace my front pads. When I left I everything was running great, except that my steering wheel alignment was off (steering wheel at 1 o'clock when driving straight). I thought it would be no big deal, since they told me that all their service was backed by a 1 year/12,000 mile warranty. Well, it turns out you only get the warranty service if you can prove that they caused the problem (which is very difficult!). They were very rude, unlike when I first brought in my car, and basically called me a liar, suggesting that I probably "ran over a rock". Disappointing... I thought I had finally found a good mechanic for regular service.
Messed up ady.
I had a very aweful experience at Aurus last nite...we were there for 'The Restaurant Week'. I had heard and read a lot about this restaurant and was naturally expecting something nice. The place is over rated because of the celeb activity...only saving grace being the sea front! The place looked dingy, under lit and dull. The staff was arrogant...not clear what their role was when it came to 'The Restaurant Week'. Personally, i go to check out the food more than the ambiance and I was very very disappointed with the food. Celebrity Chef eh? Food was under seasoned, tasteless and insipid. Chimicuri chicken....i was served 4 pcs of chicken fingers say about 4"long with two pcs of some vege...no seasoning whatsoever...the salmon cakes were stinky, so was the red snapper. The prawn served to me was under done, again no seasoning...and was again STINKY....only the fettuccine was edible. OMG how can you go wrong with the chicken roulade ???? it was so so bad....i am not kidding ...where was the chef? what was he doing? Are your NON celeb guests paying green leaves instead of money? what in the world were you thinking when you put your name on 'The Restaurant Week'?? Aurus is one over rated garage restaurant...with a blissful sea front...but sadly they really DO NOT KNOW... how to treat their guests...when you have a sea front sitting what are you people doing with all that cloth hanging over tables and toppling the glasses, lamps??? Cant you find out how to decorate such a deck? NEVER AGAIN.
Milon
Nunca atendem o telefone; não respondem os emails que mando no site; demoram um ano pra resolver um problema simples...enfim...
I've been going to this office for about a year here's my experience: The dentist are great, but I've had 2 appointments canceled for whatever reason, and 2 appointments accidentally scheduled for the wrong time. I needed an emergency appointment and found that emergencies have no priority over a regular appointment. If it weren't from my experience with the dentist, I would be looking for a new dental provider
I called to set an appointment and I was placed on hold. In the background you can her the lady laughing and chatting away. Im visiting from Cali. Ill make sure I let everyone know about the crappy service this place has to offer.
Customer service is absolute crap. They are disrespectful rude and do not accommodate their customers.
This place is spoiled by abundance of tourists. They served us with a dry, burnt duck. Later we guessed that they first burnt it and then tried to feed to several tourists, until we ate it, that's why it became so dry.
None
Zimmer "ausreichend" - Empfang recht nüchterne Atmosphäre. Etage 3 sehr enger Rundgang. Schwindelfreiheit sehr empfehlenswert. Frühstück und Situation im Innenhof ist "nett". Überwachte Parkmöglichkeit in naheliegender Garage vorhanden. Preis-Leistungs Verhältnis insgesamt nicht gut. Man erhält den Eindruck, die Nachfrage in Sète ist dermaßen groß, dass eine freundliche, zuvorkommende Haltung des Empfangspersonals nicht notwendig ist.
The service from the opticians in Asda St Austell is some of the worst I have ever experienced. Enven though they new we had an issue with the gasses thay had supplied and we called and made an appointment by telephone we were not expected and not seen by a memeber of the optician team but a deputy store manager made his best efforts but didn't understand the issues at all. A wasred journey and a waste of time. Very poor customer service.
TERRIBLE service. TERRIBLE sales. You have been warned. We purchased two cars here, had both serviced regularly and had terrible experiences every time. If you want to get nickle and dimed on your purchase and waste half your day waiting for a simple oil change then Priority Toyota in Chespeake is the place to go!
An old-fashioned corporate-style hotel where the staff is not particularly interested in helping out and where countless details contribute to make guests look forward to being back home. The polar opposite of the creativity and energy that is so emblematic of Portland.
Gross
BAD! When you walk through the door the first thing you see is a very small room. This room has no door, it has steel bars like you would seen in a prison this is for the children under 2. My daughter enrolled my Granddaughters into this place. I turned and seen the youngest with her face pressed to the bars crying as we left. It is filthy as the other person posted. I had my two year old Granddaughter in the car. She messed her Diaper just before we got there to pick up my other Granddaughter. My wife took her in and asked if she could change her Diaper. Even though she is enrolled she was told no! When asked why... they stated they had just cleaned the upstairs and there was no place to do it??? My wife became angry and asked if she could change her on the floor. In a rude tone she was told no. That would not be sanitary. Nothing more to say, that was their last day their. We got them enrolled in the learning tree. A-1 place, so much more more room, open areas, NO BARS! Friendly, clean but most of all less expensive that Destinations! And is currently working with Granite School district. Kids are Doing great. Destinations Has some real issues. I believe they are currently trying to sell it. They need to do something. It is a dive.
Pull it down or do it up. Can't find a single place where the paint isn't pealing off. Truly, truly terrible!
They have reached a new level of chef egomania here. I asked for a side of bacon with my brioche and the waitress told me I was not 'allowed' because the chef said it would make my breakfast too rich! Excuse me?! I'll be the one to decide that thanks. Yes it's Surrey Hills but no it ain't a Michelin starred cafe - get a grip people. I won't be going back and neither will the people I was with. Avoid.
Yorumsuz
This place is kind of unreal to me. I bought their groupon for a year of laser hair removal. The staff were very kind and helpful, though clearly not terribly knowledgeable about their own equipment. But they use a Cutera laser, so I figured if they can point and shoot, we'll be okay. I don't know if they changed their process for promotional customers, but I received Extraordinarily poor quality treatments - it would be laughably bad if it hadn't, you know, happened. I've had laser hair removal at Arbutus Laser (amazing), and one time at SKN in Yaletown (also great). SKN uses the same laser as Deja Vu, and my results there were great (I have ideal skin/hair pigmentation for laser). I went twice to Deja Vu and had the same experience with two different technicians. First, it hurt maybe 1/10th as much as it should. I barely felt it - a bad sign. Then, they moved the wand around randomly. The technician did some areas many times, and missed others completely. Both techs moved the wand at a speed that meant they missed sections in between 'zaps.' After a week or so (when the zapped hairs have fallen out), I just had noticeably large patches of completely unaffected hair. The second time, I had literal strips of hair going vertically down my body along with other random patches missed. Hair-zebra wasn't my intended look. According to my experience with Arbutus (rated best in the city over and over) and SKN (same laser as Deja Vu), the point is that laser only affects the follicle at a certain growing stage, so it's important to zap every hair every time to make the timing of the appointments coincide with that stage of hair growth as much as possible. When I complained to Deja Vu, I was told missing whole areas was normal and that they would inevitably get them in a future session (despite the obviously random method being used by the technicians and the fact that my hair has grown back in by the time they see me again, so there's no way to ensure that). I asked for my money back and got a lecture about having paid a promotional price and expecting too much. I feel bad asking for my money back after going twice, but it was literally a useless service (patchy hair is worse than just regular hair!) by a company that doesn't know what they're doing. I had to fork out the money to go back to Arbutus in the end anyway, so the groupon was a complete waste of money.
the pizza is very expensive, and not necessarily worth it. quality is okay, but considering the price it should be mind blowing. strangly uncomfortable delivery person, possibly not familiar with human contact, just kind of stands there when you open the door.
Hello my fellow friends in Virginia, I called the Verizon store today to set up home internet because I just bought a tablet from them and switched my cell service so I thought combin it all. First the girl on the phone was so incompident she could not spell Kevin I think she was drunk honestly she ran my credit four times then fraud protection came up now I have to copy my I'd and FAX to them they say they have no email to do this with. What....so I go to Verizon office and the receptionist was so rued I could not believe it I told people about this at Verizon and the most I got was a shoulder shrug not even a sorry. I was trying to do Verizon right and put all my phone and internet services together. No I will be happy to pay restocking fee and find a company that would like to have a customer I was with attention for 10yrs so this was going to be a long relationship it really is sad these days. All they could do is look past me for a new customer so now they are in the same boat with attention and bank of america
Typical experience i suspect. Nothing can be done about anything here without "headquarters" making the call... and it's in Conyers. Sorry didn't go to there first. Now i get to spend a whole other day with my friends at DDS :( Ugh... Wait time for the first failure was an hour. Two hours later im still waiting for a supervisor to call my number.
Lotus Express in the food court. Ordered the special with two sides and one meat (rice, green beans, & Kung Pao) Disgusting. I bit into a small rock! Small black pebble in my lunch. The "chicken" was gross mystery meat.
Worst auto service I have ever received. I purchased 2011 Toyota Camry a few months previous from private seller. I went in to Toyota of San Diego for an alignment (car pulling to right), everything checked out "good." I do not drive the car much, only use as long commuter. Next weekend I drove the car to Arizona the car still pulls to the right. I bring the car back the next week, after waiting 20 minutes to get checked in with making an appointment, they check and claim car is out of alignment and caster/camber is bent. This was not indicated on my last alignment 2 weeks ago and they said I must have damaged the car in the two weeks. I barely drove the car! They wanted to charge me another $89 for an alignment? What? Spoke with assistant manager, they left me waiting 15 minutes to look up old records, and she put me back with the staff member. Who told me the same thing, assuming I damaged the car. Do not go to this dealer, they should not be part of Toyota.
This is a place to avoid like the plague. Do yourselves a favor and go somewhere else because you will not be pleased with the result. Instead of repairing a dent on my car, they actually caused more damage, then started with the nonsensical excuses that went from because it's plastic to you can't expect too much for what you paid... Businesses like this should not be allowed to remain open because what they're doing is simply using a CA license to rip people off with shoddy work.
No puedo creer que estando tan cerca de mi domicilio me dicen que no me la pueden entregar porque ni esa ni otra sucursal cubren la colonia El Reloj. Estoy como a 5 minutos!!!
If they insist on hiring deadbeats to work the drive-thru they could at least hire ones who listen properly.
Dieses Hotel hat die besten Zeiten schon länger hinter sich gelassen. Räume sind einigermassen ok, Bad welches mir zur Verfügung stand war von der Dusche sehr eng, unter dem Waschbecken fehlten, bzw. fielen schon 4 Kacheln ab, eine Fensterbank hatte man sowohl innen wie aussen vergessen einzubauen. Der Service, die Mitarbeiter sowie das Essen ist wirklich gut, leider sind die Gänge (Teppichboden) stark verunreinigt (Kaugummi, größere wie kleinere Flecken) - wirkt daher sehr abstossend. Ein weiteres Manko ist die große Entfernung zum Gardasee... ca. 10 km einplanen, mit Fahrrad eher ungünstig, da doch eher oberhalb gelegen, also doch das Auto / Motorrad bewegen. In nächster Umgebung (zu Fuß) gibt es nichts. Dieses Hotel wird unter anderem von LIDL-Reisen als Domizil in seinem "Hotel-Roulette" genutzt (dabei wird in der Beschreibung "nahe Gardasee" benutzt)...
I asked for a refill on a cold chai, and they charged me ~$4; outrageous!
I'm not sure if I hate this travel agency or all travel agencies. Ramon was nice on the phone- but never followed up. I had to call HIM back in order to ensure he actually booked my flight and get updates on price changes. Now that I think about it- hes yet to call me back...ever. I'm not sure what the customer service mantra is here, but regardless of language quality business practices are the same worldwide. If I want to know something, let me know that day. And if you can't tell me, let me know when you'll have an answer. If you drag your feet don't expect me to pay the price- you'll pay it in lost business- that's a guarantee. UPDATE- 1 year later. I was recently contacted by a rep hoping to 'change my mind' about this company by offering a discounted price due to my poor review. Since this contact, new reviews have been created (I'm looking at you Mike Anderson). Maybe there was a management change recently and they are looking to create a new positive image. They may actually be providing some better service a year later. Too little too late for my $. Welcome to the 21st century Forest Travel.
At first the customer service was top notch, the appraiser was prompt and courteous. The dish pack we ordered went perfectly, the movers arrived and everything went quickly. But all did not end well. I have an antique dresser with a marble top, it's well over 100 years old. At some point in it's history the marble top was broken and repaired. There is a proper way to handle marble. Unfortunately the Daryl Flood movers did not take the proper care, which resulted in the marble top snapping in two right along the original break. Now I have owned this piece for over 10 years, and it's been moved at least seven times, and there has never been a problem. I got a repair quote, filed a claim with Daryl Flood, and they rejected it saying it was broken before the move? What!? I replied back via email to the claims adjuster and simply stated this was not acceptable and if they did not rectify the situation then I'd have to leave them some bad reviews. 3 weeks have past, and still no reply..
service was fine but they lied and ripped me off. called him asking wat comprable prices were for a smog test only he told me 70 was the cheapest i would find so i went there now its time to smog my truck and i find a guy who will do it for 29.95. liars liars liars
The delivery service is very bad. The driver refused to deliver to the premises, he called demanding someone to wait for him in the street and was very rude. When called to complain at the branch the person on the phone was even ruder & did not care. Service is below zero. Avoid this branch.
Awesome view. Rooftop restaurant was nice. Facilities in a state of disrepair however. Air conditioning was "working fine" but was not really cooling the room, was humid and hot with no escape. Only two lifts worked. Lobby seemed a bit smelly. Flies buzz around you in all but the rooftop restaraunt. Hookers haunt the steakhouse. But im fairly picky, its probably more bearable in colder months when the "working" AC isn't such an issue.
The only upside is the price/location combo. Everywhere else in this area you'll pay way more. However, if you can afford it, don't live here! The management is difficult to say the least. The maintenance is poor. My apartment has flooded at least 6 times in the past couple of months and management basically just tells us, "oh well, it sure has rained a lot lately, huh". However, my bathroom has had water pour down from the ceiling almost as many times as the living room as flooded. I also have mold in the walls now and the air conditioner floods occasionally as well! Who needs the community pool? Thankfully I haven't been robbed, but my door shows obvious signs of a past break-in and I've been informed of at least 3 robberies while I've lived here. I, too, regret renewing here. Oh and don't forget to read the fine print on your letters from mgmt and in your lease. You'll regret it if you don't.
fat man blocks only walk way in to the store asked if I could be helped when I find another way around him. a few steps later I think that I hate what just happened and find my way out the sliding door is crap so I walk in to it the fat man says dont com back to his store I yell back no one should. I have bin going to this place many times and never had a problem all I can say is this the fat man is rude and in the way if he is the manager or store manager he is a bad one and I hope he spends the rest of his alone.
ils ont renvoyé ma gd mere a 23H !!! qui été arrivée vers 18H suite chute..motif de la sortie : trauma cranien sans gravite. pas de place pour elle. debrouillez vous pour venir la chercher... lendemain nous l'avons amenée sur lens car elle avait tjs mal a la tete et gros trouble vu plus comportement... verdict AVC !!! donc oui à henin il l'ont laissée sortir (plutot mise dehors) sans avoir vu qu'elle faisait avc !!! du coup bps dheure de perdues... et sequelles en consequence... surtout n'allez pas a henin !! visez lens !!! a lens prise en charge direct et scanner dans la foulée.
The food we ordered tasted fine except for their Queso dip with Chorizo. Isn't Queso dip suppose to be cheese? Whatever it is, it isn't cheese. Cheese thickens as it gets cold, this stuff didn't. And it didn't taste good. The service could have been better, our waitress was extremely slow. If we hadn't asked for help from other servers I probably wouldn't have left any tip. We won't patronize this restaurant again.
Ogród już po remoncie i toalety już bezpłatne. To chyba jedyna zaleta :) Mało atrakcyjnych zwierząt, za to plac zabaw i park linowy. Czy to jeszcze jest zoo czy może już park zabaw ze zwierzętami w około? Musicie sami ocenić! Spacer to zdrowie więc lepiej się wybrać tutaj niż do marketu ;)
The beer!!!!!Terrible
I had called 8/9/12 to order two side mirrors for my car. When I arrived Friday morning they had only had one delivered. So Courtney offered to only charge me for one mirror, which I thought was WONDERFUL customer service. You do not get that now a days. I was told the other mirrow would be in the following day. I was unable to come the following day but did make it in on 8/14. To my surpise the mirrow that they had delivered was broken. They took the mirror straight in and to the back so I was not sure what was going on. I heard a gentleman make a few calls and then ask a upfront girl to see if she would run to another location to get the new mirror. I was not told what was going on or what they were doing. I had to asked the lady leaving how long she would be gone. To my surprise, it was a 45 minute drive. Did the manager come and explain to me what was going on, no! He just sat at his desk and after I had asked how long this was going to take he got up and walked to the back of the store. The lady did return within 40 minutes with the mirror. I was waiting for them to install it so I could just leave. After about 15 mintues I was told it was installed and just needed to pay and I could go on my way. Upon reading my bill I noticed a charge that said "SU $9.00". Courtney was checking me out, which she is a wonderful young lady,. When I asked about the charge I was told by "John the manager" that is was a fuel charge. I thought it was very unusal but did not question it anymore. Well, once I got home I noticed the mirror they had put in was not put in correct. This will be my THIRD trip to glass master's. John, the manager, took my car back and fixed the mirror. I also asked again about the "SU $9.00" charge and asked what about my gas seeing that I have had to make 3 trips to this place. He just ignored my request. Also, on my receipt it showed that I had purchased one mirror. I asked John, the manager, if he could show that we had actually two mirrors installed and he said yes "IF I PAID NOW FOR THE OTHER MIRROR THAN HE WOULD LIST IT". I told him that was complete bull Sh*t because they has made the mistake and they offered the mirror for free. He jerked the receipt out of my hand and wrote on there 2 mirrors installed. John, the manager, was a very hateful man. He continued to talk down to my mother and myself and treated us as if we had made the mistake. I asked about the general managers name and number and was told they could not give it out???? What business can not give out the general manager name and number? I told him I wanted to speak with the general manager and he took a copy of my receipt and said he would pass it on. I am not going to hold my breath on this one. I will research on my own and find the general manager and report what a horrible person they have working as the manager for Glass Masters at the Blackwelder location. I would suggest going somewhere else if you want to be treated with respect and be treated as a paying customer. I felt sorry for the lady working with John, the manager, because when she offered to help us he gave her the most hateful look. Courtney is a wonderful employee and should be valued but the manager should be replaced or sent back to training. I will NEVER go back to Glass Master even if the mirrors replaced fall out!
I went there on my Birthday after giving them my birthday confirmation number this package was to include birthday cake a announcement and a picture. When I got there they told me they had no records of me setting up the birthday promo and were not going to honor my birthday promotion code long story short they did nothing and I got loaded at the bar and forgot about it.
None
Absolutely ridiculous. Can't comment directly on their services, simply because getting in to see an actual dentist was next to impossible. First, it took being on hold for over 20 minutes to get an appointment. Then, another 20 minutes to re-confirm that appointment at their request. Once there, we waited an hour past our scheduled time before finally giving up this practice for good. ProTip: If you can't even manage your patient's scheduling right, how can we expect you to manage our dental care in even half a decent way?
Never, ever, ever, ever again! They sell the cheapest crap, put full price items right next to sale signs and don't give refunds. Don't waste your time or money.
I lived in on of their apartments for 2 years in Warrenton OR. They will take every dime they can get from you legal or not, & still not put any money back into the property. In a 36 unit complex we had 5 washers & 5 dryers, most of the time only 2 of each worked they would spend hundreds of dollars in repairs, but never replace them. I am also a local contracor who also did work for this company & they are ALWAYS late with their payment. I was never late with my rent, but there policy is if your 2 or 3 days late they hit you with a notice & $45 late fee. Bottom line, if you can stay clear of them it will be in your best interest.
Got the group-on for the lavender treatment, and not only paid $100.00 but was charges upfront $35.00 !!!!!! for tip each person !! this was suppose to be a Massage of $200.00 value, and just felt like someone is petting me for an hour, did not like it at all, not worth even half of what was charged, very disappointing
Awful owners who steal tips from their servers. The owner is a crook who stole someones identity. Hope they close down!
This is not a beach bum Tanning Salon..they are scamming off of the name. They do not take any beach bum memberships or packages which they are obligated to do.
This is a mixed review. The Ozark Inn & Suites were a mid-priced motel for a small town. The lady who checked us in was very nice. And the room itself was really much nicer than we expected. If I had posted a review within the first hour we were there it would have received the highest marks. An hour in to our stay, and just after coming back from dinner, the water went out. That is correct. No showers after driving all day. No flushing the toilet. We were told that the water was being worked on and would be repaired soon. It was not repaired until nearly midnight (the water turning on suddenly woke us up). I turned the water faucet off and went back to sleep/ The next morning when we turned the shower on, a thick black paste oozed out with the water, coating the tub with an oily film and staining the wash rag we used to attempt wiping it up. One of the things I look for in even the cheapest motel is the ability to take a shower and flush the toilets. I wouldn't make an issue out of a cold shower even. When I discussed this with the young man at checkout, he told me that it wasn't the hotels fault that their plumbing needed repairs, that the black sludge "probably wouldn't hurt you or nothing", and that he couldn't do anything about it. I told him that I wasn't the sort of person that yelled and screamed till he got a refund. But that I was not impressed with our stay and that I was the sort of person that left honest reviews on websites. He shrugged. So, over all the room was nicely furnished and clean. At one point, my wife I had discussed coming back to spend more time in the area to explore the nearby parks on vacation. But the lack of water and the "it's not our problem" attitude that accompanied it are among the worst experiences I've ever had at motel, hotel, B&B, or even a hostel. And I say that as someone who spends about 1/3 of the year living out of hotel rooms short term. Bottom line: I will never stay here again. But you might find it to be a pleasant experience if there are no unforeseen repair jobs during your visit.
This is the worst Wal-Mart I have ever been to. The People who work here are rude, lines are always long, and it is Dirty from the parking lot to the inside. People latterly just load up a basket and walk out the door without paying.
None
I sent an older man there multiple times to have documents PRINTED- then signed-then EMAILED back to me. He does not speak very clear English, but is a very quick learner (having been a chemist and electrical engineer.) The staff took advantage of him. They charged him $40 to scan in 19 pages and then asked him to pay another $50 to FAX the documents. He has paid over $300 dollars at that location to send simple documents to me. I had NO idea that they had been doing this to him, When I called they said it was just easier because they were busy and under-staffed. I have been a Fed-Ex customer for a long time. I recommend Fed-Ex to my clients who do not have home scanners and computers or that are not internet proficient- most of them are elderly. I sell homes, the people that I recommend are on strict time frames they have to meet, they get out of work and must go to Fed-Ex after normal business hours to meet deadlines or they will not get their homes. FED-EX took advantage of this and I will never again send anyone there. They should be ashamed to have such opportunistic employees; I can only imagine what company policy directs this type of behavior.
Nothing but hassles and headaches with this company that has proven that it really doesn't care about its tenants: Last year, we were told that we could move in on the 1st of the month, and the lease we signed said the 1st. We show up on the first to get our keys (our families and friends had taken off work and rented trucks to move our things) and then all of the sudden we can't move in until the 7th. They edited our lease, and made us initial the change. We had already had the electricity turned on in the new place on the 1st, and rather than hassle with changing it back and forth between ourselves and the landlord, Scott Brown told us to take a certain amount off our rent that month, to compensate for the electricity we had paid for but not used. Every single month after that, they harassed us saying we were short on rent. We reminded them, the calls and emails continued. Upon moving out, our lease was to end on the 24th. So, I went to pick up the last of my things on the 24th, and the scumbags had already come and thrown away my stuff. About a dozen pairs of shoes, a 70-gallon bin of craft supplies, a hammock, a barbecue pit... The list continues. When I called to ask about where my missing things went, she said they had come to get them but that she would ask the maintenance team if maybe my things were still on a trailer somewhere. I waited on hold for 18 minutes, and then she hung up on me. DO NOT TRUST THESE PEOPLE TO KEEP THEIR WORD, OR TO RESPECT YOU, YOUR TIME, OR YOUR PROPERTY. They manage too many properties and do not have a smart enough team of employees to handle it.
My furnace quit and the repair guy came out. It was the ignitor for my gas furnace which they told me would be $352. for the part. I had replaced it a few years back for $150. Online the part is available about $35.. I declined and paid for the house call. I would not do business with then again.
My husband and I were headed up to Spokane area to take care of some business and we were also looking to head back home with a new Subaru Impreza. We had done our research and saw that Subaru of Spokane had 2013 Impreza's that fit our requirements in their lot. So we decided to give them a call a few days before we arrived in Spokane. At that time I spoke with Bill Keenan. He assured me that they had multiple Impreza's that fit my specifications and that he was looking forward to meeting me. The day before we went to the dealership I gave Bill a call to make sure they still had what I was looking for, once again he assured me that he did. So the next day we arrive at the dealership, met Bill and he shows of the lot of new cars. We were shocked to only find two Impreza's both nothing like what we wanted. Mainly they were manuals and we had made it clear we wanted an automatic. Upon realizing that the car we wanted was not there Bill decided to make some calls. Then, once again, he assured us that he had the car he told us about, but it was at the Costco across town. So we hopped in the car and headed for Costco, but low and behold 20 minutes later this Impreza was also a manual. So we all headed back to the dealership. Once we all got back, we were ready to leave. But then, out of no where, Bill tried to sell us a CrossTreck. We never wanted a CrossTreck. But Bill wanted us to have one. He wanted us to have one so bad that he started raising his voice when we said we did not want it. We ended up leaving very upset and stressed. I do not recommend this dealership. However, we did end up at Appleway Subaru and ended up taking home the Impreza that we wanted.
Mal rangé trop d'attente sal et sa pue
What was all the hype about? Very underwhelming.
Recently remodeled yet the food is still bad. I recently got a Whopper with cheese and the meat was bloody, not joking. The onion rings were cooked in old grease it tasted like. Needs new management.
TERRIBLE !!! Spent (5) hours in the waiting area to find out there was nothing toyota could do, My car sat in the drive in service area for an hour and a half before even being moved. Have been a Toyota owner for close to (9) years and never experienced this sort of treatment before.
Always loved this office until I had to cancel an appointment for my husband because he came down with the flu. I was reprimanded for cancelling his appointment because I did not provide them with 48 hours notice. As I tried to reschedule, was told I must pay a $50 deposit before they would schedule an appointment. When I mentioned that I had dental insurance that covered our visits entirely, I was told I would get reimbursed. As a manager, this is not how you retain clients. It did not set well with me and I will no longer refer anyone to them. I have since changed dentists as this practice of ludacris charging is not the norm for others in the area. Thank you Dr. Hiers for forcing me to shop around and find a dentist that values mine and my family's business!
Inconvenient Hours. Charged incorrect fee on two occasions. Workers have been pleasant, but I'm not sure how well they have been trained.
None
Food is terrible, drinks are watered down. If this place wasnt on the water, it would be out of business.
None
We were passed off to three different salesmen. I had a huge down payment almost could pay all cash and have excellent credit and they quoted me at 9% apr. The 2013 hondo fit I test drove had to be jumped. They said this happens all the time. REALLY?! Why would anyone buy a brand new car that stalled twice on the test drive. I went to toyota the next day and bought a 2013 prius C. Got an amazing deal (2,000 under invoice and 0.9% apr). My advice is if you really want a honda go to carmax or some other honda dealer. This place was horrible. I wish there was a lower rating to give them.
Not a standard place
None
Asaka's used to be a good place to go for a quick bite but over the years has spiraled down into crap. The final straw was this past weekend, my friends and i went and about five minutes into being in the resturant saw little bugs on the wall and a big fat RAT run out from under our table and INTO THE MAIN DINING ROOM. Will NEVER be back and have warned many people NOT to go there.
non so come si mangia perché dopo essermi seduto su un tavolo vuoto e aver aspettato 20min, ho fermato la cameriera che mi ha riaposto di alzarmi e lasciare libero per chiedere un posto alla sua collega. Mi sono alzato e me ne sono andato!!
None
I had a horrible experience with newington gun exchange. Their service was horrible from start to finish. It started with sending my ffl info and the rude people who responded that they were too busy to get it by fax In the end I received an ar15 rifle with no bolt carrier group. They claim it was n the buffer tube when they sent it . Needless to say no bcg in packaging either. On the phone they said they would take care of it then I hear from the customer they said I was lying and took the bcg. I called to verify over the weekend and got more run around. Needless to say four days no calls were returned and no heads up on my bcg and if they were going to d the right thing like they told me. I called 5 times to get tracking and they were always too busy for that too. I was other told to call tomorrow or call back on Thursday to get a tracking number. I got nothing but the run a round from day one. This will be my first review of many on this place as well as detailed thoroughly on my blog and social networking sites. Stay away from these guys. There has to be a better option for you guys up in Newington, CT.
I would think twice before going here. I went on my first visit and they asked me to pay upfront 800 then i go back asked me to pay another 750.00 and no work done, The day I got my parcial and upper teeth it was awful i cried so hard and dont know how im going to work until they fix it. I looked like a freak still do. My family came to get me and they were very upset my son in law asked who did this to her is this a joke. They also called the cops on us cause they did not want the customers to hear what they did or see. I wear a scarf now until this is fixed which they say will be a month I have never got this kind of service anywhere and again they are paid up front. Be leary of any dentist who asks to pay up front ... please consider going to a private practive this also happen to another friend of mine from work. I regret going here and am very sad and embarrassed !! I will let you know if they fix it. If i could I would post pics of my teeth. My top lip sticks out and i have huge GUMS looks like teeth from halloween. BTW the dentist was laughing
Nice and clean, but a bit worn down. Location is good and price is fair..
Cracked my list of top 5 worst dining experiences, I can only hope this restaurant goes out of business soon. I'll leave out the minor details but atmosphere was cluttered and tacky, service was terrible, and the food was a poor copy of BWW. The wings were small and about a third were broken with sharp bone shards. The flavors were extremely lacking. All four flavors I tried were not on par with other wing joints and I had to send one order of Cajun back because the spice combination and oil dousing made it inedible (first time I've done that in a while). Each order of (6) wings took a solid 20 mins to come out on their all you can eat night. This may be why I heard a manager flipping out in the back above the noise of the FOH. Plus I never did get that ranch I asked for twice. I could go on but I think I got my point across.
It has been under construction for years and years now. There is never anyone that asks if you need help finding anything. It's an over priced tourist attraction. However, for hunting/fishing gear they have a good variety.
Worst McDonalds I have ever been to. This review is based on years of sporadically going down to my local maccas, and having them stuff up the order more often than not. In fact, I think I can only remember 2 occasions where they got it right. They never put pickles on the burgers unless you ask, and when you do ask for extra pickles, the smart a$$es think its funny to put a soggy handful of about 20 on there. They frequently, and conveniently forget to give you certain items that you've paid for, and half the time, you bite into it and it's cold.
Just trying to call to ask about iPads in stock at this Charleston store. Have been on hold for 14:45 minutes and counting? Really? The Apple Store. No on can get to the phone?
This place is completely horrible. But it's cheap. I'm only here cause I work out of town and I need a cheap place to stay during the week but other then that I would not suggest anyone to stay here
I brought my car in for a scheduled appointment for routine maintenance, and wheel balancing. They were clearly way over booked as there was a long line of other cars in front of me when I arrived. They told me it would be an hour and a half at most. After about 2 hours, the service associate came out and told me that they'd found a problem, and it would not be much longer, but it had to be fixed. When I mentioned I had already been there 2 hours, he offered to sign me op for the shuttle, which would pick me up and bring me back to get my car. I took the shuttle home. After about 3 hours, I hadn't heard from anybody, so I called to see if my car was ready. I was sent to the service associate's voice mail. I called the main line and told them I needed to speak with him directly because I needed my car which had been there for 5 hours. She gave me a number that reached him, and he told me the shuttle would arrive "soon" to pick me up. After another half hour, I called again and got his voice mail. I left a message saying I really needed my car, and asking him to call me and let me know when I would be picked up. Then I called again another half hour later, and was told it would not be long, but they could not say when. They close in 45 minutes, and I still have not heard a word. I can't say much about the quality of the service as I haven't seen it yet, but the communication STINKS, and the shuttle service does too! I will be looking for another place to have my car serviced from here on out.
None
I actually would like to review C&M Auto Body works, except the don't seem to want any business. I have limited time off from my work, so it was extremely frustrating when I called twice to get an estimate done on repairs needed on a Jeep Grand Cherokee, once on a weekend, once on a Monday (today) only to have been blown off by C &M both times. The previous Saturday call last week got a "too busy, can't help you now" response. Today the individual on the phone's from C&M biggest concern was where I lived, and when I stated west El Paso, he cuts me off and says he can't help me as they are "too busy" and he then suggests "I take my business elsewhere". So much for same day service they advertise on their website. Not sure what kind off business plan they have, but I guess "business" isn't part of it. My advice: take your money and your business elsewhere as C&M apparently doesn't need it or want it.
Very very rude secretary and nasty cuatomer service. Unbelievable how businesses like this can exist. Will never call. Make you wait a long time and lie about being at the location. When you call back they reply they didn't see you and if you want another cab to wait 2 hours. Totally unprofessional and disgusting.
My experience at Monell's was partly my own fault for not entirely understanding what I was getting into when I was taken here with a group of friends. I had no idea that I would be shoe horned in with 18 other strangers around one medium sized table forced to sit in an awkwardly uncomfortable chair. Nor did I realize that there was one meal on the menu, buffet style deep fried fare. Nor did I realize that the "servers" at the establishment are really only there to plop dishes down on the table. From there you get to fight for your portions and selections with the other 17 folks at your table. If you want an experience that feels like you don't have two dimes to rub together and you're being forced to eat with your elbow heavy siblings around grandma's dining table on a sunday night, then Monell's is an excellent choice. However if you are like me and you have found gainful employment and chosen to eat out so that A) you can order your OWN meal; B) you can be waited on by the "wait" staff; C) you can speak openly and freely at the table with your peers without the hassle of strangers; or D) you want to check your phone during a meal THEN you should avoid Monell's at all costs. The insult to injury is that I had to sit in a cramped space with strangers while serving myself and the meal still cost $19.
The room is horrible. Smells funny, stained carpets, beds are uncomfortable, and there are no amenities. I was afraid to sleep with their covers and pillows so I went out to go buy my own. I guess you get what you pay for. Will not stay here again.
The hotel, hotel staff and location are great. Unfortunately hotel management and Holiday Inn customer service is a whole different story. Had reservations for the NHL Winter Classic. The hotel charged my cc a no show fee even though the reservation was cancelled with supporting documentation. Very disappointing! I have stayed here numerous times due to its great location. I understand mistakes can happen but the VERY, VERY poor customer service and complete lack of communication from the Hotel managment, Holiday Inn and IHG hotels is extremely upsetting. Looks like ill be staying at one of the many other Downtown Detroit hotel... Marriott, Courtyard, Greektown, Hilton Garden Inn etc. No amount of renovations are worth the headache
This restaurant used to be great before switching owners and all of the employees as well. Now it is just awful. Things taste burnt and like BBQ when it is supposed to be Thai food.
Based on the very high number of 5 Star ratings we saw on the internet, we chose to stay at the Mariners Cove Motel a year ago in April 2013. We were shocked at what we found there. The place was truly an old rundown dump! Rips in the couch, cigarette burn marks on the sink and bathtub, sliding windows rusted shut, no telephone or radio in the room, the headboard had a huge wear mark from years of people leaning against it, no washcloths, dead bugs filled a lamp fixture, no soda or ice machine, the door to the office was missing, very old electrical outlets, holes in the carpet, the room smelled like old cigarettes.... I could go on. It was very obvious that most of the 5 Star ratings were fabricated - probably by the owners. Many of the ratings also commended the office manager Raj (but how did they all know his name? He didn't wear a name tag.) I reported these findings to TripAdvisor and asked them to investigate the very high ratings, but nothing changed. Perfect ratings continued to pour in. Not 3 stars or 4 stars, but always 5 Stars! How could such a dumpy old hotel continue to get such high ratings?? Fraud. Now it is gone, people are dead and arson is being investigated. We shall see what develops.
Very rude and arrogant. The people working there act like they do not care if their items sell or not. Ignores customers and acts busy all the time. Bad shopping experience.
It's not a motel - it's a thinly disguised aslyum for the damned for $50/night. And if you consent to stay a second time, then you belong in it. RUN, do not walk. the room looked like it hadn't been touched in 20 years. when attempting (out of desperation) to use the shower, tiles cascaded off the wall in a vain attempt at suicide. I empathized with them. the door was unsecured, so I slept (fitfully, in clothes, on top of the bedcovers) with a chair under the doorknob. sleeping in your car on the side of the interstate is a better option than this hellhole.
the FIRST time i went here the girls were acting all snooty like they were to tired to work. definitely the worst eyeglass store ever.then they OVERCHARGED ME for my glassed but before that they said i couldn't qualify for the 2 for 70 deal because i had a "special prescription" which was bull i brought mom om up there and they acted like i could qualify after all they were just trying to stick me with bifocals to get a bigger sale . when mu perscription is nowhere near that high
Unprofessional, improperly trained staff.
None
Have gotten our orders wrong both times we went. Food was just ok once they finally got our orders right. Management was not very helpful in resolving this. Won't be back there again.
We bought a short hair Hamster there to surprise our kids about a month ago and when we took it home he screeched and screamed which I have never heard before. A few weeks later he died and when we went to get a new one we were told that the short haired Hamsters have seemed like they have neurological issues, um why are you selling them then? So we got a long haired Hamster and literally a week to the day it died as well. That is the last time I step foot in that store.
They say they monitor they're drivers actions & speed by camera & in car monitoring...? Really...? Maybe you should be reviewing the terrible drivers they've been hiring lately & paying up there insurance.....
Whatever you do with this company - do not pre-pay for anything with these people. I have decided to move my dental business else where and they have not given me back my funds that I put on account for dental procedures. I have been asking for those funds for a month! They are all about taking your money not about service and or being honest to their customers! We were told we would get our money back in 5 to 10 business days. One month later still waiting!
None
Do NOT recommend them if you are making a corporate purchase. They do NOT know what they are doing. I posted my whole story on their Facebook page, feel free to go and read unless they have removed it. I have bought many corporate cars and these guys are the worst EVER. They have called me NUMEROUS times re the paperwork and financing, but I have called and left a message THREE times regarding a scratch on the inside of my passenger door, on my $60k brand new car. NOBODY has called to resolve that issue. As soon as I signed the paperwork, service went out the door. This is NOT my first negative experience with this company. Perhaps a bit of customer service training may be in order!!!!!!!!! And better service AFTER the sale.
I moved here back in September from 3 hours away. Automatically when I needed medicine refilled I used Walgreens as always. I have NEVER dealt with a pharmacy soooooooooo slow. I thought maybe it was the day however everytime since has been the same. There are times I travel so Walgreens is convenient, however I am so close to finding a new location. If anyone can recommend a better location in Peru area please contact me. With as much money we spend on medication each month any pharmacy would love to have us.
I absolutely hate this store not clean workers are rude as hell would never recommend this store
Managers are helpless lost souls. The Area manager has not got a clue. Useless and embarrassing to the point of neglect. babies asleep in parents drunk arms at 1am in the morning. Staff to busy talking to friends. Horrible food service 3x wrong order. Always continue to serve DRUNKS then let them drive home. (AWFUL).......Write to corporate about the foolish area manger and his shaningans and NOTHING. Managers need to listen to customers and this place is dieing on its knees through neglect. AVOID....
Buyers beware!!!!! I bought 2 new expensive bmx bikes for my sons and one of them was used. Didnt see all of the scratches and paint chips in the store. Was able to see all of the minor damage to the one bike in the sun after I took it out of my vehicle. Unfortunately I called and talked to the owner as well as talked to him in person. Im not sure why he is even at his own business. I had way more knowledge as far as the questions I asked about upgrades on both bikes, and had more business and social skills than this guy!!! He was very rude and questioned why I wanted a new bike at new bike prices.....? My question to him was why would you buy a used car at new car prices????? Im only rating this review so low on behalf of the owners rudeness, inexperience, and poor business skills. Oh by the way, the new bike I finally got I believed was deliberately scratched. This business does have good knowledgeable sales associates and bike techs.
Although I did not stay at this Hotel, I called to speak to my newphew and this man started being ugly to me. Saying he did not give any information about his customers and did want any information, I was trying to find out rooms had phones in them and He was so rude he would not let me leave a message. I called again to try to leave a message and he asked me if I understoon engish, I told you I do give out any information on my customers and then hung up. My nephew was released from the hospital and he said that is where he will be staying. I have noy heard from him in 4 days and I was worried.
Limited Selection of food, Not the greatest service, Didnt get my pickle spear like menu says and instead after I asked they brought a small cup of pickle slices, didnt get my side salad until I asked. So basically I was served a burger on a plate and they didnt see anything wrong. Just a shady place if you ask me. Plus some creepy guy kept staring at my woman. Wont be going back I can get that service and food from McDonalds.
맛도 예전만 못한거 같고 그 몸쓸놈의 기억 때문에 다시 왔지만 다른 곳에 비하면 서비스도 많이 떨어지지만 비싸기만 하고 다시는 안 오는게 좋겠다는 생각하면서....
Цены жуть самый дорогой магазин в городе....
I was approached by a door salesman and scheduled a simple estimate. When they notified me the morning of the estimate I was told my spouse had to be present in order to give me an estimate. I was very disappointed and cancelled the estimate. Advised the Sales Manager that I can make decisions and there was not a need for my wife to be present, but he refused to give me a estimate. Very poor customer service....another high pressure sales pitch I assume.
I ordered my mother of grooms dress on Feb. 25, 2013 and the wedding is June 29, 2013 and I have yet to receive my dress. I have it pre-paid and even paid the extra money that it will cost to send to me, since I live in Florida. I will be doing my own alterations. They told me it would be in the 3rd week of May. When I called that week, they told me it would be delayed. SO I called the next week and again they told me it was going to be delayed about 2 weeks. I called the Company - Jordan Fashions itself and got them involved and they would not give me any information because they don't deal with customers, they deal with the stores directly. How lovely!! So until I get my dress, if I ever get my dress, I have to let you future brides, moms, bridesmaids know, that you can't believe what these girls are telling you. I have been told so many stories....I suppose, I should have just made my own dress and tell these high dollar fashion stores to stick it!!
Be very careful about using Team One Auto Group - Harrisburg they use a ploy to have people come in for their special $15.99 inspection/emission ($20 out the door) and then they find items to fail you for so they can charge you for additional services at their rate of $80/hr. I even had their manager Dave French tell me that if I am not going to use their parts and rates that they do not want me to come in for inspections. When confronted he told me at first he they would meet any comparable offer and then when I provided one, I was told to "just use them". They failed me for an item which I had verified by independent mechanics that claimed there was no reason to replace the item, let alone fail an inspection for it.
This is for my neice's family... I am waiting not to give a final review but so far, after they bought at used car with a warranty, we are waiting to see if they live up to "nothing like a Leta." It seems after phone calls that they are getting shrugged off. Warranty needs approved and no one seems to be able to do that. I hope they soon correct this so this review can be removed and a better one written.
Tempat apakah ini?
Kurang cepat pelayanànya
Was not a big fan of this Resturant. The food was decent, but nothing to write home about. The atmosphere is really lacking, and the service is inconsistent. Dishes are small and expensive. Our main complaint was how much we spent. At a table for two, we spent about $100. Very, very overpriced for the experience delivered at this resturant.. We expected a nice romantic spot and got a place plainly furnished, with dirty tables and people from the bar smoking and drinking out front.
Żadne halo
it is a very worst hospital in chennai........because in my experience i am teeling , i idmit my father in that hospital after two day i seen the doctor activities and nurses is very worst response and carefulness....doctor is always telling lie i think.........in this hospital all are tryning nurses only ..............so no one cannot go to treatment in this hospital
Beware!!! The health department should shut this place down. 8 of us ended up with severe diarrhea after eating here. We should have walked out when the waitress brought 8 plates to our table and all of them had food stuck to them. The silverware needed to be sent back twice. The Asst Manager stands there barking orders at her staff. She is so rude to them. In her defense, she has the most incompetent staff I have ever seen. They leave tables dirty. People stand waiting to be seated and they are ignored. It has not been scrubbed for a long time. I travel all the time and dont cook. I have eaten from street vendors in Mexico, China, and India and never got sick. This Pizza Hut wins the prize of the worst place in service, cleanliness, and food.
Normally, they are only good because they are cheap. If you can't get it cheap, don't go!! Been on too many bus stops where it showed up late or not at all. Be warned, there's never a refund.
Fully agree with the other posts. The pharmacy is sub-par. On several occasions I have called and talked to their staff and they "guarantee" something will be ready at a certain time and that they will call you.... I never get the call and the prescription is rarely ready on time. Seems like it takes forever to fill prescriptions.
When me and my husband arrived at Marlowe Ink everyone treated us great. I brought a picture in and Danny was going to tattoo it on me. We were in the waiting room patiently waiting to get the sketch done, admiring some of the work on the walls. There were photos everywhere so my husband stepped into the hall and immediately got chewed out. You are not to leave the waiting room to see any of the pictures in the hall or anywhere else. Okay, that was fine.--But the lady at the desk could have been much nicer about it. Then Danny was done and we were going to the back room to get tattooed! All of a sudden they yell at my husband because the only people allowed to be in the room is the artist and the person getting the tattoo. I did not want to get this done alone. It was my birthday and my husband is getting deployed to Afghanistan in a couple weeks so I wanted to spend the experience with him. They didn't care about any of that. They said someone at one time stole some tattoo equipment so now no one can have company back there. So I told Danny I guess I will go somewhere else to get it done. I'm not going to get it done alone. I politely asked for my drawing back and he said 'absolutely not!' and crumpled it up and threw it in the trash. I couldn't be more disgusted with this place. We ended up going to Patriots and couldn't have been happier with their service or quality of tattoo! My husband actually ended up getting one too that night! Highly recommend Logan and Kat from Patriots!
Unfriendly and filthy....almost left when I saw the bathroom but had already ordered and paid for food
Filthy, horribly maintained hotel. Proximity to downtown is the only upside to staying here. The toilet ran all night, the light fixtures and outlets are falling out of the walls with exposed wiring. I got trapped in the elevator unable to exit on the 1st floor and had to take it to the basement and force the door open. Our "non-smoking room" smelled of cigarettes and mold. The owner clearly does not care about the cliental allowing the place to fall apart without investing in repairs and staff willing to clean to acceptable industry standards. Spend your money elsewhere and DO NOT STAY HERE.
Sleeping in a Walmart parking lot full of hobos sounds better than going here.
Quality has dropped since last ate there a year ago,The Processed General Tso's Chicken was like eating rock candy the past 2 times Ive been there,Egg roll very soggy inside and steamed dumplings just did not taste right..The Girl there stingy with giving out sauce packs on take out..I'm going to try out a different Chinese restaurant after this.
